Digitized  by  the  Internet  Arciiive 

in  2009  witii  funding  from 

Ontario  Council  of  University  Libraries  and  Member  Libraries 


http://www.archive.org/details/shakespeareasyouOOshak 


WILLIAM  SHAKESPEARE. 


CANADIAN  SCHOOL   SHAKESPEARE 


SHAKESPEARE'S 

AS  YOU  LIKE  IT 


FOR    USE    I:N^    FUBLIC  A^^TD    high    SCHOOIiS 


WITH   ANNOTATIONS    BY 

O.   J.    STEVENSON,   M.A.,   D.Paed, 

Professor  of  English,  Ontario  Agricultural  College, 
Guelph 


TORONTO 
THE  COPP    CLARK  COMPANY,  LIMITED 


Copyright,  Canada,  1919,  by  The  Copp.  Clark  Company,  Limited, 
Toronto,  Ontario 


PREFACE 


The  Canadian  School  Shakespeare,  as  the  name  implies, 
is  intended  for  use  in  Public  and  High  Schools  in  Canada; 
and  the  annotations  have  been  prepared  especially  with  a 
view  to  the  requirements  of  pupils  in  these  schools.  Besides 
the  explanation  of  difficulties  in  the  text,  the  notes  on  each 
scene  include  a  brief  critical  comment,  to  which  are  added 
a  series  of  questions  based  on  the  study  of  the  scene;  and 
following  the  annotations  on  each  Act  is  a  short  summary 
or  review.  An  Appendix  to  the  volume  contains  examination 
questions  from  departmental  and  matriculation  papers,  and  a 
list  of  composition  subjects  based  on  the  play  itself. 

The  Introduction  to  the  play  contains  a  note  on  metre, 
an  analysis  of  the  characters  and  plot,  and  such  general 
information  as  the  study  of  the  play  requires.  As  a  matter 
of  interest  to  the  student  an  outline  of  the  life  of  Shakespeare, 
with  an  account  of  the  theatre  in  his  time,  is  also  included. 
As  a  result  of  certain  interesting  researches  that  were  made 
a  few  years  ago,  some  new  light  has  been  thrown  upon  the 
life  of  Shakespeare  in  London ;  but  within  the  limits  of  the 
brief  outline  which  is  required  in  a  volume  such  as  this,  the 
editor  has  not  thought  it  advisable  to  go  into  these  details. 

The  material  is  so  arranged  that  the  pupil  in  junior  classes 
may  easily  obtain  the  help  that  he  finds  necessary ;  while 
at  the  same  time  the  senior  pupil  will  also  find  in  the 
book  all  the  assistance  he  requires  in  preparation  for  his 
examinations. 


CONTENTS 


William  Shakespeare  (Frontispiece) 

The  Life  of  Shakespeare 

The  Theatre  in  Shakespeare's  Time 

The  Metre  of  Shakespeare's  Plays 

Date  ;    Sources  of  the  Plot  ;    Scene  ;    Title 

The  Character  of  the  Play 

The  Theme  of  the  Play 

Structihie    . 

Sources  of  Interest  . 

Important  Characters 

TniE  Analysis     . 

Dramatis  Persons 

Text  of  *'As  You  Like  It" 

Notes  on  "As  You  Like  It 

Questions  from  Departmental  and  Matriculation 


Vll 

viii 
ix 
xi,  xii 
xii 
xiii 
xiii 
xiv 

XV 

xviii 

XX 

1 

93 
Papers  134 


INTRODUCTION 


The  Life  of  Shakespeare. 

William  Shakespeare  was  bom  in  Stratford-on-Avon,  in  Warwick- 
shire, on  April  23rd,  1564.  His  father,  John  Shakespeare,  was,  in 
early  life,  a  prosperous  citizen  of  Stratford ;  his  mother,  Mary  Arden, 
was  the  daughter  of  a  well-to-do  farmer  of  Warwickshire.  Between 
the  ages  of  seven  and  fourteen,  Shakespeare  probably  attended  the 
Stratford  Grammar  School,  where,  among  other  things,  he  received 
Bome  training  in  Latin.  In  the  year  1582,  before  he  was  nineteen  years 
of  age,  he  married  Anne  Hathaway,  of  Shottery,  a  woman  who  was 
some  eight  years  his  senior.  Two  of  their  children,  Susanna  and  Judith, 
married,  but  only  one  of  Shakespeare's  grand-children  reached  maturity, 
and  with  her  death  in  1669  or  16-70  the  poet's  family  became  extinct. 

About  the  year  1586,  Shakespeare  left  Stratford  and  went  to  London, 
where  he  appears  to  have  obtained  employment  in  some  capacity  in 
connection  with  the  London  theatres.  About  158S  he  began  making 
over  old  plays,  and  in  1590  he  probably  wrote  his  first  original  drama. 
During  the  next  twenty  years,  from  1590  to  1610,  he  produced  play 
after  pkiy,  and  there  is  abundant  evidence  to  show  the  esteem  in  which 
he  was  held  by  his  contemporaries.  In  1594  he  was  a  member  of  the 
Earl  of  Leicester's  Company  of  Players.  When  the  Globe  theatre  was 
built  in  1599,  Shakespeare  was  one  of  the  chief  shareholders,  and  most 
of  his  plays  were  acted  in  this  theatre. 

In  the  meantime  he  had  begun  to  acquire  property  in  Stratford.  In 
1597  he  had  purchased  the  fine  residence  known  as  New  Place,  and 
from  this  time  forward  he  appears  to  have  looked  more  and  more  to 
Stratford  as  his  home.  About  the  year  1610  or  1611,  he  left  London 
and  returned  to  Stratford  with  the  apparent  intention  of  living  in  ease 
and  retirement  on  the  competence  which  he  had  accumulated.  A  few 
years  later,  however,  his  health  failed,  and  he  died  in  April,  1616,  in 
his  fifty-second  year.  He  was  buried  in  the  chancel  of  the  Church  of 
the  Holy  Trinity,  in  Stratford. 

Shakespeare's  literary  career  is  generally,  for  the  sake  of  convenience, 
divided  into  four  periods,  according  to  the  character  of  the  plays  which 
he  produced : 

(a)  1588-1594.  This  is  largely  a  period  of  apprenticeship.  To  this 
period  belong.  Love's  Labour' a  Lost,  Comedy  of  Errors,  Richard  JIL^ 
and  possibly  Romeo  and  Juliet. 


Vill  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT 

(6)  1594-1600.  During  this  period  most  of  the  great  comedies  and 
the  English  historical  plays  were  produced.  To  this  period  belongs 
A  Midsummer  KiglWs  Dream,  The  Jferchant  of  Venice,  As  You  Like  It, 
Richard  II.,  Henry  IV.,  and  Henry  V. 

(c)  1600-1606.  During  this  period  most  of  the  great  tragedies  were 
produced.  To  this  period  belong  to  JtUius  Ccesar,  Hamlet,  Othello, 
King  Lear  and  Macbeth. 

{d)  1606-1612.  This  is  a  period  of  later  tragedy  and  of  serious  comedy. 
To  this  period  belong,  Antony  and  Cleopatra,  Coriolanus,  Cymbeline, 
The  Tempest  and  A  Winter's  Tale. 

Shakespeare  himself  took  no  pains  to  preserve  his  plays  in  permanent 
form.  In  all  only  fifteen  of  his  plays  were  printed  during  his  lifetime. 
In  1623,  however,  seven  years  after  his  death,  a  complete  collection  of 
his  plays,  thirty-six  in  all,  were  published  in  what  is  known  as  The 
Folio  of  1623. 

Note. — A  folio  page  is  about  the  size  of  an  ordinary  page  of  foolscap 
(about  13''xS|"),  formed  by  folding  the  printer's  sheet  of  paper  once. 
When  the  printer's  sheet  is  divided  into  four  parts,  the  size  of  page 
is  known  as  quarto  ;  when  divided  into  eight  parts  it  is  octavo  ;  when 
divided  into  twelve  parts  it  is  duodecimo.  The  plays  which  were 
printed  during  Shakespeare's  lifetime  were  published  in  quarto  volumes, 
as  distinguished  from  the  later  folios. 

The  Theatre  in  Shakespeare's  Time. 

The  first  theatre  in  London  was  built  in  1576,  and  was  known  as 
The  Theatre.  Both  this  and  other  theatres  which  followed,  The  Curtain, 
The  Globe,  Blackfriars,  and  others,  were  built  outside  the  city  limits  in 
order  to  escape  the  restrictions  which  were  placed  on  the  theatre  by 
the  Puritans.  Alost  of  the  theatres  were  frame  structures  which  were 
open  to  the  sky,  the  only  roofed  part  being  the  stage,  or,  at  most,  the 
raised  seats  next  the  walls.  The  better  class  of  people  occupied  seats 
in  the  boxes  overlooking  the  stage,  or  sab  on  stools  or  reclined  on  the 
rushes  on  the  floor  of  the  stage  itself.  The  floor  of  the  pit  was  merely 
hard  earth,  and  it  was  not  provided  with  seats.  The  admission  to  the 
pit  was  only  a  penny,  and  here  the  rabble  crowded  together,  jostled 
each  other,  cracked  nuts,  ate  apples,  and  laughed  and  joked  and  made 
sport  of  the  actors. 

The  performance  of  the  play  began  at  three  o'clock  in  the  afternoon, 
and  usually  lasted  two  or  three  hours.     The  stage  waa  hung  with  black 


THE   METRE   OF   SHAKESPEARE  S   PLAYS  IX 

to  indicate  tragedy,  and  with  blue  to  indicate  comedy.  There  was  no 
curtain  to  mark  the  opening  and  closing  of  the  scenes,  and  beyond  a  few 
simple  articles  of  furniture,  no  scenery  of  any  account  was  used.  At 
the  back  of  the  stage  was  a  sort  of  gallery  or  balcony,  which  served  the 
purpose  of  an  upper  room,  or  any  place  which  was  raised  above  the 
level  of  the  ordinary  scene.  A  change  of  place  was  indicated  by  a  board 
with  the  name  painted  on  it,  as,  London,  Venice,  Rome,  Sardis.  A 
light  blue  flag  was  used  to  indicate  a  day  scene, — a  dark  flag  to  indicate 
a  night  scene.  The  women's  parts  in  the  play  were  acted  by  boys,  and 
women  did  not  appear  even  among  the  audience  unless  they  wore  masks. 
It  was  not  until  after  the  Restoration,  that  movable  stage  scenery  waa 
introduced,  and  that  female  parts  were  acted  by  women. 

The  Metre  of  Shakespeare's  Plays. 

The  plays  of  Shakespeare  are  written  in  blank  verse,  that  is,  verse  in 
which  the  lines  do  not  rhyme.  Each  line  contains  five  feet,  consisting 
of  two  syllables  each,  with  the  accent  falling  on  the  second  syllable. 
This  measure  is  known  as  iambic  pentameter. 

When  we  mark  the  divisions  between  feet  and  indicate  the  accents 
in  a  line  of  poetry,  we  are  said  to  scari  it.  Where  the  metre  is  perfectly 
regular,  the  scansion  presents  no  difiiculty  ;  but  very  frequently  the 
poet  finds  it  necessary  t )  vary  his  metre,  either  for  the  sake  of  avoiding 
monotony  or  for  the  purpose  of  producing  certain  special  eflects.  The 
following  are  the  most  important  of  the  variations  which  occur  in  the 
metre  of  Shakespeare : 

(a)  Sometimes,  especially  after  a  pause,  the  accent  falls  upon  the 
first  syllable  instead  of  the  second,  as,  for  example  : 

Wo'e  to  /  the  ha'nd  /  that  sh'ed  /  this  co'st/ly  blo'od  ! 
What  ju'dg/ment  sh'all  /  I  dre'ad,  /  d'oing  /  no  wro'ng  ? 

(b)  An  extra  syllable  is  frequently  added,  especially  at  the  end  of  a 
line,  as,  for  example : 

Art  th'ou  /  some  g'od,  /  some  a'n/gel  o'r  /  some  de'v/il  ? 
It  dr'op/peth  a's  /  the  ge'n/tle  ra'in  /  from  he'av/en. 

(c)  Sometimes  a  foot  contains  two  unaccented  syllables,  as,  for 
example,  in  the  following  lines  : 

I  am  ne'v/er  m'er/ry  wh'en  / 1  he'ar  /  sweet  m'u/sic  ; 

Let  me  s'ee,  / let  me  see,  /  waa  n'ot  /  the  lea'f  / turn'd  dow'n ? 


X  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT 

In  many  cases,  however,  one  of  the  unaccented  syllables  is  elided,  or 
slurred  over  in  reading,  as,  for  example,  in  the  following  : 

Canst  tho'u  /  not  m'in/(i)ster  t'o  /  a  mi'nd  /  dise'ased  ? 
We'll  se'nd  /  Mark  A'n  /  t(o)ny  t'o  /  the  Se'n/ate-ho'use. 
Macb'eth  /  doth  m'urder  sle'ep,  /  the  i'n/n(o)cent  sl'eep. 

{d)  Certain  groups  of  letters  which  are  now  pronounced  as  one 
syllable,  are  sometimes  pronounced  as  two  syllables  in  Shakespeare,  as, 
for  example,  in  the  following  : 

The  noble  Brutus 
Hath  told  /  you  Ca'es/ar  wa's  /  amb'it  /  i-o'us. 
Misli'ke  /  me  n'ot  /  for  m'y  /  comple'x/i-o'n. 

(e)  It  frequently  happens  that  among  the  accented  syllables  in  a  line 
of  poetry  some  have  a  stronger  stress  than  others  ;  and  in  order  to  scan 
a  line,  it  is  sometimes  necessary  to  accent  Tords  which  according  to  the 
sense  have  no  stress,  as,  for  example,  in  the  case  of  the  italicized  worda 
in  the  following  : 

Throw  phy's/ic  to'  /  the  do'gs  ;  /  I'll  no'ne/of  i't  ! 

There  i's  /  a  ti'de  /  iu  th'e  J  aflfa'irs  /  of  me'n.  , 

Rhyme  is  used  by  Shakespeare  chiefly  for  the  purpose  of  giving 
emphasis  to  those  lines  in  which  the  speaker  expresses  a  purpose  or 
decision,  and  it  very  frequently  marks  the  close  of  a  scene.  Shakespeare 
used  rhyme  much  more  freely  in  his  earlier  than  in  his  later  plays. 

Prose.  Shakespeare  makes  use  of  prose  in  his  plays  wherever  the 
characters  belong  to  a  lower  level  of  society,  as,  for  example,  the 
citizens  in  Julius  Ccesar,  the  porter  in  Macbeth,  and  Lancelot  Gobbo, 
the  clown,  in  The  Merchant  of  Venice.  Prose  is  also  used  in  letters, 
as,  for  example,  that  of  Bellario  in  The  Merchant  of  Venice,  and  for 
rhetorical  speeches,  as  in  the  case  of  the  paper  of  Artemidorus  and  the 
oration  of  Brutus  in  Julius  Ccesar.  Sometimes  also,  prose  is  used  for 
the  purpose  of  producing  a  special  dramatic  eflfect,  as  in  the  case  of 
Casca's  assumed  bluntness  of  manner  in  JuUils  Ccesar  ;  and  in  the  scene 
in  The  Merchant  of  Venice  where  Shylock  is  **  tortured"  by  Tubal ; 
and  in  the  sleep-walking  scene  in  Macbeth. 


AS   YOU   LIKE   IT 


Date  of  the  Play. 

As  You  Like  It  was  written  between  1598  and  1600.  It  is  not 
mentioned  in  the  Ust  of  Shakespeare's  plays  contained  in  the 
book  called  Palladis  Tainia  or  WlVs  Treasury,  by  Francis 
Meres,  which  was  published  in  1598 ;  and,  furthermore,  it 
contains  a  reference  (Act  III.,  Scene  V.,  11.  81-2)  to  Marlowe's 
Hero  mid  Leander,  which  was  not  published  until  1598.  On 
the  other  hand  it  was  entered  in  the  Stationers''  Registers 
in  the  year  1600.  The.  probability  is,  therefore,  that  it  was 
written  in  the  year  1599.  It  was  first  published  in  the  Folio 
of  1623. 

Sources  of  the  Plot. 

The  plot  of  As  You  Like  It  is  based  on  a  novel  entitled 
Rosalynde,  by  Thomas  Lodge,  which  was  published  in  1590. 
This  novel  was  apparently  popular,  as  several  editions  were 
published  within  a  few  years,  and  no  doubt  the  story  of 
As  You  Like  It  was  already  familiar  to  theatre-goers  in 
Shakespeare's  time.  But  Shakespeare  borrowed  nothing  from 
the  novel  except  the  main  outlines  of  the  story  ;  and  the 
portrayal  of  character,  the  humour,  and  the  poetry  of  the 
play,  are  his  own  creation.  Three  of  the  characters,  Jaques, 
Touchstone,  and  Audrey,  do  not  appear  in  the  novel  at  all. 

The  Scene  of  the  Play. 

The  scene  of  Lodge's  novel  was  laid  in  France,  and  it  is 
probable  that  when  Lodge  spoke  of  the  Forest  of  Arden  he 
had  in  mind  the  Forest  of  Ardennes  in  the  northeast  of  France. 
But  there  was  also  a  Forest  of  Arden  in  Warwickshire,  the 
home  of  Shakespeare's  boyhood,  and  the  name  must  have  been 
familiar  to  him.  But  the  Forest  of  Arden  which  Shakespeare 
had  in  mind  was  neither  of  these,  but  a  place  of  enchantment 

xi 


xii  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT 

which  existed  only  in  the  poet's  imagination.  In  this  en- 
chanted forest  the  oak  and  the  palm  tree  floiu-ished  side  by 
side.  Here  too  were  the  "hungry  lioness"  and  the  "green 
and  gilded  snake,"  and  within  the  purlieus  of  this  same  forest 
were  peaceful  flocks  and  sheep-folds  and  "careless  herds"  of 
deer.  The  forest  paths  were  haunted  by  lovers  as  diverse  in 
character  as  Audrey  and  Rosalind  or  Silvius  and  Orlando  ;  and 
here  too  came  the  old  Duke  and  "  many  merry  men  with  him," 
who  lived  in  the  forest  "like  old  Robin  Hood  of  England."  It 
is  vain  to  search  the  map  in  the  effort  to  find  such  a  forest,  for 
no  matter  by  what  name  it  is  called  it  never  did  exist  outside 
of  the  poet's  fancy. 

The  Title  of  the  Play. 

The  title  As  Ydu  Like  It  was  probably  suggested  by  a  passage 
in  the  preface  to  Lodge's  novel,  where,  after  speaking  of  his 
story,  he  says,  '^  If  you  like  it,  so  ;  and  yet  I  will  be  yours  in 
duty  if  you  be  mine  in  favour."  In  the  epilogue  to  the  play 
Rosalind  plainly  refers  to  the  title  when  she  says,  "  I  charge 
you,  O  women,  for  the  love  you  bear  to  men,  to  like  as  much 
of  the  play  as  please  you." 

The  Character  of  the  Play. 

As  You  Like  It  has  been  described  as  "the  sweetest  and 
happiest  of  Shakespeare's  comedies."  It  was  wintten  in  the 
brief  interval  between  the  completion  of  his  series  of  historical 
dramas  and  the  beginning  of  the  gi^eat  tragedies  ;  and  it  seems 
as  if  the  dramatist  had  for  the  moment  given  over  the  contem- 
plation of  the  serious  things  of  life  to  take  a  little  rest,  and 
himself  enjoy  a  holiday  in  the  Forest  of  Arden.  As  You  Like 
It  contains  no  perplexing  problems,  and  there  is  no  impending 
calamity,  as  for  instance  in  The  Merchant  of  Venice,  to  detract 
from  the  pure  enjoyment  of  the  play.  Even  the  cynical  mood 
of  the  melancholy  Jacfues  serves  only  to  set  in  relief  the  cheer- 
ful wholesome  spirit  of  the  play.  As  You  Like  It  is  an  idyll  of 
the  open  air  with  simple  pleasures  and  innocent  mirth,  and  a 
love  story,  or  rather  a  gi^oup  of  love  stories,  which  end 
happily, — and  this,  as  Shakespeare  well  knew  when  he  gave 
the  title  to  the  play,  is  as  you  like  it. 


THE    THEME   AND    STRUCTURE  Xlll 

The  Theme  of  the  Play. 

In  a  play  such  as  As  You  Like  It,  that  is  written  merely  to 
please,  the  theme  or  the  teaching  of  the  play  is  less  important 
than  the  entertainment  which  it  affords.  In  As  You  Like  It 
the  only  serious  teaching  of  the  play  is  to  be  found  in  the 
speeches  of  Duke  Senior  and  his  companions.  The  duke  has 
suffered  adversity  and  has  learned  its  lessons.  He  knows  how 
unsatisfying  is  the  life  of  the  "envious  court"  with  its 
"painted  pomp"  and  its  servile  flattery  ;  and  both  he  and  his 
companions  have  learned  by  experience  that  even  the  winter 
wind  is  "not  so  unkind  as  man's  ingratitude."  But  this  ex- 
perience, bitter  though  it  has  been,  has  served  only  to  make  his 
disposition  more  sweet  and  wholesome.  In  the  case  of  Jaques, 
on  the  other  hand,  the  effect  of  his  experience  has  been  to 
make  him  so  morbid  and  cynical  that  he  sees  no  good  in  his 
fellow  men.  To  him  all  the  world  is  merely  a  stage  and  all  the 
men  and  women  merely  players.  It  is  quite  evident  that  the 
attitude  of  Duke  Senior  rather  than  that  of  Jaques  is  Shake- 
speare's own  ideal. 


The  Structure  of  the  Play. 

In  As  You  Like  It  the  development  of  the  plot  depends  upon 
the  skilful  interweaving  of  several  different  stories  or  episodes. 
The  story  of  Duke  Senior  in  relation  to  Duke  Frederick  forms, 
as  it  were,  a  framework  for  the  play.  Into  the  framework  are 
set  the  story  of  Oliver  and  Orlando  and  the  love-story  of 
Orlando  and  Rosalind,  and  in  addition  the  three  minor  stories 
or  episodes  of  Silvius  and  Phebe,  Touchstone  and  Audrey,  and 
Oliver  and  Celia.  Of  these  stories  that  of  Orlando  and  Rosa- 
lind forms  the  main  thread  of  the  plot,  and  the  disguise  of 
Rosalind  brings  about  the  "complication"  in  the  story.  In 
the  first  two  Acts  the  foundations  of  the  plot  are  laid,  and  the 
dramatic  centre  of  the  play  is  reached  at  the  close  of  Act  III., 
Scene  II.,  at  the  point  where  Orlando  declares  his  love  and 
Rosalind  offers  to  cure  him.  The  denouement  is  brought  about 
by  Rosalind  when  she  decides  to  throw  aside  her  disguise  in 
order  that  she  may  bring  the  fortunes  of  the  lovers  to  a  happy 
ending. 


XIV  AS   YOU   LIKE    IT 

Sources  of  Interest. 

In  most  plays  of  Shakespeare  the  interest  lies  in  the  develop- 
ment of  plot  and  the  portrayal  of  character.  But  in  J.s  You 
Like  It  the  plot  is  at  no  point  of  absorbing  interest  and  there 
is  little  complexity  of  character.  One  of  the  chief  reasons  why 
the  play  interests  the  audience  is  that  the  scenes  themselves 
are  unusual  and  the  characters  appear  in  situations  that  are 
out  of  the  ordinary.  The  woodland  scenes  appeal  to  the  fancy 
of  the  audience,  and  the  rustic  types  of  character  such  as  Corin 
and  Silvius,  William  and  Audrey,  are  always  sure  to  delight 
an  audience.  And,  furthermore,  Duke  Senior,  Rosalind  and 
Celia,  Orlando,  and  Touchstone,  are  all  the  more  attractive 
because  they  appear  in  scenes  which  are  in  such  marked  con- 
trast to  the  life  of  the  court,  to  which  they  are  accustomed. 
The  jests  of  Touchstone  we  may  be  sure  would  lose  much  of 
their  flavour  if,  instead  of  Corin  and  William  and  Audrey, 
the  courtiers  of  Duke  Frederick  were  the  objects  of  his  wit. 

A  second  main  source  of  interest  is  the  humour  of  the  play, 
as  seen  not  only  in  the  speeches  of  Rosalind  and  Touchstone 
but  in  situations  which  are  in  themselves  humorous.  The 
pleadings  of  the  love-sick  Silvius,  the  love-making  of  Touch- 
stone and  Audrey,  the  discomfiture  of  the  rustic  William,  the 
mistaken  coquettishness  of  Phebe,  are  all  sources  of  merriment 
to  the  audience.  And  aside  from  the  wit  and  humour,  there 
are  serious  elements  in  the  play,  which  help  to  hold  the  interest 
of  the  audience.  The  devotion  of  Adam  to  his  young  master, 
the  cheerful  philosophy  of  the  old  Duke,  the  cynical  mood  of 
Jaques,  and  even  the  change  of  heart  of  Oliver,  and  the  con- 
version of  Duke  Frederick,  all  these  help  to  give  balance  to  the 
play  and  free  it  from  the  charge  of  being  trivial  and  frivolous. 

And  throughout  the  play  a  further  source  of  pleasure  lies  in 
the  element  of  the  unexpected.  There  is  naturally  some  feeling 
of  surprise  at  Orlando's  complete  victory  over  Charles,  at  the 
unexpected  meetings  in  the  Forest  of  Arden,  in  the  fight  with 
the  lioness  and  the  conversion  of  Oliver,  in  the  love-making  of 
Touchstone  and  Audrey,  in  the  change  of  heart  of  Duke 
Frederick,  and  even  in  the  final  resolve  of  Jaques  to  seek  out 
the  company  of  the  Duke.  It  is  a  play  that  is  full  of  pleasant 
"accidents,"  and  that  contains  no  unpleasant  surprises. 


IMPORTANT    CHARACTERS  XV 

The  Important  Characters  in  "As  You  Like  It." 

Duke  Senior  while  not  the  most  important  character  in  the 
play  is  one  of  the  most  lovable.  He  is  an  example  of  cheerful- 
ness under  adversity, — one  of  those  enviable  dispositions  whom 
misfortune  cannot  sour.  It  is  true  that  the  melancholy  Jaques 
speaks  of  the  Duke  with  a  touch  of  contempt  as  "leaving  his 
wealth  and  ease,  a  stubborn  will  to  please,"  and  that  he  finds 
him  "too  disputable."  But  it  is  not  at  all  surprising  that  a 
cynic  such  as  Jaques  should  be  ill  at  ease  in  the  company  of 
the  Duke,  who  refused  to  allow  his  cynicism  to  pass  un- 
challenged. Between  the  Duke  with  his  sane  healthful  temper 
ana  warm  sympathies,  and  the  melancholy  Jaques,  who  is 
"compact  of  jars"  and  given  to  "sullen  fits,"  there  is  very 
little  in  common. 

Jaques  has  always  been  a  favourite  character  with  the 
audience.  This  is  not  because  the  melancholy  of  Jaques  is 
in  itself  attractive,  but  because  his  cynical  mood  is,  after  all, 
a  sort  of  affectation.  As  he  himself  says,  he  "  can  suck 
melancholy  out  of  a  song  as  a  weasel  sucks  eggs."  "When  he 
sees  the  wounded  deer  he  is  not  moved  by  any  natural  pity  for 
its  sufferings,  but  he  moralizes  it  "unto  a  thousand  similes." 
He  is  del'ghted  with  Touchstone  not  wholly  because  of  his 
humour,  but  because  Touchstone  under  cover  of  his  folly  is 
able  to  "  anatomize  "  the  faults  of  others.  Even  in  the  case  of 
the  famous  speech,  "All  the  world's  a  stage,"  one  cannot  help 
feeling  that  Jaques  is  striving  for  effect  and  that  his  pessimism 
is  not  wholly  free  from  affectation.  In  any  case,  his  view  of 
life  is  morbid,  because  he  has  been  a  libertine  and  has  himself 
experienced  the  evil  rather  than  the  good  in  life.  It  is  quite 
in  keeping  with  his  "melancholy"  disposition  that  when  Duke 
Senior  is  restored  to  his  dukedom,  Jaques  should  decide  to 
seek  out  Duke  Frederick,  not  because  he  understands  or 
sympathizes  with  his  change  of  heart,  but  because  "out  of 
these  convertit«s  there  is  much  matter  to  be  heard  and 
learned." 

Orlando,  although  he  plays  the  part  of  "hero"  in  As  You 
Like  It,  is  not  the  most  interesting  character  in  the  play.  As 
a  matter  of  fact,  his  character  is  in  most  respects  colourless, 
and  throughout  the  play  he  shines  with  a  reflected  light  as 


Xvi  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT 

"the  good  Sir  Rowland's  son."  In  the  first  scene  he  complains 
of  being  neglected  by  his  brother,  who  has  denied  him  an 
education.  Yet  his  language  and  bearing  show  the  marks  of 
good  breeding,  which  we  must  suppose  to  have  been  due  to 
his  home  training  as  a  child.  He  is  evidently  a  handsome 
youth,  and  he  shows  unusual  physical  strength  in  his  contest 
with  Charles  the  wrestler.  Adam,  the  old  family  servant, 
attributes  to  him  all  the  virtues  of  his  father,  and  in  turn  he 
wins  our  sympathy  through  his  consideration  for  Adam,  and, 
later,  through  his  forgiveness  of  his  brother.  But  his  chief 
claim  to  our  sympathies  is  that  he  is  in  love  with  Rosalind  and 
she  with  him.  ' '  All  the  world  loves  a  lover,"  especially  when  he 
is  young  and  handsome  and  is  able  to  wi^ite  passable  love  verses, 
as  Orlando  does.  Naturally  Orlando  and  Jaques  have  nothing 
in  common  and  do  not  understand  each  other,  for  the  young 
lover  and  the  old  cynic  look  at  the  world  through  different  eyes. 

Touchstone  is  a  jester  by  profession, — the  court  foel  of  Duke 
Frederick.  He  is  described  in  the  play  as  ' '  the  clownish  fool " 
and  "the  roynish  clown,"  and  yet  the  term  "clown"  does  not 
apply  to  him,  at  least  not  in  the  same  sense  that  it  applies  to  a 
clown  like  Launcelot  Gobbo  in  The  Merchant  of  Venice.  As  a 
professional  fool  it  is  his  business  to  make  people  laugh,  and 
he  does  so  not  by  clownish  actions  or  mere  play  on  words, 
but  by  a  spirit  of  raillery.  He  is  keen-witted  enough  to  seize 
upon  whatever  is  ludicrous  in  a  situation  and  hold  it  up  to 
ridicule.  He  makes  fun  of  the  verses  of  Orlando,  of  the 
wooing  of  Silvius,  of  Corin  because  he  has  never  been  at  court, 
and  of  William  because  of  his  "greenness"  and  simplicity. 
But  his  crowning  piece  of  humour  is  his  wooing  of  Audrey, 
whose  very  ugliness  moves  him  to  admiration.  Even  to  the 
melancholy  Jaques  he  is  a  source  of  merriment  because  of  his 
odd  sayings,  his  "observation,  which  he  vents  in  mangled 
forms  "  ;  and  Jaques  aptly  describes  him  as  a  "  motley-minded 
gentleman." 

But  aside  from  the  habits  of  mind  and  speech  which  belong 
to  the  professional  jester.  Touchstone  has  a  claim  upon  our 
sympathies  because  of  his  good  cheer  and  his  loyalty  to  Celia 
and  Rosalind.  TSTien  Rosalind  proposes  to  Celia  that  they 
steal  the  clownish  fool  out  of  her  father's  court,  she  urges  that 
he  will  be  a  comfort   to  their  travels ;    and  if  never-failing 


IMPORTANT  CHARACTERS  XVll 

humour,  with  no  touch  of  ill-nature,   is  a  soiu?ce  of  comfort, 
then  Rosalind's  faith  in  him  was  fully  justified. 

Rosalind  is  the  most  complex  and  the  most  interesting 
character  in  the  play.  When  she  first  appears  she  is  naturally 
depressed  in  spirit  because  of  her  father's  banishment,  but  by 
sheer  force  of  will  she  determines  to  throw  off  her  sadness 
to  rejoice  in  the  happiness  of  Celia.  But  scarcely  has  she 
announced  her  determination,  when  a  new  cause  for  anxiety 
appears.  She  falls  in  love  with  Orlando.  Then  follows  her 
banishment,  which  Celia  resolves  to  share  with  her.  She  is  at 
first  dismayed  at  the  sentence  of  banishment,  but  when  the 
plan  of  disguising  themselves  is  suggested,  she  at  once  recovers 
her  gaiety.  When  once  she  assumes  her  disguise  and  reaches 
the  Forest  of  Arden  she  is  forced  to  act  a  part.  To  Corin  she 
is  a  serious  youth  who  has  purchased  ' '  the  cote  and  flock  and 
bounds  of  feed  "  of  his  former  master.  Silvius  she  treats  with 
a  certain  amount  of  contempt  not  unmixed  with  pity,  for  she 
herself  knows  what  it  is  to  be  in  love.  Phebe  is  the  type  of 
shallow  coquette,  and  Rosalind  makes  good  her  threat  to 
"sauce  her  with  bitter  words."  With  the  melancholy  of 
Jaques  she  has  no  sympathy,  and  she  does  not  spare  him  in 
her  raillery.  To  Celia,  who  knows  her  love  for  Orlando,  the 
anxiety  of  Rosalind  is  only  half-concealed  under  a  pretence 
of  gaiety.  But  it  is  Orlando  himself  who  calls  out  all  her 
resources,  both  of  wit  and  feminine  delicacy.  In  the  scene  in 
which  she  professes  to  be  able  to  cure  him  of  love  she  is  in  her 
gayest  and  yet  in  her  most  tantalizing  mood.  WTien  Orlando 
is  wounded  by  the  lioness  her  womanly  nature  asserts  itself ; 
but  even  in  the  midst  of  her  anxiety,  as  she  recovers  from  her 
swoon,  her  humour  is  irrepressible,  and  her  parting  message 
to  Oliver,  for  Orlando,  is,  "I  pray  you  commend  my  counter- 
feiting to  him."  Throughout  the  play,  indeed,  one  does  not 
know  which  to  admire  most,  her  intellectual  quickness  and 
her  gaiety  of  spirit,  or  the  tender  womanly  emotions  that  lie 
beneath  this  playful  exterior.  It  is  the  mingling  of  hopes  and 
fears,  of  mocking  laughter  and  innocent  raillery,  of  cheerful- 
ness and  scarcely  concealed  sadness, — sunshine  and  passing 
cloud,  which  makes  the  sunshine  all  the  brighter — that  gives 
its  charm  to  the  spirit  of  Rosalind  and  to  the  play  in  which 
she  is  the  centi^l  figure. 


XVUl  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT 

Celia  is  the  companion  of  Rosalind  throughout  the  play  and 
her  character  is  in  some  respects  complementary  to  that  of 
Rosalind.  She  sympathizes  with  Rosalind  in  her  misfortunes, 
and  shares  her  confidences,  and  then  in  a  spirit  of  pure  fun 
she  teases  her  unmercifully  regarding  Orlando.  She  is  more 
matter  of  fact  and  more  practical  than  Rosalind,  for  when 
difficulties  arise  it  is  she  who  suggests  what  is  to  be  done.  But 
it  is  because  of  her  quick  sympathies  that  she  has  the  greatest 
claim  to  our  affection.  Of  her  father's  discourtesy  to  Orlando 
she  says,  "My  father's  rough  and  envious  disposition  sticks 
me  at  heart."  It  is  Celia's  warmth  of  affection  that  sustains 
Rosalind  in  her  banishment.  She  has  won  the  devotion  of 
Touchstone,  for  she  says,  "He'll  go  along  o'er  the  wide  world 
with  me."  She  pities  Silvius  when  Rosalind  torments  him ; 
and  it  is  because  of  her  genuine  sympathy  for  Oliver  in  his 
repentance,  that  she  falls  in  love  with  him. 


Time  Analysis. 

It  is  impossible  to  estimate  what  time  is  occupied  by  the 
action  of  As  You  Like  It.  It  is  probable,  indeed,  that  the 
dramatist  has  left  it  purposely  vague.  Before  the  play  opens, 
the  banishment  of  Duke  Senior  has  taken  place.  It  appears  to 
have  been  recent,  for  according  to  Charles  the  wrestler,  it  is 
still  the  talk  of  the  court,  and  we  are  told  that  the  Duke  is 
' ' akeady  "  in  the  Forest  of  Arden.  But  yet  Celia  in  her  defence 
of  Rosalind  (Act  I.,  Scene  III.,  11.  72-3)  speaks  as  if  some  years 
had  passed  since  Duke  Senior's  banishment,  and  in  the  very  first 
scene  in  which  the  Duke  appears  he  speaks  of  ' '  old  custom " 
having  made  their  outdoor  life  more  sweet.  When  we  come 
to  the  events  of  the  play  itself,  in  the  very  first  scene  we  learn 
that  the  wrestling  match  is  to  take  place  on  the  following  day. 
Apparently  the  banishment  of  Rosalind  and  Celia  takes  place 
on  the  same  day  as  the  wrestling  match,  and  the  next  day 
their  flight  is  discovered.  The  impression  is  given  that  it  takes 
some  time  for  them  to  reach  the  Forest  of  Arden,  for  they  are 
utterly  wearied  on  their  arrival.  Indeed,  the  Forest  of  Arden 
is  so  far  away  that  only  rumour,  rather  than  certain  news, 
reaches  the  court  regarding  Duke  Senior  and  his  companions. 
We  may  suppose  therefore  that,  at  the  very  least,  several  days 


TIME  ANALYSIS  XIX 

have  elapsed  between  the  end  of  Act  I.  and  the  arriv^al  of 
Orlando  in  the  Forest  at  the  close  of  Act  II.  In  the  beginning 
of  Act  III.  Oliver  is  banished  from  Duke  Frederick's  court, 
and  in  the  following  Act  he  is  described  as  "  a  wretched  ragged 
man  o'ergrown  with  hair "  ;  and,  furthermore,  the  account 
which  Jaques  de  Boys  gives  of  Duke  Frederick's  actions  implies 
the  passage  of  a  fairly  long  period  of  time.  Towards  the  close 
of  the  play  reference  is  made  to  a  definite  time,  for  we  are  told 
that  Oliver  and  Celia  have  fallen  in  love  at  first  sight  and  are 
to  be  married  "  to-morrow."  But,  after  all,  Shakespeare  never 
intended  his  audience  to  ask  questions  as  to  how  the  days 
were  passing  in  the  Forest  of  Arden.  It  is  enough  for  us  to 
know  that  in  this  enchanted  forest  the  Duke  and  his  followers 
were  wont  to  "fleet  the  time  carelessly  as  they  did  in  the 
golden  world  "  ;  and  as  for  the  lovers,  there  is  no  need  to  care 
whether  time  ambles,  or. trots,  or  gallops  with  them. 


DRAMATIS    PERSOX^ 


DuELE,  living  in  banishment. 

Frederick,  his  brother,  and  usuiper  of  his  dominions. 

ASHEXS,  ] 

_  -  lords  attending  on  the  banished  duke. 

Jaques,  j 

Le  Beau,  a  courtier  attending  upon  Frederick. 

Charles,  wrestler  to  Frederick. 

Oliver,  i-  '\ 

Jaques,     y  sons  of  Sir  Rowland  de  Boys. 

Orlando,*; 

Adam,    ") 

^  V  servants  to  Oliver. 

Dennis,  J 

Touchstone,  a  clown. 

Sir  Oliver  Martext,  a  vicar. 

shepherds. 


iiN,    I 
viusj 


Silv 

William,  a  country  fellow,  in  love  with  Audrey. 
A  person  representing  Hymen. 
Rosalind,  daughter  to  the  banished  duke. 
Celia,  daughter  to  Frederick. 
Phebe,  a  shepherdess. 
Audrey,  a  country  wench. 

Lords,  pages,  and  attendants,  etc. 

Scene  : — Oliver  s  hou^e  ;   Duke  Frederick's  court;   and  the 
Forest  of  Arden. 


AS    YOU    LIKE    IT 


ACT  I 

Scene.  I.      Orchard  of  Oliver^s  House. 
Enter  Orlando  and  Adaji. 

Orl.  As  I  remember,  Adam,  it  was  upon  this  fashion 
bequeathed  me  by  will  but  poor  a  thousand  crowns,  and, 
as  thou  sayest,  charged  my  brother,  on  his  blessing,  to 
breed  me  well :  and  there  begins  my  sadness.  My  brother 
Jaques  he  keeps  at  school,  and  report  speaks  goldenly  of 
his  profit :  for  my  part,  he  keeps  me  rustically  at  home, 
or,  to  speak  more  properly,  stays  me  here  at  home  unkept ; 
for  call  you  that  keeping  for  a  gentleman  of  my  birth, 
that  differs  not  from  the  stalling  of  an  ox  ?  His  horses 
are  bred  better ;  for,  besides  that  they  are  fair  with  their 
feeding,  they  are  taught  their  manage,  and  to  that  end 
riders  dearly  hired:  but  I,  his  brother,  gain  nothing 
under  him  but  growth ;  for  the  which  his  animals  on  his 
dunghills  are  as  much  bound  to  him  as  I.  Besides  this 
nothing  that  he  so  plentifully  gives  me,  the  something 
that  nature  gave  me  his  countenance  seems  to  take  from 
me :  he  lets  me  feed  with  his  hinds,  bars  me  the  place  of 
a  brother,  and,  as  much  as  in  him,  lies,  mines  my  gentility 
with  my  education.  This  is  it,  Adam,  that  grieves  me ; 
and  the  spirit  of  my  father,  which  I  think  is  within  me, 
begins  to  mutiny  against  this  servitude  :  I  will  no  longer 
endure  it,  though  yet  I  know  no  wise  remedy  how  to 
avoid  it.  23 


2  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT   I 

Adam.     Yonder  comes  my  master,  your  brother. 
Orl.     Go  apart,  Adam,  and  tliou  shalt  hear  how  he 
will  shake  me  up. 

Enter  Oliver. 

OIL     Now,  sir !  what  make  you  here  ? 

Orl.     Nothing  :  I  am  not  taught  to  make  any  thing. 

Oli.     What  mar  you  then,  sir  ? 

Orl.  Marry,  sir,  I  am  helping  you  to  mar  that  which 
God  made,  a,  poor  unworthy  brother  of  yours,  with 
idleness.  32 

Oli.  Marry,  sir,  be  better  employed,  and  be  naught 
awhile. 

Orl.  Shall  I  keep  your  hogs  and  eat  husks  with 
them  ?  What  prodigal  portion  have  I  spent,  that  I 
should  come  to  such  penury  ? 

Oli.     Know  3^ou  where  you  are,  sir  ? 

Orl.     O,  sir,  very  well :  here  in  your  orchard. 

Oli.     Know  you  before  whom,  sir  ?  40 

Orl.  Ay,  better  than  him  I  am  before  knows  me.  I 
know  you  are  my  eldest  brother ;  and,  in  the  gentle 
condition  of  blood,  you  should  so  know  me.  The  courtesy 
of  nations  allows  you  my  better,  in  that  you  are  the 
first-born ;  but  the  same  tradition  takes  not  away  my 
blood,  were  there  twenty  brothers  betwixt  us :  I  have 
as  much  of  my  father  in  me  as  you;  albeit,  I  confess, 
your  coming  before  me  is  nearer  to  his  reverence. 

OIL     What,  boy  ! 

Oi'l.  Come,  come,  elder  brother,  you  are  too  young 
in  this.  51 

OIL     Wilt  thou  lay  hands  on  me,  villain  ? 

Orl.  I  am  no  villain;  I  am  the  youngest  son  of  Sir 
Rowland  de  Boys;  he  was  my  father,  and  lie  is  thrice  a 


SCENE   l]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  3 

villain  that  ssiys  such  a  father  begot  villains.  Wert  thou 
not  my  brother,  I  would  not  take  this  hand  from  tliy 
throat  till  this  other  had  pulled  out  thy  tongue  for  saying 
so  :  thou  hast  railed  on  thyself. 

Adam.  Sweet  masters,  be  patient :  for  your  father's 
remembrance,  be  at  accord.  60 

OIL     Let  me  go,  I  say. 

Orl.  I  will  not,  till  I  please :  you  shall  hear  me.  My 
father  charged  you  in  his  will  to  give  me  good  education : 
you  have  trained  me  like  a  peasant,  obscuring  and  hiding 
from  me  all  gentleman-like  qualities.  The  spirit  of  my 
father  grows  strong  in  me,  and  I  will  no  longer  endure 
it:  therefore  allow  me  such  exercises  as  may  become  a 
gentleman,  or  give  me  the  poor  allottery  my  father  left 
me  by  testament ;  and  with  that  I  will  go  buy  my 
fortunes.  70 

Oli.  And  what  wilt  thou  do  ?  beg,  when  that  is 
spent  ?  Well  sir,  get  jon  in  :  I  will  not  long  be  troubled 
with  you  ;  you  shall  have  some  part  of  your  will :  I  pray 
you,  leave  me. 

Orl.  I  will  no  further  offend  you  than  becomes  me 
for  my  good. 

Oli.     Get  you  with  him,  you  old  dog. 

Adam.  Is  '  old  dog '  my  reward  ?  Most  true,  I  have 
lost  my  teeth  in  your  service.  God  be  with  my  old 
master!   he  would  not  have  spoke  such  a  word.  so 

[Exeunt  Orlando  and  Adam. 

Oli.  Is  it  even  so  ?  begin  you  to  grow  upon  me  ?  I 
will  physic  your  rankness,  and  yet  give  no  thousand 
crowns  neither.     Holla,  Dennis  ! 


4i  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  I 

Enter  Dennis. 

Den.     Calls  your  worship  ? 

OH.  Was  not  Charles,  the  duke's  wrestler,  here  to 
speak  with  me  ? 

Den.  So  please  you,  he  is  here  at  the  door  and 
importunes  access  to  you. 

OH.  Call  him  in.  [Exit  Deruiis.]  'Twill  be  a  good  way ; 
and  to-morrow  the  wrestling  is.  90 

Enter  Charles. 

Cha.     Good  morrow  to  your  worship. 

OH.  Good  Monsieur  Charles,  what's  the  new  news  at 
the  new  court  ? 

CJia.  There's  no  news  at  the  court,  sir,  but  the  old 
news :  that  is,  the  old  duke  is  banished  by  his  younger 
brother  the  new  duke;  and  three  or  four  loving  lords 
have  put  themselves  into  voluntary  exile  with  him, 
whose  lands  and  revenues  enrich  the  new  duke ;  there- 
fore he  gives  them  good  leave  to  wander. 

OH.  Can  you  tell  if  Rosalind,  the  duke's  daughter,  be 
banished  with  her  father  ?  101 

Cha.  O,  no ;  for  the  duke's  daughter,  her  cousin,  so 
loves  her,  being  ever  from  their  cradles  bred  together, 
that  she  would  have  followed  her  exile,  or  have  died  to 
stay  behind  her.  She  is  at  the  court,  and  no  less  beloved 
of  her  uncle  than  his  own  daughter;  and  never  two 
ladies  loved  as  they  do. 

OH.     Where  will  the  old  duke  live  ? 

Cha.  They  say  he  is  already  in  the  forest  of  Arden, 
and  a  many  merry  men  with  him ;  and  there  they  live 
like  the  old  Robin  Hood  of  England:  they  say  many 
young  gentlemen  flock  to  him  every  day,  and  fleet  the 
time  carelessly,  as  they  did  in  the  golden  world.  113 


SCENE   I]  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  5 

Oil.  What,  you  wrestle  to-morrow  before  the  new 
duke? 

Cha.  Marry,  do  I,  sir;  and  I  came  to  acquaint  you 
with  a  matter.  I  am  given,  sir,  secretly  to  understand 
that  your  younger  brother  Orlando  hath  a  disposition  to 
come  in  disguised  against  me  to  try  a  fall.  To-morrow, 
sir,  I  wrestle  for  my  credit;  and  he  that  escapes  me 
without  some  broken  limb  shall  acquit  him  well.  Your 
brother  is  but  young  and  tender ;  and,  for  your  love,  I 
would  be  loath  to  foil  him,  as  I  must,  for  my  own 
honour,  if  he  come  in :  therefore,  out  of  my  love  to  you, 
I  came  hither  to  acquaint  you  withal,  that  either  you 
might  stay  him  from  his  intendment  or  brook  such 
discrrace  well  as  he  shall  run  into,  in  that  it  is  a  thinor  of 
his  own  search  and  altogether  against  my  will.  i28 

Oil.  Charles,  I  thank  thee  for  thy  love  to  me,  which 
thou  shalt  find  I  will  most  kindly  requite.  I  had  myself 
notice  of  my  brother's  purpose  herein  and  have  by 
underhand  means  laboured  to  dissuade  him  from  it,  but 
he  is  resolute.  I'll  tell  thee,  Charles :  it  is  the  stubbornest 
young  fellow  of  France,  full  of  ambition,  an  envious 
emulator  of  every  man's  good  parts,  a  secret  and  villainous 
contriver  afrainst  me  his  natural  brother :  therefore  use 
thy  discretion ;  I  had  as  lief  thou  didst  break  his  neck 
as  his  finger.  And  thou  wert  best  look  to 't ;  for  if  thou 
dost  him  any  slight  disgrace,  or  if  he  do  not  mightily 
grace  himself  on  thee,  he  will  practise  against  thee  by 
poison,  entrap  thee  by  some  treacherous  device  and  never 
leave  thee  till  he  hath  ta'en  thy  life  by  some  Indirect 
means  or  other ;  for,  I  assure  thee,  and  almost  with  tears 
I  speak  it,  there  is  not  one  so  young  and  so  villainous  this 
day  living.     I  speak  but  brotherly  of  him ;  but  should  I 


6  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  I 

anatomize  him  to  thee  as  he  is,  I  must  blush  and  weep, 
and  thou  must  look  pale  and  wonder.  147 

Cha.  I  am  heartily  glad  I  came  hither  to  you.  If  he 
come  to-morrow,  I'll  give  him  his  payment :  if  ever  he  go 
alone  again,  I'll  never  wrestle  for  prize  more :  and,  so, 
God  keep  your  worship  ! 

Oli.  Farewell,  good  Charles.  [Exit  Charles.]  Now  will 
I  stir  this  gamester :  I  hope  I  shall  see  an  end  of  him ; 
for  my  soul,  yet  I  know  not  why,  hates  nothing  more 
than  he.  Yet  he 's  gentle,  never  schooled  and  yet  learned, 
full  of  noble  device,  of  all  sorts  enchantingly  beloved, 
and  indeed  so  much  in  the  heart  of  the  world,  and 
especially  of  my  own  people,  who  best  know  him,  that  I 
am  altogether  misprised ;  but  it  shall  not  be  so  long ;  this 
wrestler  shall  clear  all :  nothing  remains  but  that  I  kindle 
the  boy  thither ;  which  now  I'll  go  about.  [Exit.      161 

Scene  II.      Lawn  hefore  the  Duhe^s  palace. 
Enter  Celt  a  and  Rosalind. 

Cel.     1  pray  thee,  Rosalind,  sweet  my  coz,  be  merry. 

Ros.  Dear  Celia,  I  show  more  mirth  than  I  am 
mistress  of ;  and  would  you  yet  I  were  merrier  ?  Unless 
you  could  teach  me  to  forget  a  banished  father,  you 
must  not  learn  me  how  to  remember  any  extraordinary 
pleasure. 

Cel.  Herein  I  see  thou  lovest  me  not  with  the  full 
weight  that  I  love  thee.  If  my  uncle,  thy  banished 
father,  had  banished  thy  uncle,  the  duke  my  father,  so 
thou  hadst  been  still  with  me,  I  could  have  taught  my 
love  to  take  thy  father  for  mine :  so  wouldst  thou,  if  the 
truth  of  thy  love  to  me  were  so  righteously  tempered  as 
mine  is  to  thee.  13 


SCENE  II]  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  7 

Ros.  Well,  I  will  forget  the  condition  of  my  estate, 
to  rejoice  in  yours. 

Cel.  You  know  my  father  hath  no  child  but  I,  nor 
none  is  like  to  have :  and,  truly,  when  he  dies,  thou  shalt 
be  his  heir,  for  what  he  hath  taken  away  from  thy  father 
perforce,  I  will  render  thee  again  in  affection ;  by  mine 
honour,  I  will ;  and  when  I  break  that  oath,  let  me  turn 
monster:  therefore,  my  sweet  Rose,  my  dear  Rose,  be 
merry.  22 

Ros.  From  hence  worth  I  will,  coz,  and  devise  sports. 
Let  me  see ;  what  think  you  of  falling  in  love  ? 

Cel.  Marry,  I  prithee,  do,  to  make  sport  withal :  but 
love  no  man  in  good  earnest;  nor  no  further  in  sport 
neither  than  with  safety  of  a  pure  blush  thou  mayst  in 
honour  come  off  again. 

Ros.     What  shall  be  our  sport,  then  ? 

Cel.  Let  us  sit  and  mock  the  good  housewife  Fortune 
from  her  wheel,  that  her  gifts  may  henceforth  be 
bestowed  equally.  32 

Ros.  I  would  we  could  do  so,  for  her  benefits  are 
mightily  misplaced,  and  the  bountiful  blind  woman  doth 
most  mistake  in  her  gifts  to  women. 

Cel.  'Tis  true;  for  those  that  she  makes  fair  she 
scarce  makes  honest,  and  those  that  she  makes  honest 
she  makes  very  ill-favouredly. 

Ros.  Nay,  now  thou  goest  from  Fortune's  office  to 
Nature's:  Fortune  reigns  in  gifts  of  the  world,  not  in 
the  lineaments  of  Nature.  41 

Enter  Touchstone. 
Cel.     No  ?    when  Nature  hath  made  a  fair  creature, 
may  she  not  by  Fortune  fall  into  the  fire  ?     Though 
Nature  hath  given  us  wit  to  flout  at  Fortune,  hath  not 
Fortune  sent  in  this  fool  to  cut  oflf  the  argument  ? 


8  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  I 

Ros.  Indeed,  there  is  Fortune  too  hard  for  Nature, 
when  Fortune  makes  Nature's  natural  the  cutter-ofF  of 
Nature's  wit. 

Cel.  Peradventure  this  is  not  Fortune's  work  neither, 
but  Nature's ;  who  perceiveth  our  natural  wits  too  dull 
to  reason  of  such  goddesses  and  hath  sent  this  natural 
for  our  whetstone ;  for  always  the  dulness  of  the  fool  is 
the  whetstone  of  the  wits.  How  now,  wit!  whither 
wander  you  ?  54 

Touch.     Mistress,  you  must  come  away  to  your  father. 

Cel.     Were  you  made  the  messenger  ? 

Touch.  No,  by  mine  honour,  but  I  was  bid  to  come 
for  you. 

Ros.     Where  learned  you  that  oath  fool  ? 

Touch.  Of  a  certain  knight  that  swore  by  his  honour 
they  were  good  pancakes,  and  swore  by  his  honour  the 
mustard  was  naught :  now  I'll  stand  to  it,  the  pancakes 
were  naught  and  the  mustard  was  good,  and  yet  was  not 
the  knight  forsworn.  64 

Cel.  How  prove  you  that,  in  the  great  heap  of  your 
knowledge  ? 

Ros.     Ay,  marry,  now  unmuzzle  your  wisdom. 

Touch.  Stand  you  both  forth  now  :  stroke  your  chins, 
and  swear  by  your  beards  that  I  am  a  knave. 

Cel.     By  our  beards,  if  we  had  them,  thou  art.  70 

Touch.  By  my  knavery,  if  I  had  it,  then  I  were ;  but 
if  you  swear  by  that  that  is  not,  you  are  not  forsworn  : 
no  more  was  this  knight,  swearing  by  his  honour,  for  he 
never  had  any;  or  if  he  had,  he  had  sworn  it  away 
before  ever  he  saw  those  pancakes  or  that  mustard. 

Cel.     Prithee,  who  is 't  that  thou  meanest  ? 

Touch.    One  that  old  Frederick,  your  father,  loves. 


SCENE   II]  AS  YOU   LIKE  IT  9 

Cel.  My  father's  love  is  enough  to  honour  him : 
enough !  speak  no  more  of  him ;  youll  be  whipped  for 
taxation  one  of  these  days.  80 

Touch.  The  more  pity,  that  fools  may  not  speak 
wisely  what  wise  men  do  foolishly. 

Cel.  By  my  troth,  thou  sa^-est  true ;  for  since  the 
little  wit  that  fools  have  was  silenced,  the  little  foolery 
that  wise  men  have  makes  a  great  show.  Here  comes 
Monsieur  Le  Beau. 

Ros.     With  his  mouth  full  of  news. 

Cel.  Which  he  will  put  on  us,  as  pigeons  feed  their 
young. 

Ros.     Then  shall  we  be  news-crammed.  90 

Cel     All  the  better ;  we  shall  be  the  more  marketable. 

Enter  Le  Beau. 

Bon  jour,  Monsieur  Le  Beau  :  what's  the  news  ? 

Le  Beau.  Fair  princess,  you  have  lost  much  good 
sport. 

Cel.     Sport !  of  what  colour  ? 

Le  Beau.  What  colour,  madam  !  how  shall  I  answer 
you? 

Ros.     As  wit  and  fortune  will. 

Touch.     Or  as  the  destinies  decree. 

Cel.     Well  said :  that  was  laid  on  with  a  trowel.        loo 

Touch.     Xay,  if  I  keep  not  my  rank, — 

Ros.     Thou  losest  thy  old  smell. 

Le  Beau.  You  amaze  me,  ladies:  I  would  have  told 
you  of  good  wrestling,  which  you  have  lost  the  sight  of. 

Ros.     Yet  tell  us  the  manner  of  the  wrestling. 

Le  Beau.  I  will  tell  you  the  beginning;  and,  if  it 
please  your  ladyships,  you  may  see  the  end ;  for  the  best 


10  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT    I 

is  yet  to  do ;  and  here,  where  you  are,  they  are  coming 
to  perform  it. 

Cel.     Well,  the  beginning,  that  is  dead  and  buried,    no 

Le  Beau.  There  comes  an  old  man  and  his  three 
sons, — 

Gel.     I  could  match  this  beginning  with  an  old  tale. 

Le  Beau.  Three  proper  young  men,  of  excellent 
growth  and  presence. 

Ros.  With  bills  on  their  necks,  'Be  it  known  unto  all 
men  by  these  presents.' 

Le  Beau.  The  eldest  of  the  three  wrestled  with 
Charles,  the  duke's  wrestler ;  which  Charles  in  a  moment 
threw  him  and  broke  three  of  his  ribs,  that  there  is  little 
hope  of  life  in  him :  so  he  served  the  second,  and  so  the 
third.  Yonder  they  lie ;  the  poor  old  man,  their  father, 
m.aking  such  pitiful  dole  over  them  that  all  the  beholders 
take  his  part  with  weeping.  124 

Ros.    Alas ! 

Touch.  But  what  is  the  sport,  monsieur,  that  the 
ladies  have  lost? 

Le  Beau.     Why,  this  that  I  speak  of. 

Touch.  Thus  men  may  grow  wiser  every  day:  it  is 
the  first  time  that  ever  I  heard  breaking  of  ribs  was 
sport  for  ladies.  131 

Cel.     Or  I,  I  promise  thee. 

Ros.  But  is  there  any  else  longs  to  see  this  broken 
music  in  his  sides  ?  is  there  yet  another  dotes  upon 
rib-breakincr  ?     Shall  we  see  this  wrestlinor    cousin  ? 

Le  Beau.  You  must,  if  you  stay  here  ;  for  here  is  the 
place  appointed  for  the  wrestling,  and  they  are  ready  to 
perform  it. 

Cel.  Yonder,  sure,  they  are  coming :  let  us  now  stay 
and  see  it.  140 


SCENE   II]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  11 

Flourish.     Enter  Dukk  Frederick,  Lords,   ORLAJiDO,   Charles, 

and  Attendants. 

Buke  F.  Come  on:  since  the  youth  will  not  be 
entreated,  his  own  peril  on  his  forwardness. 

Ros,     Is  yonder  the  man  ? 

Le  Beau.     Even  he,  madam. 

Cel.     Alas,  he  is  too  young  !  yet  he  looks  successfully. 

Buhe  F.  How  now,  daughter  and  cousin !  are  you 
crept  hither  to  see  the  wrestling  ? 

Ros.     Ay,  my  liege,  so  please  you  give  us  leave. 

Bwke  F.  You  will  take  little  delicrht  in  it,  I  can  tell 
you;  there  is  such  odds  in  the  men.  In  pity  of  the 
challenger's  youth  I  would  fain  dissuade  him,  but  he 
will  not  be  entreated.  Speak  to  him,  ladies ;  see  if  you 
can  move  him.  152 

Cel.     Call  him  hither,  good  Monsieur  Le  Beau. 

Bake  F.     Do  so :  I'll  not  be  by. 

Le  Beau.  Monsieur  the  challenger,  the  princess  calls 
for  you. 

Orl.     I  attend  them  with  all  respect  and  duty. 

Ros.  Young  man,  have  you  challenged  Charles  the 
wrestler  ?  159 

Orl.  No,  fair  princess ;  he  is  the  general  challenger : 
I  come  but  in,  as  others  do,  to  try  with  him  the  strength 
of  my  youth. 

Cel.  Young  gentleman,  your  spirits  are  too  bold  for 
your  years.  You  have  seen  cruel  proof  of  this  man's 
strength :  if  you  saw  yourself  with  your  eyes  or  knew 
yourself  with  your  judgment,  the  fear  of  your  adven- 
ture would  counsel  you  to  a  more  equal  enterprise.  We 
pray  you,  for  your  own  sake,  to  embrace  your  own  safety 
and  give  over  this  attempt.  169 


12  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT  I 

Ros.  Do,  young  sir ;  your  reputation  shall  not  there- 
fore be  misprised :  we  will  make  it  our  suit  to  the  duke 
that  the  wrestling  might  not  go  forward. 

Orl.  I  beseech  you,  punish  me  not  with  your  hard 
thoughts ;  wherein  I  confess  me  much  guilty,  to  deny  so 
fair  and  excellent  ladies  any  thing.  But  let  your  fair 
eyes  and  gentle  wishes  go  with  me  to  my  trial :  wherein 
if  I  be  foiled,  there  is  but  one  shamed  that  was  never 
gracious ;  if  killed,  but  one  dead  that  is  willing  to  be  so  : 
I  shall  do  my  friends  no  wrong,  for  I  have  none  to 
lament  me,  the  world  no  injury,  for  in  it  I  have  nothing ; 
only  in  the  world  I  fill  up  a  place,  which  may  be  better 
supplied  when  I  have  made  it  empty.  182 

Ros.  The  little  strength  that  I  have,  I  would  it  were 
with  you. 

Cel.     And  mine,  to  eke  out  hers. 

Ros.  Fare  you  well :  pray  heaven  I  be  deceived  in 
you! 

Cel.     Your  heart's  desires  be  with  you  ! 

Cha.  Come,  where  is  this  young  gallant  that  is  so 
desirous  to  lie  with  his  mother  earth  ?  190 

Orl.  Ready,  sir ;  but  his  will  hath  in  it  a  more  modest 
working. 

Duke  F.     You  shall  try  but  one  fall. 

Cha.  No,  I  warrant  your  grace,  you  shall  not  entreat 
him  to  a  second,  that  have  so  mightily  persuaded  him 
from  a  first. 

Orl.  You  mean  to  mock  me  after;  you  should  not 
have  mocked  me  before :  but  come  your  ways. 

Ros.     Now  Hercules  be  thy  speed,  young  man !         199 

Cel.  I  would  I  were  invisible,  to  catch  the  strong 
fellow  by  the  leg.  [They  wrestle. 


SCENE  II]  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  13 

Ros.     O  excellent  young  man ! 

Cel.     If  I  had  a  thunderbolt  in  mine  eye,  I  can  tell 

who  should  down.  [Shout.     Charles  is  throvm. 

Duke  F.     No  more,  no  more. 

Orl.     Yes,  I  beseech  your  grace :    I  am  not  yet  well 
breathed. 

Duke  F.     How  dost  thou,  Charles  ? 

Le  Beau.     He  cannot  speak,  my  lord. 

Duke  F.     Bear  him  away.     What  is  thy  name,  young 
man  ?  210 

Orl.     Orlando,  my   liege;    the   youngest  son   of   Sir 
Rowland  de  Boys. 

Duke  F.     I  would  thou  hadst  been  son  to  some  man 
else: 
The  world  esteem'd  thy  father  honourable, 
But  I  did  find  him  still  mine  enemy : 
Thou  shouldst  have  better  pleased  me  with  this  deed, 
Hadst  thou  descended  from  another  house. 
But  fare  thee  well ;  thou  art  a  gallant  youth : 
I  would  thou  hadst  told  me  of  another  father.  220 

[Exeunt  Duke  Frederick,  train,  and  Le  Beau. 

Cel.     Were  I  my  father,  coz,  would  I  do  this  ? 

Orl.     I  am  more  proud  to  be  Sir  Rowland's  son, 
His  youngest  son ;  and  would  not  change  that  calling, 
To  be  adopted  heir  to  Frederick. 

Ros.     My  father  loved  Sir  Rowland  as  his  soul, 
And  all  the  world  was  of  my  father's  mind : 
Had  I  before  known  this  young  man  his  son, 
I  should  have  given  him  tears  unto  entreaties, 
Ere  he  should  thus  have  ventured. 

Cel.  Gentle  cousin. 

Let  us  go  thank  him  and  encourage  him  :  230 


14  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   I 

My  father's  rough  and  envious  disposition 
Sticks  me  at  heart.     Sir,  you  have  well  deserved  : 
If  you  do  keep  your  promises  in  love 
But  justly,  as  you  have  exceeded  all  promise, 
Your  mistress  shall  be  happy. 

Itos.  Gentleman, 

[Giving  him  a  chain  from  her  neck. 

Wear  this  for  me,  one  out  of  suits  with  fortune, 
That  could  give  more,  but  that  her  hand  lacks  means. 
Shall  we  go,  coz  ? 

Cel.  Ay.     Fare  you  well,  fair  gentleman. 

Orl.     Can  I  not  say,  I  thank  you  ?    My  better  parts 
Are  all  thrown  down,  and  that  which  here  stands  up  240 
Is  but  a  quintain,  a  mere  lifeless  block. 

Ros.     He  calls  us  back :  my  pride  fell  with  my  for- 
tunes ; 
I'll  ask  him  what  he  would.     Did  you  call,  sir  ? 
Sir,  you  have  wrestled  well  and  overthrown 
More  than  your  enemies. 

Cel.  Will  you  go,  coz  ? 

Ros.     Have  with  you.     Fare  you  well. 

[Exeunt  Rosalind  and  Celia. 

Orl.     What  passion  hangs   these   weights   upon   my 
tongue  ? 
I  cannot  speak  to  her,  yet  she  urged  conference.  250 

O  poor  Orlando,  thou  art  overthrown  ! 
Or  Charles  or  something  weaker  masters  thee. 

He-enter  Le  Beau. 

Le  Beau.     Good  sir,  I  do  in  friendship  counsel  you 
To  leave  this  place.     Albeit  you  have  deserved 
High  commendation,  true  applause  and  love, 


SCENE   II]  AS   YOU  LIKE  IT  15 

Yet  such  is  now  the  duke's  condition 
That  he  misconstrues  all  that  you  have  done. 
The  duke  is  humorous :  what  he  is  indeed, 
More  suits  you  to  conceive  than  I  to  speak  of. 

Orl.     I  thank  you,  sir :  and,  pray  you,  tell  me  this ; 
Which  of  the  two  was  daughter  of  the  duke  261 

That  here  was  at  the  wrestlincr  ? 

Le   Beau.      Neither   his   daughter,   if    we    judge    by 
manners ; 

But  yet  indeed  the  lesser  is  his  daughter : 
The  other  is  daughter  to  the  banish'd  duke, 
And  here  detain'd  by  her  usurping  uncle. 
To  keep  his  daughter  company ;  whose  loves 
Are  dearer  than  the  natural  bond  of  sisters. 
But  I  can  tell  you  that  of  late  this  duke  270 

Hath  ta'en  displeasure  'gainst  his  gentle  niece. 
Grounded  upon  no  other  argument 
But  that  the  people  praise  her  for  her  virtues 
And  pity  her  for  her  good  father's  sake ; 
And,  on  my  life,  his  malice  'gainst  the  lady 
Will  suddenly  break  forth.     Sir,  fare  you  well : 
Hereafter,  in  a  better  world  than  this, 
I  shall  desire  more  love  and  knowledge  of  3'ou. 

Orl.     I  rest  much  bounden  to  you  :  fare  you  well. 

[Exit  Le  Beau. 

Thus  must  I  from  the  smoke  into  the  smother ;  280 

From  tyrant  duke  unto  a  tyrant  brother : 
But  heavenly  Rosalind ! 

[Exit. 


16  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT   I 

Scene  III.     A  room  in  the  loalace. 
Enter  Celia  and  RosALiyD. 

Cel.  Wliy,  cousin  !  why,  Rosalind  !  Cupid  have  mercy  1 
not  a  word  ? 

Ros.     Not  one  to  throw  at  a  dog. 

Cel.  No,  thy  words  are  too  precious  to  be  cast  away 
upon  curs ;  throw  some  of  them  at  me ;  come,  lame  me 
with  reasons. 

Hos.  Then  there  were  two  cousins  laid  up  ;  when  the 
one  should  be  lamed  with 'reasons  and  the  other  mad 
without  any. 

Cel.     But  is  all  this  for  your  father  ?  10 

Hos.  No,  some  of  it  is  for  my  father's  child.  0,  how 
full  of  briers  is  this  working-day  world  ! 

Cel.  They  are  but  burs,  cousin,  thrown  upon  thee  in 
holiday  foolery:  if  we  walk  not  in  the  trodden  paths, 
our  very  petticoats  will  catch  them. 

Ros.  I  could  shake  them  off  my  coat :  these  burs  are 
in  my  heart. 

Cel.     Hem  them  away. 

Ros.     I  would  try,  if  I  could  cry  hem  and  have  him. 

Cel.     Come,  come,  wrestle  with  thy  affections.  20 

Ros.  O,  they  take  the  part  of  a  better  wrestler  than 
myself ! 

Cel.  0,  a  good  wish  upon  you  !  you  will  try  in  time 
in  despite  of  a  fall.  But,  turning  these  jests  out  of  ser- 
vice, let  us  talk  in  good  earnest :  is  it  possible,  on  such  a 
sudden,  you  should  fall  into  so  strong  a  liking  with  old 
Sir  Rowland's  youngest  son  ? 

Ros.     The  duke  my  father  loved  his  father  dearly. 

Cel.  Doth  it  therefore  ensue  that  you  should  love  his 
son  dearly  ?   By  this  kind  of  chase,  I  should  hate  him^ 


SCENE   III]  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  17 

for  iny  father  hated  his  father  dearly :  yet  I  hate  not 
Orlando.  32 

Ros.     No,  faith,  hate  him  not,  for  my  sake. 

Cel.     Why  should  I  not  ?  doth  he  not  deserve  well  ? 

Ros.  Let  me  love  him  for  that,  and  do  you  love  him 
because  I  do.     Look,  here  comes  the  duke. 

Cel.     With  his  eyes  full  of  anger. 

Enter  Duke  Feedkrick,  loith  Lords. 

Duke  F.  Mistress,  despatch  you  with  your  safest  haste 
And  get  you  from  our  court. 

Ros.  Me,  uncle  ? 

Duke  F.  You,  cousin :      40 

Within  these  ten  days  if  that  thou  be'st  found 
So  near  our  public  court  as  twenty  miles. 
Thou  diest  for  it. 

Ros.  I  do  beseech  your  grace, 

Let  me  the  knowledge  of  my  fault  bear  with  me : 
If  with  myself  I  hold  intelligence 
Or  have  acquaintance  with  mine  own  desires. 
If  that  I  do  not  dream  or  be  not  frantic, — 
As  I  do  trust  I  am  not — then,  dear  uncle. 
Never  so  much  as  in  a  thought  unborn 
Did  I  offend  your  highness. 

Duke  F.  Thus  do  all  traitors :  50 

If  their  purgation  did  consist  in  words. 
They  are  as  innocent  as  grace  itself : 
Let  it  suffice  thee  that  I  trust  thee  not. 

Ros.     Yet  your  mistrust  cannot  make  me  a  traitor : 
Tell  me  whereon  the  likelihood  depends. 

Duke  F.     Thou  art  thy   father's  daughter;    there's 
enough. 


18  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  I 

Ros.      So    was    I    when    your    highness    took     his 
dukedom  ; 
So  was  I  when  your  highness  banish'd  him  :  60 

Treason  is  not  inherited,  my  lord ; 
Or,  if  we  did  derive  it  from  our  friends, 
What's  that  to  me  ?  my  father  was  no  traitor : 
Then,  good  my  liege,  mistake  me  not  so  much 
To  think  my  poverty  is  treacherous. 

Cel.     Dear  sovereign,  hear  me  speak. 

Duke  F.     Ay,  Celia ;  we  stay'd  her  for  your  sake, 
Else  had  she  with  her  father  ranged  along. 

Cel.     I  did  not  then  entreat  to  have  her  stay  ; 
It  was  your  pleasure  and  your  own  remorse  :  70 

I  was  too  young  that  time  to  value  her ; 
But  now  I  know  her :  if  she  be  a  traitor. 
Why  so  am  I ;  we  still  have  slept  together. 
Rose  at  an  instant,  learn 'd,  play'd,  eat  together, 
And  whereso'er  we  went,  like  Juno's  swans, 
Still  we  went  coupled  and  inseparable. 

Bvbke    F.      She    is    too    subtle    for    thee;     and    her 
smoothness, 
Her  very  silence  and  her  patience  '   ■ 

Speak  to  the  people,  and  they  pity  her.  80 

Thou  art  a  fool :  she  robs  thee  of  thy  name  ; 
And  thou  wilt  show  more  bright  and  seem  more  virtuous 
When  she  is  gone.     Then  open  not  thy  lips : 
Firm  and  irrevocable  is  my  doom 
Which  I  have  passed  upon  her ;  she  is  banish'd. 

Cel.     Pronounce  that  sentence  then  on  me,  my  liege  : 
I  cannot  live  out  of  her  company, 

Duke  F.     You  are  a  fool.    You,  niece,  provide  yourself : 


SCENE   III]  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  19 

If  you  outstay  the  time,  upon  mine  honour, 
And  in  the  greatness  of  my  word,  you  die.  90 

[Exeunt  Duke  Frederick  and  Lords. 

Cel.     O  my  poor  Rosalind,  whither  wilt  thou  go  ? 
Wilt  thou  change  fathers  ?    I  will  give  thee  mine. 
I  charge  thee,  be  not  thou  more  grieved  than  I  am. 

Ros.     I  have  more  cause. 

Cel.  Thou  hast  not,  cousin ; 

Prithee,  be  cheerful :  know'st  thou  not,  the  duke 
Hath  banish'd  me,  his  daughter  ? 

Ros.  That  he  hath  not. 

Cel.     No,  hath  not  ?    Rosalind  lacks  then  the  love 
Which  teacheth  thee  that  thou  and  I  am  one : 
Shall  we  be  sunder'd  ?  shall  we  part,  sweet  girl  ? 
No:    let  my  father  seek  another  heir.  100 

Therefore  devise  with  me  how  we  may  fly, 
Whither  to  go  and  what  to  bear  with  us; 
And  do  not  seek  to  take  your  change  upon  you, 
To  oear  your  griefs  yourself  and  leave  me  out; 
For,  by  this  heaven,  now  at  our  sorrows  pale. 
Say  what  thou  canst,  I'll  go  along  with  thee. 

Ros.     Why,  whither  shall  we  go? 

Cel.     To  seek  my  uncle  in  the  forest  of  Arden. 

Ros.     Alas,  what  danger  will  it  be  to  us, 
Maids  as  we  are,  to  travel  forth  so  far!  no 

Beauty  provoketh  thieves  sooner  than  gold. 

Cel.     I'll  put  myself  in  poor  and  mean  attire 
And  with  a  kind  of  umber  smirch  my  face  ; 
The  like  do  you:    so  shall  we  pass  along 
And  never  stir  assailants. 

Ros.  Were  it  not  better, 

Because  that  I  am  more  than  common  tall, 


20  AS  YOU  LIKE    IT  [ACT  I 

That  I  did  suit  me  all  points  like  a  man  ? 

A  gallant  curtle-axe  upon  my  thigh, 

A  boar-spear  in  my  hand  ;    and — in  my  heart 

Lie  there  what  hidden  woman's  fear  there  will — ^'     ]20 

We'll  have  a  swashing  and  a  martial  outside, 

As  many  other  mannish  cowards  have 

That  do  outface  it  with  their  semblances. 

Cel.     What  shall  I  call  thee  when  thou  art  a  man  ? 

Ros.     I'll  have  no  worse  a  name  than  Jove's  own  page ; 
And  therefore  look  you  call  me  Ganymede. 
But  what  will  you  be  call'd  ? 

Cel.     Something  that  hath  a  reference  to  my  state; 
No  longer  Celia,  but  Aliena. 

Ros.     But,  cousin,  what  if  we  assay 'd  to  steal       130 
The  clownish  fool  out  of  your  father's  court  ? 
Would  he  not  be  a  comfort  to  our  travel  ? 

Cel.     He'll  go  along  o'er  the  wide  world  with  me ; 

Leave  me  alone  to  woo  him.     Let's  away, 

And  get  our  jewels  and  our  wealth  together, 

Devise  the  fittest  time  and  safest  way 

To  hide  us  from  pursuit  that  will  be  made 

After  my  fliglit.     Now  go  we  in  content 

To  liberty  and  not  to  banishment. 

[Exeunt. 


SCENE   l]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  21 

ACT  II 

Scene  I.      The  Forest  of  Arden. 

Enter  Duke  senior,   Amiexs,  and  txco  or  three  Lords, 
like  foresters. 

Biihe  S.     Now,  my  co-mates  aud  brothers  in  exile, 
Hath  not  old  custom  made  this  life  more  sweet 
Thau  that  of  painted  pomp  ?    Are  not  these  woods 
More  free  from  peril  than  the  envious  court  ? 
Here  feel  we  but  the  penalty  of  Adam, 
The  seasons'  difference,  as  the  icy  fang 
And  churlish  chiding  of  the  winter's  wind, 
Which,  when  it  bites  and  blows  upon  my  body, 
Even  till  I  shrink  with  cold,  I  smile  and  say 
'  This  is  no  flattery :   these  are  counsellors  lo 

That  feelingly  persuade  me  what  I  am.' 
Sweet  are  the  uses  of  adversity, 
Which,  like  the  toad,  ugly  and  venomous, 
Wears  yet  a  precious  jewel  in  his  head  ; 
And  this  our  life  exempt  from  public  haunt 
Finds  tongues  in  trees,  books  in  the  running  brooks, 
Sermons  in  stones  and  good  in  everything. 
I  would  not  change  it. 

Ami.  Happy  is  your  grace, 

That  can  translate  the  stubbornness  of  fortune 
Into  so  quiet  and  so  sweet  a  style.  2) 

Diike  S.     Come,  shall  we  go  and  kill  us  venison  ? 
And  yet  it  irks  me  the  poor  dappled  fools, 
Being  native  burghers  of  this  desert  city, 
Should  in  their  own  confines  with  forked  heads 
Have  their  round  haunches  gored. 


22  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [aCT  II 

First  Lord.  Indeed,  my  lord, 

The  melancholy  Jaques  grieves  at  that, 
And,  in  that  kind,  swears  you  do  more  usurp 
Than  doth  your  brother  that  hath  banish'd  you. 
To-day  my  lord  of  Amiens  and  myself 
Did  steal  behind  him  as  he  lay  along  30 

Under  an  oak,  whose  antique  root  peeps  out 
Upon  the  brook  that  brawls  along  this  wood: 
To  the  which  place  a  poor  sequester 'd  stag, 
That  from  the  hunter's  aim  had  ta'en  a  hurt, 
Did  come  to  languish,  and  indeed,  my  lord. 
The  wretched  animal  heaved  forth  such  groans 
That  their  discharge  did  stretch  his  leathern  coat 
Almost  to  bursting,  and  the  big  round  tears 
Coursed  one  another  down  his  innocent  nose 
In  piteous  chase ;  and  thus  the  hairy  fool,  40 

Much  marked  of  the  melancholy  Jaques, 
Stood  on  the  extremest  verge  of  the  swift  brook, 
Augmenting  it  with  tears. 

Duhe  S.  But  what  said  Jaques  ? 

Did  he  not  moralize  this  spectacle  ? 

First  Lord.     O,  yes,  into  a  thousand  similes. 
First,  for  his  weeping  into  the  needless  stream; 
'  Poor  deer,'  quoth  he,  '  thou  makes t  a  testament 
As  worldlings  do,  giving  thy  sum  of  more 
To  that  which  had  too  much ' :  then,  being  there  alone, 
Left  and  abandon'd  of  his  velvet  friends,  oO 

*  'Tis  right,'  quoth  he ;   *  thus  misery  doth  part 
The  flux  of  company ' :   anon  a  careless  herd, 
Full  of  the  pasture,  jumps  along  by  him 

And  never  stays  to  greet  him ;   '  Ay,'  quoth  Jaques, 

*  Sweep  on,  you  fat  and  greasy  citizens; 


SCENE   II]  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  23 

*Tis  just  the  fashion :   wherefore  do  you  look 

Upon  that  poor  and  broken  bankrupt  there  ? ' 

Thus  most  invectively  he  picrceth  through 

The  body  of  the  country,  city,  court, 

Yea,  and  of  this  our  life,  swearing  that  we  60 

Are  mere  usurpers,  tyrants  and  what's  worse. 

To  fright  the  animals  and  to  kill  them  up 

In  their  assign 'd  and  native  dwelling-place. 

Duke  S.     And   did   you  leave   him  in   this   contem- 
plation ? 

Sec.  Lord.     We  did,  my  lord,  weeping  and  commenting 
Upon  the  sobbing  deer. 

DiiJce  S.  Show  me  the  place: 

I  love  to  cope  him  in  these  sullen  fits, 
For  then  he's  full  of  matter. 

First  Lord.     I'll  bring  you  to  him  straight.     [Exeuiit.  70 

Scene  II.     A  room  in  the  palace. 
Enter  Duke  Frederick,  with  Lords. 

Luke  F.     Can  it  be  possible  that  no  man  saw  them  ? 
It  cannot  be  :  some  villains  of  my  court 
Are  of  consent  and  sufferance  in  this. 

First  Lord.     I  cannot  hear  of  any  that  did  see  her. 
The  ladies,  her  attendants  of  her  chamber. 
Saw  her  a-bed,  and  in  the  morning  early 
They  found  the  bed  untreasured  of  their  mistress. 

Sec.  Lord.     My  lord,  the  roynish  clown,  at  whom  so  oft 
Your  grace  was  wont  to  laugh,  is  also  missing. 
Hisperia,  the  princess'  gentlewoman,  10 

Confesses  that  she  secretly  o'erheard 
Your  dauorhter  and  her  cousin  much  commend 
The  parts  and  graces  of  the  wrestler 


24  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   II 

That  did  but  lately  foil  the  sinewy  Charles ; 
And  she  believes,  wherever  they  are  gone, 
That  youth  is  surely  in  their  company. 

Diihe  F.     Send   to   his   brother ;    fetch    that    gallant 
hither ; 

If  he  be  absent,  bring  his  brother  to  me  ; 
I'll  make  him  find  him  :  do  this  suddenly,  20 

And  let  not  search  and  inquisition  quail 
To  bring  again  these  foolish  runaways.  [Exeunt. 

Scene  III.     Before  Oliver's  house. 
Enter  Orlando  and  Adam,  meeting. 

Orl.     Who's  there  ? 

AdciTYi.     What,   my   young   master !    O    my  gentle 
master  ! 
0  my  sweet  master  !  O  you  memory 
Of  old  Sir  Rowland  !  why  what  make  you  here  ? 
Why  are  you  virtuous  ?  why  do  people  love  you  ? 
And  wherefore  are  you  gentle,  strong  and  valiant  ? 
Why  would  you  be  so  fond  to  overcome 
The  bonny  priser  of  the  humorous  duke  ? 
Your  praise  is  come  too  swifty  home  before  you.  lo 

Know  you  not,  master,  to  some  kind  of  men 
Their  graces  serve  them  but  as  enemies  ? 
No  more  do  yours  :  your  virtues,  gentle  master. 
Are  sanctified  and  holy  traitors  to  you. 
O,  what  a  world  is  this,  when  what  is  comely 
Envenoms  him  that  bears  it ! 

Orl.     Why,  what's  the  matter  ? 

Adam.  O  unhappy  youth  ! 

Come  not  within  these  doors ;  within  this  roof 
The  enemy  of  all  youx  ^aces  lives 


SCENE  III]  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  25 

Your  brother — no,  no  brother ;  yet  the  son —  20 

Yet  not  the  son,  I  will  not  call  him  son 

Of  him  I  was  about  to  call  his  father — 

Hath  heard  your  praises,  and  this  night  he  means 

To  burn  the  lodfdncr  where  you  use  to  lie 

And  you  within  it :  if  he  fail  of  that, 

He  will  have  other  means  to  cut  you  off. 

I  overheard  him  and  his  practices. 

This  is  no  place  ;  this  house  is  but  a  butchery : 

Abhor  it,  fear  it,  do  not  enter  it. 

Orl.     Why,  whither,  Adam,  wouldst  thou  have  me  go  ? 

AdaWj.     No  matter  whither,  so  you  come  not  here.    31 

Orl.     What,  wouldst  thou  have  me  go  and  beg  my 
food  ? 
Or  with  a  base  and  boisterous  sword  enforce 
A  thievish  livinor  on  the  common  road  ? 
This  I  must  do,  or  know  not  what  to  do  : 
Yet  this  I  will  not  do,  do  how  I  can  ; 
I  rather  will  subject  me  to  the  malice 
Of  a  diverted  blood  and  bloody  brother. 

Adam.    But  do  not  so.    I  have  five  hundred  crowns,  40 
The  thrifty  hire  I  saved  under  your  father. 
Which  I  did  store  to  be  my  foster-nurse 
When  service  should  in  my  old  limbs  lie  lame 
And  unregrarded  age  in  corners  thrown  : 
Take  that,  and  He  that  doth  the  ravens  feed, 
Yea,  providently  caters  for  the  sparrow. 
Be  comfort  to  my  age  !    Here  is  the  gold  ; 
All  this  I  give  you.     Let  me  be  your  servant : 
Though  I  look  old,  yet  I  am  strong  and  lusty ; 
For  in  my  youth  I  never  did  apply  50 

Hot  and  rebellious  liquors  in  my  blood. 


26  AS   YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT   II 

Nor  did  not  with  unbashful  forehead  woo 
The  means  of  weakness  and  debility ; 
Therefore  my  age  is  as  a  lusty  winter, 
Frosty,  but  kindly :  let  me  go  with  you ; 
I'll  do  the  service  of  a  younger  man 
In  all  your  business  and  necessities. 

Orl.     O  good  old  man,  how  well  in  thee  appears 
The  constant  service  of  the  antique  world, 
When  service  sweat  for  duty,  not  for  meed !  60 

Thou  art  not  for  the  fashion  of  these  times, 
Where  none  will  sweat  but  for  promotion, 
And  having  that,  do  choke  their  service  up 
Even  with  the  having :  it  is  not  so  with  thee. 
But  poor  old  man,  thou  prunest  a  rotten  tree, 
That  cannot  so  much  as  a  blossom  yield 
In  lieu  of  all  thy  pains  and  husbandry. 
But  come  thy  ways ;  we'll  go  along  together, 
And  ere  we  have  thy  youthful  wages  spent, 
We'll  light  upon  some  settled  low  content.  70 

Adam.     Master,  go  on,  and  I  will  follow  thee. 
To  the  last  gasp,  with  truth  and  loyalty. 
From  seventeen  years  till  now  almost  fourscore 
Here  lived  I,  but  now  live  here  no  more. 
At  seventeen  years  many  their  fortunes  seek ; 
But  at  fourscore  it  is  too  late  a  week  : 
Yet  fortune  cannot  recompense  me  better 
Than  to  die  well,  and  not  my  master's  debtor.        [Exeunt. 


SCENE  IV]  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  27 

Scene  IY.      The  Forest  of  Arden. 

Enter  RosALiKD /or  Ganymede,  Celia  ybr  Alien  a,  and 
Touchstone. 

Ros.     O  Jupiter,  how  weary  are  my  spirits ! 

Touch.  I  care  not  for  my  spirits,  if  my  legs  were  not 
weary. 

Ros.  I  could  find  in  my  heart  to  disgrace  my  man's 
apparel  and  to  cry  like  a  woman ;  but  I  must  comfort 
the  weaker  vessel,  as  doublet  and  hose  ouglit  to  show 
itself  courageous  to  petticoat :  therefore  courage,  good 
Aliena ! 

CeL     I  pray  you,  bear  with  me ;  I  cannot  go  no  further. 

Touch.  For  my  part,  I  had  rather  bear  with  you  than 
bear  you ;  yet  I  should  bear  no  cross  if  I  did  bear  you, 
for  I  think  you  have  no  money  in  your  purse.  12 

Ros.     Well,  this  is  the  forest  of  Arden. 

Touch.  Ay,  now  am  I  in  Arden  ;  the  more  fool  I ; 
when  I  was  at  home,  I  was  in  a  better  place :  but 
travellers  must  be  content. 

Ros.     Ay,  be  so,  good  Touchstone. 
Look  you,  who  comes  here;    a  young  man  and  an  old 
in  solemn  talk 

Enter  Corin  and  SrLVius. 

Cor.     That  is  the  way  to  make  her  scorn  you  still. 

Sil.     O  Corin,  that  thou  knew'st  how  I  do  love  her  ! 

Cor.     I  partly  guess ;  for  I  have  loved  ere  now.         21 

Sil.     No,  Corin,  being  old,  thou  canst  not  guess, 
Though  in  thy  youth  thou  wast  as  true  a  lover 
As  ever  sigh'd  upon  a  midnight  pillow: 
But  if  thjr  love  were  ever  like  to  mine — 


28  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT   II 

As  sure  I  think  did  never  man  love  so — 

How  many  actions  most  ridiculous 

Hast  thou  been  drawn  to  by  thy  fantasy  ? 

Cor.     Into  a  thousand  that  I  have  forgotten. 

Sil.     O,  thou  didst  then  ne'er  love  so  heartil}^ !     30 
If  thou  remember' st  not  the  slightest  folly 
That  ever  love  did  make  thee  run  into, 
Thou  has  not  loved: 
Or  if  thou  hast  not  sat  as  I  do  now, 
Wearying  thy  hearer  in  thy  mistress'  praise, 
Thou  hast  not  loved: 

Or  if  thou  hast  not  broke  from  company 
Abruptly,  as  my  passion  now  makes  me. 
Thou  hast  not  loved. 

0  Phebe,  Phebe,  Phebe  !  40 
Ros.     Alas,  poor  shepherd  !  searching  of  thy  wound, 

1  have  by  hard  adventure  found  mine  own. 

Touch.  And  I  mine.  I  remember,  when  I  was  in  love 
I  broke  my  sword  upon  a  stone  and  bid  him  take  that 
for  cominoc  a-nio^ht  to  Jane  Smile :  and  I  remember  the 
kissing  of  her  batlet  and  the  cow's  dugs  that  her  pretty 
chopt  hands  had  milked ;  and  I  remember  the  wooing  of 
a  peascod  instead  of  her,  from  whom  I  took  two  cods 
and,  giving  her  them  again,  said  with  weeping  tears 
'Wear  these  for  my  sake.'  We  that  are  true  lovers  run 
into  strange  capers  :  but  as  all  is  mortal  in  nature,  so  is 
all  nature  in  love  mortal  in  folly.  52 

Ros.     Thou  speakest  wiser  than  thou  art  'ware  of, 

Touch.  Nay,  I  shall  ne'er  be  'ware  of  mine  own  wit 
till  I  break  my  shins  against  it. 

Ros.     Jove,  Jove  !  this  shepherd's  passion 
Is  much  upon  my  fashion. 


SCENE  IV]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  29 

Touch.     And   mine;   but   it    grows    something    stale 
with  me. 

Cel.     I  pray  you,  one  of  you  question  yond  man 
If  he  for  gold  will  give  us  any  food;  60 

I  faint  almost  to  death. 

Touch.  Holla,  j^ou  clown  ! 

Ros.     Peace,  fool:   he's  not  thy  kinsman. 

Cor.  Who  calls  ? 

Touch.     Your  betters,  sir. 

Cor.  Else  are  they  very  wretched. 

Ros.     Peace,  I  say.     Good  even  to  you,  friend. 

Cor.     And  to  you,  gentle  sir,  and  to  you  all. 

Ros.     I  prithee,  shepherd,  if  that  love  or  gold 
Can  in  this  desert  place  buy  entertainment. 
Bring  us  where  we  may  rest  ourselves  and  feed : 
Here's  a  young  maid  with  travel  much  oppress'd 
And  faints  for  succour. 

Cor.  Fair  sir,  I  pity  her  70 

And  wish,  for  her  sake  more  than  for  mine  own, 
My  fortunes  were  more  able  to  relieve  her  ; 
But  I  am  shepherd  to  another  man 
And  do  not  shear  the  fleeces  that  I  gi^aze : 
My  master  is  of  churlish  disposition 
And  little  recks  to  find  the  way  to  heaven 
By  doing  deeds  of  hospitality  : 
Besides,  his  cote,  his  flocks  and  bounds  of  feed 
Are  now  on  sale,  and  at  our  sheepcote  now, 
By  reason  of  his  absence,  there  is  nothing  SO 

That  you  will  feed  on  ;  but  what  is,  come  see, 
And  in  my  voice  most  welcome  shall  you  be. 

Eos.     What  is  he  that  shall  buy  his  flock  and  pasture  ? 


30  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT  II 

Cor.     That    young    swain    that   you   saw   here    but 
erewhile, 
That  little  cares  for  buying  anything. 

Ros.     I  pray  thee,  if  it  stands  with  honesty, 
Buy  thou  the  cottage,  pasture  and  the  flock, 
And  thou  shalt  have  to  pay  for  it  of  us. 

Cel.  And  we  will  mend  thy  wages.  I  like  this  90 
place,  And  willingly  could  waste  my  time  in  it. 

Cor.     Assuredly  the  thing  is  to  be  sold: 
Go  with  me :   if  you  like  upon  report 
The  soil,  the  profit  and  this  kind  of  life, 
I  will  your  very  faithful  feeder  be 
And  buy  it  with  your  gold  right  suddenly.  {Exeunt, 

Scene  V.     The  Forest. 

Enter  Amiens,  Jaques,  and  others. 

Song. 

ATYli.  *•  Under  the  greenwood  tree 

Who  loves  to  lie  with  me, 
And  tune  his  merry  note 
Unto  the  sweet  bird's  throat, 
Come  hither,  come  hither,  come  hither  : 
Here  shall  he  see 
No  enemy 
But  winter  and  rough  weather." 

Jaq.     More,  more,  I  prithee,  more.  9 

Ami.     It  will  make  you  melancholy.  Monsieur  Jaques. 

Jaq.  I  thank  it.  More,  I  prithee,  more.  I  can  suck 
melancholy  out  of  a  song,  as  a  weasel  sucks  eggs.  More, 
I  prithee,  more. 

Ami.  My  voice  is  ragged:  I  know  I  cannot  please 
you. 


SCENE  V]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  31 

Jaq.  I  do  not  desire  you  to  please  me ;  I  do  desire 
you  to  sing.  Come,  more  ;  another  stanzo :  call  you  'em 
stanzos  ? 

Ami.     What  you  will,  Monsieur  Jaques. 

Jaq,  Na}^  I  care  not  for  their  names  ;  they  owe  me 
nothing.     Will  you  sing  ?  21 

Ami.     More  at  your  request  than  to  please  myself. 

Jaq.  Well  then,  if  ever  I  thank  any  man,  I'll  thank 
you  ;  but  tliat  they  call  compliment  is  like  the  encounter 
of  two  dog-apes,  and  when  a  man  thanks  me  heartily, 
methinks  I  have  given  him  a  penny  and  he  renders  me 
the  beggarly  tlianks.  Come,  sing;  and  you  that  will 
not,  hold  your  tongues. 

Ami.  Well,  I'll  end  the  song.  Sirs,  cover  the  while ; 
the  duke  will  drink  under  this  tree.  He  hath  been  all 
this  day  to  look  you.  31 

Jaq.  And  I  have  been  all  this  day  to  avoid  him.  He 
is  too  disputable  for  my  company :  I  think  of  as  many 
matters  as  he,  but  I  give  heaven  thanks  and  make  no 
boast  of  them.     Come,  warble,  come. 

Song. 

"Who  doth  ambition  shun  [All  together  here. 

And  loves  to  live  i'  the  sun, 
Seeking  the  food  he  eats 
And  pleased  with  what  he  gets. 
Come  hither,  come  hither,  come  hither  :  40 

Here  shall  he  see 
No  enemy 
But  winter  and  rough  weather." 

Jaq.     I'll  give  you  a  verse  to  this  note  that  I  made 
yesterday  in  despite  of  my  invention. 
Aifni.     And  I'll  sinor  it. 


32  AS   YOU  LIKE   IT  [aCT   II 

Jaq.     Thus  it  goes  : — 

"  If  it  do  come  to  pass 

That  any  man  turn  ass, 

Leaving  his  wealth  and  ease, 

A  stubborn  will  to  please,  50 

Ducdame,   ducdame,   ducdame  : 

Here  shall  he  see 

Gross  fools  as  he, 
An  if  he  will  come  to  me." 

AtyiL     What's  that  '  ducdame '  ? 

Jaq.  'Tis  a  Greek  invocation,  to  call  fools  into  a 
circle.  I'll  go  sleep,  if  I  can  ;  if  I  cannot,  I'll  rail  against 
all  the  firstborn  of  Egypt. 

Ami.     And   I'll   go   seek   the  duke :    his  banquet  is 

prepared.  {Exeunt  severally.  60 


Scene  YI.      The  forest. 
Enter  Oklando  and  Adam. 

Adam.  Dear  master,  I  can  go  no  further :  O,  I  die 
for  food  !  Here  lie  I  down,  and  measure  out  my  grave. 
Farewell,  kind  master. 

Orl.  Why,  how  now,  Adam !  no  greater  heart  in 
thee?  Live  a  little;  comfort  a  little;  cheer  thyself  a 
little.  If  this  uncouth  forest  yield  any  thing  savage,  I 
will  either  be  food  for  it  or  bring  it  for  food  to  thee. 
Thy  conceit  is  nearer  death  than  thy  powers.  For  my 
sake  be  comfortable;  hold  death  awhile  at  the  arm's  end: 
I  will  here  be  with  thee  presently ;  and  if  I  bring  thee 
not  something  to  eat,  I  will  give  thee  leave  to  die  :  but  if 
thou  diest  before  I  come,  thou  art  a  mocker  of  my  labour. 
Well  said !  thou  lookest  cheerly,  and  I'll  be  with  thee 


SCENE   VIl]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  33 

quickly.  Yet  thou  liest  in  the  bleak  air :  come,  I  will 
bear  thee  to  some  shelter;  and  thou  shalt  not  die  for 
lack  of  a  dinner,  if  tliere  live  any  thing  in  this  desert. 
Cheerly,  good  Adam !  [Exemu.     17 

Scene    VII.     The  forest. 

A  table  set  out.     Enter  Duke  senior,  Amiens,  arid  Lords 
UJce  outlaws. 

Duke  S.     I  think  he  be  transform'd  into  a  beast : 
For  I  can  no  where  find  him  like  a  man. 

First  Lord.     My  lord,  he  is  but  even  now  gone  hence : 
Here  was  he  merry,  hearing  of  a  song. 

Duke  S.     If  he,  compact  of  jars,  grow  musical, 
We  shall  have  shortly  discord  in  the  spheres. 
Go  seek  him :  tell  him  I  would  speak  with  him. 

Enter  Jaques. 

First  Lord.     He  saves  my  labour  by  his  own  approach. 

Duke  S.     Why,  how  now,  monsieur !    what  a  life  is 
this,  10 

That  your  poor  friends  must  woo  your  company  ? 
What,  you  look  merrily  ! 

Jaq.     A  fool,  a  fool !   I  met  a  fool  i'  the  forest, 
A  motley  fool ;   a  miserable  world ! 
As  I  do  live  by  food,  I  met  a  fool ; 
Who  laid  him  down  and  bask'd  him  in  the  sun, 
And  rail'd  on  Lady  Fortune  in  good  terms, 
In  good  set  terms  and  yet  a  motley  fool, 

*  Good  morrow,  fool/  quoth  I,     *  No,  sir,'  quoth  he, 

*  Call  me  not  fool  till  heaven  hath  sent  me  fortune ' :      20 
And  then  he  drew  a  dial  from  his  poke. 

And,  looking  on  it  with  lack-lustre  eye, 


34  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT  II 

Says  very  wisely,  '  It  is  ten  o'clock : 
Thus  we  may  see,'  quoth  he,  '  how  the  world  wags : 
'Tis  but  an  hour  ago  since  it  was  nine. 
And  after  one  hour  more  'twill  be  eleven ; 
And  so,  from  hour  to  hour,  we  ripe  and  ripe, 
And  then,  from  hour  to  hour,  we  rot  and  rot; 
And  thereby  hangs  a  tale.'     When  I  did  hear 
The  motley  fool  thus  moral  on  the  time,  30 

My  lungs  began  to  crow  like  chanticleer. 
That  fools  should  be  so  deep-contemplative, 
And  I  did  laug^h  sans  intermission 
An  hour  by  his  dial.     O  noble  fool ! 
A  worthy  fool !     Motley's  the  only  wear. 
Duke  S.     What  fool  is  this? 

Jaq.     O  worthy  fool !    One  that  hath  been  a  courtier, 
And  says,  if  ladies  be  but  young  and  fair, 
They  have  the  gift  to  know  it :    and  in  his  brain, 
Which  is  as  dry  as  the  remainder  biscuit  40 

After  a  voyage,  he  hath  strange  places  cramm'd 
With  observation,  the  which  he  vents 
In  mangled  forms.     O  that  I  were  a  fool  ! 
I  am  ambitious  for  a  motley  coat. 
Duke  S.     Thou  shalt  have  one. 
Jaq.  It  is  my  only  suit; 

Provided  that  you  weed  your  better  judgments 

Of  all  opinion  that  grows  rank  in  them 

That  I  am  wise.     I  must  have  liberty 

Withal,  as  large  a  charter  as  the  wind, 

To  blow  on  whom  I  please ;    for  so  fools  have ;  50 

And  they  that  are  most  galled  with  my  folly, 

They  iQOst  must  laugh.     And  why,  sir,  must  they  so? 

The  '  why '  is  plain  as  way  to  parish  church : 


SCENE  VIl]  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  35 

He  tliat  a  fool  doth  very  wisely  hit 

Doth  very  foolishly,  although  he  smart, 

[Not  to]  seem  senseless  of  the  bob:   if  not, 

The  wise  man's  folly  is  anatomized 

Even  by  the  squandering  glances  of  the  fool. 

Invest  me  in  my  motley :   give  me  leave 

To  speak  my  mind,  and  I  Arill  through  and  through       60 

Cleanse  the  foul  body  of  the  infected  world, 

If  they  will  patiently  receive  my  medicine. 

Diike  S.     Fie  on  thee  !  I  can  tell  what  thou  wouldst  do. 

Jaq.     What,  for  a  counter,  would  I  do  but  good  ? 

Duke  S.     Most  mischievous  foul  sin,  in  chiding  sin : 
For  thou  thyself  hast  been  a  libertine, 
As  sensual  as  the  brutish  sting  itself ; 
And  all  the  embossed  sores  and  headed  evils, 
That  thou  with  license  of  free  foot  hast  caught, 
Wouldest  thou  disgorge  into  the  general  world.  70 

Jaq.     Why,  who  cries  out  on  pride. 
That  can  therein  tax  any  private  party  ? 
Doth  it  not  flow  as  hugely  as  the  sea, 
Till  that  the  wearer's  very  means  do  ebb  ? 
What  woman  in  the  city  do  I  name, 
When  that  I  say  the  city-woman  bears 
The  cost  of  princes  on  unworthy  shoulders  ? 
Who  can  come  in  and  say  that  I  mean  her. 
When  such  a  one  as  she  such  is  her  neighbour  ? 
Or  what  is  he  of  basest  function  80 

That  says  his  bravery  is  not  of  my  cost, 
Thinking  that  I  mean  him,  but  therein  suits 
His  folly  to  the  mettle  of  my  speech  ? 
There  then;  how  then  ?  what  then  ?    Let  me  see  wherein 
My  tongue  hath  wrong'd  him:   if  it  do  him  right, 


36  AS   YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT   II 

Then  he  hath  wrong'd  himself  ;    if  he  be  free, 
Why  then  my  taxing  like  a  wild-goose  flies, 
Unclaim'd  of  any  man.     But  who  comes  here  ? 

Enter  Orlando,  tcith  his  sword  draion. 

Orl.     Forbear,  and  eat  no  more. 

Jaq.  Why,  I  have  eat  none  yet. 

Orl.     Nor  shalt  not,  till  necessity  be  served.  90 

Jaq.     Of  what  kind  should  this  cock  come  of  ? 

Duke  S.     Art  thou  thus  boLlen'd,  man,  by  thy  distress, 
Or  else  a  rude  despiser  of  good  manners. 
That  in  civility  thou  seem'st  so  empty  ? 

Orl.     You  touch'd  my  vein  at  first :  the  thorny  point 
Of  bare  distress  hath  ta'en  from  me  the  show 
Of  smooth  civility :   yet  am  I  inland  bred 
And  know  some  nurture.     But  forbear,  I  say : 
He  dies  that  touches  any  of  this  fruit 
Till  I  and  my  affairs  are  answered.  1 00 

Jaq.      An  you  will  not  be  answered    with    reason,  I 
must  die. 

Duke  S.     What  would   you   have  ?     Your  gentleness 
shall  force 
More  than  your  force  move  us  to  gentleness. 

Orl,     I  almost  die  for  food  ;    and  let  me  have  it. 

Duke  S.     Sit   down    and    feed,  and    welcome   to  our 
table. 

Orl.     Speak  you  so  gently  ?    Pardon  me,  I  pray  you  : 
I  thought  that  all  things  had  been  savage  here  ;       no 
And  therefore  put  I  on  the  countenance 
Of  stern  commandment.     But  whate'er  you  are 
That  in  this  desert  inaccessible, 
Under  the  shade  of  melancholy  boughs, 


SCENE  VIl]  AS   YOU  LIKE   IT  37 

Lose  and  neglect  the  creeping  hours  of  time ; 

If  ever  you  have  look'd  on  better  days. 

If  ever  been  where  bells  have  knoll'd  to  church, 

If  ever  sat  at  any  good  man's  feast, 

If  ever  from  your  eyelids  wiped  a  tear 

And  know  what  'tis  to  pity  and  be  pitied,  120 

Let  gentleness  my  strong  enforcement  be: 

In  the  which  hope  I  blush,  and  hide  my  sword. 

Biihe  S.     True  is  it  that  we  have  seen  better  days, 
And  have  with  holy  bell  been  knoll'd  to  church 
And  sat  at  good  men's  feasts  and  wiped  our  eyes 
Of  drops  that  sacred  pity  hath  engender'd: 
And  therefore  sit  you  down  in  gentleness 
And  take  upon  command  what  help  we  have 
That  to  your  wanting  may  be  minister'd. 

Orl.     Then  but  forbear  your  food  a  little  while,   130 
Whiles,  like  a  doe,  I  go  to  find  my  fawn 
And  give  it  food.     There  is  an  old  poor  man, 
Who  after  me  hath  many  a  weary  step 
Limp'd  in  pure  love:   till  he  be  first  sufficed, 
Oppress'd  with  two  weak  evils,  age  and  hunger, 
I  will  not  touch  a  bit. 

Duke  S.  Go  find  him  out, 

And  we  will  nothing  waste  till  you  return. 

Oi'l.     I  thank  ye  ;  and  be  blest  for  your  good  comfort ! 

[Bxit. 

Duke  S.     Thou  seest  we  are  not  all  alone  unhappy : 
This  wide  and  universal  theatre  140 

Presents  more  woeful  pageants  than  the  scene 
Wherein  we  play  in. 

Jaq.  All  the  world's  a  stage. 

And  all  the  men  and  women  merely  players ; 


t 


38  AS  YOU   LIKE  IT  [ACT  II 

They  have  their  exits  and  their  entrances ; 
And  one  man  in  his  time  plays  many  parts, 
His  acts  being  seven  ages.     At  first  the  infant, 
Mewling  and  puking  in  the  nurse's  arms. 
And  then  the  whining  school-boy,  with  his  satchel 
And  shining  morning  face,  creeping  like  snail 
Unwillingly  to  school.     And  then  the  lover,,  150 

Sighing  like  furnace,  with  a  woeful  ballad 
Y  Made  to  his  mistress'  eyebrow.     Then  a  soldier. 
Full  of  strange  oaths  and  bearded  like  the  pard, 
Jealous  in  honour,  sudden  and  quick  in  quarrel, 
-i.  Seeking  the  bubble  reputation 

\J  Even  in  the  cannon's  mouth.     And  then  the  justice, 
^    In  fair  round  belly  w^th  good  capon  lined, 
J^\    With  eyes  severe  and  beard  of  formal  cut, 
Full  of  wise  saws  and  modern  instances ; 
And  so  he  plays  his  part.     The  sixth  age  shifts         leo 
Into  the  lean  and  slipper'd  pantaloon. 
With  spectacles  on  nose  and  pouch  on  side, 
His  youthful  hose,  well  saved,  a  world  too  wide 
For  his  shrunk  shank;    and  his  big  manly  voice. 
Turning  again  toward  childish  treble,  pipes 
And  whistles  in  his  sound.     Last  scene  of  all, 
That  ends  this  strange  eventful  history, 
Is  second  childishness  and  mere  oblivion, 
Sans  teeth,  sans  eyes,  sans  taste,  sans  everything. 

Re-enter  Orlando,  with  Adam. 

Duke  S.     Welcome.     Set  down  your  venerable  burden, 
And  let  him  feed.  171 

Orl.     1  thank  you  most  for  him. 

Adam.  So  had  you  need: 

I  scarce  can  speak  to  thank  you  for  myself. 


SCENE   VIl]  AS  YOU   LIKE  IT  39 

Diihe  S.     Welcome;   fall  to:   I  will  not  trouble  you 
As  yet,  to  question  you  about  your  fortunes. 
Give  us  some  music ;   and,  good  cousin,  sing. 

Song. 

Aim.  «'  Blow,  blow,  thou  winter  wind, 

Thou  art  not  so  unkind 
As  man's  ingratitude  ; 
Thy  tooth  is  not  so  keen,  180 

Because  thou  art  not  seen, 
Although  thy  breath  be  rude. 
Heigh-ho  !   sing,  heigh-ho  !    unto  the  green  holly  : 
Most  friendship  is  feigning,  most  loving  mere  folly  : 
Then,  heigh-ho,  the  holly  ! 
This  life  is  most  jolly. 

Freeze,  freeze,  thou  bitter  sky. 
That  dost  not  bite  so  nigh 

As  benefits  forgot : 
Though  thou  the  waters  warp,  190 

Thy  sting  is  not  so  sharp 

As  friend  remember'd  not." 

Heigh-ho  !    sing,  &c. 

Duke  S.     If  that  you  were  the  good   Sir  Rowlands 
son, 

As  you  have  whisper'd  faithfully  you  were, 
And  as  mine  eye  doth  his  effigies  witness 
Most  truly  limn'd  and  living  in  your  face, 
Be  truly  welcome  hither:    I  am  the  duke 
That  loved  your  father :  the  residue  of  your  fortune,  200 
Go  to  my  cave  and  tell  me.     Good  old  man, 
Thou  art  right  welcome  as  thy  master  is. 
Support  him  by  the  arm.     Give  me  your  hand, 
And  let  me  all  your  fortunes  understand.  [Sxeunt. 


40  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   III 

ACT    III 

Scene  I.     A  room  in  the  palace. 
Enter  Duke  Frederick,  Lords,  and  Olivkr. 

Duke  F.    Not  seen  him  since  ?    Sir,  sir,  that  cannot  be ; 
But  were  I  not  the  better  part  made  mercy, 
I  should  not  seek  an  absent  argument 
Of  my  revenge,  thou  present.     But  look  to  it: 
Find  out  thy  brother,  wheresoe'er  he  is  ; 
Seek  him  with  candle ;    bring  him  dead  or  living 
Within  this  twelvemonth,  or  turn  thou  no  more 
To  seek  a  living  in  our  territory. 
Thy  lands  and  all  things  that  thou  dost  call  thine 
Worth  seizure  do  we  seize  into  our  hands,  10 

Till  thou  canst  quit  thee  by  thy  brother's  mouth 
Of  what  we  think  against  thee. 

on.     O  that  your  highness  knew  my  heart  in  this 
I  never  loved  my  brother  in  my  life. 

Duke  F.     More  villain  thou.     Well,  push  him  out  of 
doors ; 
And  let  my  officers  of  such  a  nature 
Make  an  extent  upon  his  house  and  lands: 
Do  this  expediently  and  turn  him  going.  [Exeunt. 

Scene  II.     The  forest. 
Enter  Orla^'do,  with  a  paper. 
Orl.     Hang  there,  my  verse,  in  witness  of  my  love  i 

And  thou,  thrice-crowned  queen  of  night,  survey 
With  thy  chaste  eye,  from  thy  pale  sphere  above, 

Thy  huntress'  name  that  my  full  life  doth  sway. 
O  Rosalind !  these  trees  shall  be  my  books 

And  in  their  barks  my  thoughts  I'll  character; 


SCENE   II]  AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  41 

That  every  eye  which  in  this  forest  looks 
Shall  see  thy  virtue  witness'd  every  where. 
Run,  run,  Orlando  ;   carve  on  every  tree 
The  fair,  the  chaste  and  unexpressive  she.       [Exit.      lo 

Enter  Corix  and  Touchstone. 

Cor.  And  how  like  you  this  shepherd's  life,  Master 
Touchstone  ? 

Touch.  Truly,  shepherd,  in  respect  of  itself,  it  is  a 
good  life ;  but  in  respect  that  it  is  a  shepherd's  life,  it  is 
naught.  In  respect  that  it  is  solitary,  I  like  it  very 
well ;  but  in  respect  that  it  is  private,  it  is  a  very  vile 
life.  Now,  in  respect  it  is  in  the  fields,  it  pleaseth  me 
well ;  but  in  respect  it  is  not  in  the  court,  it  is  tedious. 
As  it  is  a  spare  life,  look  you,  it  fits  my  humour  well ; 
but  as  there  is  no  more  plenty  in  it,  it  goes  much 
against  my  stomach.  Hast  any  philosophy  in  thee, 
shepherd  ?  22 

Cor.  No  more  but  that  I  know  the  more  one  sickens 
the  worse  at  ease  he  is ;  and  that  he  that  wants  money, 
means  and  content  is  without  three  good  friends;  that 
the  property  of  rain  is  to  wet  and  fire  to  burn;  that 
good  pasture  makes  fat  sheep,  and  that  a  great  cause  of 
the  night  is  lack  of  the  sun ;  that  he  that  hath  learned 
no  wit  by  nature  nor  art  may  complain  of  good  breedinn- 
or  comes  of  a  very  dull  kindred.  30 

Touch.  Such  a  one  is  a  natural  philosopher.  Wast 
ever  in  court,  shepherd  ? 

Cor.     No,  truly. 

Touch.     Then  thou  art  damned. 

Cor,     Nay,  I  hope. 


42  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   III 

Touch.  Truly,  thou  art  damned,  like  an  ill-roasted 
Qgg  all  on  one  side. 

Cor.     For  not  being  at  court  ?     Your  reason. 

Touch.  Why,  if  thou  never  wast  at  court,  thou  never 
sawest  good  manners;  if  thou  never  sawest  good 
manners,  then  thy  manners  must  be  wicked ;  and 
wickedness  is  sin,  and  sin  is  damnation.  Thou  art  in 
a  parlous  state,  shepherd.  43 

Cor.  Not  a  whit.  Touchstone :  those  that  are  good 
manners  at  the  court  are  as  ridiculous  in  the  country 
as  the  behaviour  of  the  country  is  most  mockable  at 
the  court.  You  told  me  you  salute  not  at  the  court, 
but  you  kiss  your  hands:  that  courtesy  would  be 
uncleanly,  if  courtiers  were  shepherds. 

Tovxih.     Instance,  briefly  ;   come,  instance.  50 

Cor.  Why,  we  are  still  handling  our  ewes,  and  their 
fells,  you  know,  are  greasy. 

Touch.  Why,  do  not  your  courtier's  hands  sweat? 
and  is  not  the  grease  of  a  mutton  as  wholesome  as  the 
sweat  of  a  man  ?  Shallow,  shallow.  A  better  instance, 
I  say;,  come. 

Cor.     Besides,  our  hands  are  hard. 

Touch.  Your  lips  will  feel  them  the  sooner.  Shallow 
again.     A  more  sounder  instance,  come. 

Cor,  And  they  are  often  tarred  over  with  the  surgery 
of  our  sheep ;  and  would  you  have  us  kiss  tar  ?  The 
courtier's  hands  are  perfumed  with  civet.  62 

Touch.  Most  shallow  man !  thou  worms-meat,  in 
respect  of  a  good  piece  of  flesh  indeed  !  Learn  of  the 
wise,  and  perpend :  civet  is  of  a  baser  birth  than  tar, 
the  very  uncleanly  flux  of  a  cat.  Mend  the  instance, 
shepherd. 


SCENE   II]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  43 

Cor.     You  have  too  courtly  a  wit  for  ine :  I  '11  rest. 

Touch.  Wilt  thou  rest  dammed  ?  God  help  thee, 
shallow  man !  God  make  incision  in  thee  !  thou  art 
rj|f./  71 

;  '^Oor.  Sir,  I  am  a  true  labourer :  I  earn  that  I  eat,  get 
tliat  I  wear,  owe  no  man  hate,  envy  no  man's  happiness, 
glad  of  other  men's  good,  content  with  my  harm,  and 
the  greatest  of  my  pride  is  to  see  my  ewes  graze  and  my 
lambs  suck.  Here  comes  young  Master  Ganymede,  my 
new  mistress's  brother. 

Enter  Rosalind,  with  a  paper  reading. 

Iios.  ' '  From  the  east  to  western  Ind, 

No  jewel  is  like  Rosalind. 

Her  worth,  being  mounted  on  the  wind,  80 

Through  all  the  world  bears  Rosalind. 
All  the  pictures  fairest  lined 
Are  but  black  to  Rosalind. 
Let  no  face  be  kept  in  mind 
But  the  fair  of  Rosalind." 

Touch.  I  '11  rhyme  you  so  eight  years  together, 
dinners  and  suppers  and  sleeping-liours  excepted :  it  is 
the  right  butter-women's  rank  to  market. 

Ros.     Out,  fool ! 

Touch.     For  a  taste  : —  90 

"Tf  a  hart  do  lack  a  hind, 
Let  him  seek  out  Rosalind. 
If  the  cat  will  after  kind, 
So  be  sure  will  Rosalind. 
Winter  garments  must  be  lined, 
So  must  slender  Rosalind. 
They  that  reap  must  sheaf  and  biad  j 
Then  to  cart  with  Rosalind. 


44  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   III 

Sweetest  nut  hath  sourest  rind, 

Such  a  nut  is  Rosalind.  100 

He  that  sweetest  rose  will  find 

Must  find  love's  prick  and  Rosalind." 

This  is  the  very  false  gallop  of  verses:  why  do  you 
infect  yourself  with  them  ? 

Ros.     Peace,  you  dull  fool !   I  found  them  on  a  tree. 

Touch.     Truly,  the  tree  yields  bad  fruit. 

Ros.  I  '11  grafF  it  with  you,  and  then  I  shall  graff 
it  with  a  medlar :  then  it  will  be  the  earliest  fruit  i' 
the  country ;  for  you  '11  be  rotten  ere  you  be  half  ripe, 
and  that's  the  right  virtue  of  the  medlar.  no 

Touch.  You  have  said ;  but  whether  wisely  or  no, 
let  the  forest  judge. 

Enter  Celia,  tvith  a  writing. 

Ros.     Peace ! 
Here  comes  my  sister,  reading:    stand  aside. 
Cel.      [Beads] 

"  Why  should  this  a  desert  be  ? 

For  it  is  unpeopled  ?     No  ; 
Tongues  I'll  hang  on  every  tree, 

That  shall  civil  sayings  show  : 
Some,  how  brief  the  life  of  man 

Runs  his  erring  pilgrimage, 
That  the  stretching  of  a  span  120 

Buckles  in  his  sum  of  age  ; 
Some,  of  violated  vows 

'Tvvixt  the  souls  of  friend  and  friend  : 
But  upon  the  fairest  boughs, 

Or  at  every  sentence  end. 
Will  I  Rosalinda  write, 

Teaching  all  that  read  to  know 
The  quintessence  of  every  sprite 

Heaven  would  in  little  show. 


SCENE   II]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  45 

Therefore  Heaven  Nature  charged  130 

That  one  body  should  be  tilPd 
With  all  graces  wide-enlarged  : 

Nature  presently  distill'd 
Helen's  cheek,  but  not  her  heart, 

Cleopatra's  majesty, 
Atalanta's  better  part, 

Sad  Lucretia's  modesty. 
Thus  Rosalind  of  many  parts 

By  heavenly  synod  was  devised, 
Of  many  faces,  eyes  and  hearts,  140 

To  have  the  touches  dearest  prized. 
Heaven  would  that  she  these  gifts  should  have, 
And  I  to  live  and  die  her  slave."' 

Eos.  O  most  gentle  pulpiter  !  what  tedious  homily  of 
love  have  you  wearied  your  parishioners  withal,  and 
never  cried,  *  Have  patience,  good  people  ' ! 

Cel.  How  now !  back,  friends !  Shepherd,  go  off  a 
little.     Go  with  him,  sirrah. 

Touch.  Come,  shepherd,  let  us  make  an  honourable 
retreat;  though  not  with  bag  and  baggage,  yet  with 
scrip   and    SCrippage.  [Exeunt  Corin  and   Touchstone. 

Cel.     Didst  thou  hear  these  verses  ?  152 

Ros.  O,  yes,  I  heard  them  all,  and  more  too ;  for 
some  of  them  had  in  them  more  feet  than  the  verses 
would  bear. 

Cel.  That's  no  matter  :  the  feet  might  bear  tlie 
verses. 

Ros.  Ay,  but  the  feet  were  lame  and  could  not  bear 
themselves  without  the  verse  and  therefore  stood  lamely 
in  the  verse.  160 

Cel.  But  didst  thou  hear  without  wondering  how  thy 
name  should  be  hanged  and  carved  upon  these  trees  ? 


46  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT   III 

Ros.  I  was  seven  of  the  nine  days  out  of  the  wonder 
before  you  came ;  for  look  here  what  I  found  on  a  pahn- 
tree.  I  was  never  so  be-rhymed  since  Pythagoras'  time, 
that  I  was  an  Irish  rat,  which  I  can  hardly  remember. 

Cel.     Trow  you  who  hath  done  this  ? 

Ros.     Is  it  a  man  ? 

Cel.  And  a  chain,  that  you  once  wore,  about  his  neck. 
Change  you  colour  ?  170 

Ros.     I  prithee,  who  ? 

Cel.  O  Lord,  Lord !  It  is  a  hard  matter  for  friends 
to  meet;  but  mountains  may  be  removed  with  earth- 
quakes and  so  encounter. 

Ros.     Nay,  but  who  is  it  ? 

Cel.     Is  it  possible  ? 

Ros.  Nay,  I  prithee  now  with  most  petitionary 
vehemence,  tell  me  who  it  is. 

Cel.  O  wonderful,  wonderful,  and  most  wonderful 
wonderful !  and  yet  again  wonderful,  and  after  that, 
out  of  all  hooping !  ISI 

Ros.  Good  my  complexion  !  dost  thou  think,  though 
I  am  caparisoned  like  a  man,  I  have  a  doublet  and  hose 
in  my  disposition  ?  One  inch  of  delay  more  is  a  South- 
sea  of  discovery;  I  prithee,  tell  me  who  is  it  quickly, 
and  speak  apace.  I  would  thou  couldst  stammer,  that 
thou  mightst  pour  this  concealed  man  out  of  thy  mouth, 
as  wine  comes  out  of  a  narrow-mouthed  bottle,  either 
too  much  at  once,  or  none  at  all.  I  prithee,  take  the 
cork  out  of  thy  mouth  that  I  may  drink  thy  tidings. 
Is  he  of  God's  making  ?  What  manner  of  man  ?  Is 
his  head  worth  a  hat,  or  his  chin  worth  a  beard  ?  192 

Cel.     Nay,  he  hath  but  a  little  beard. 


SCENE   II]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  47 

Ros.  Why,  God  will  send  more,  if  the  man  will  be 
thankful :  let  me  stay  the  growth  of  his  beard,  if  thou 
delay  me  not  the  knowledge  of  his  chin. 

Cel.  It  is  young  Orlando  that  tripped  up  the 
wrestler's  heels  and  your  heart  both  in  an  instant. 

Ros.  Nay,  but  the  devil  take  mocking:  speak,  sad 
brow  and  true  maid.  200 

Cel.     I'  faith,  coz,  'tis  he. 

Ros.     Orlando  ? 

Cel.     Orlando. 

Ros.  Alas  the  day  !  what  shall  I  do  with  my  doublet 
and  hose  ?  What  did  he  when  thou  sawest  him  ? 
What  said  he  ?  How  looked  he  ?  Wherein  went  he  ? 
What  makes  he  here  ?  Did  he  ask  for  me  ?  Where 
remains  he  ?  How  parted  he  with  thee  ?  and  when 
shalt  thou  see  him  again  ?     Answer  me  in  one  word.    209 

Cel.  You  must  borrow  me  Gargantua's  mouth  first: 
'tis  a  word  too  great  for  any  mouth  of  this  age's  size. 
To  say  "  Ay  "  and  "  No  "  to  these  particulars  is  more 
than  to  answer  in  a  catechism. 

Ros.  But  doth  he  know  that  I  am  in  this  forest  and 
in  man's  apparel  ?  Looks  he  as  freshly  as  he  did  the 
day  he  wrestled  ? 

Cel.  It  is  as  easy  to  count  atomies  as  to  resolve  the 
propositions  of  a  lover  :  but  take  a  taste  of  my  finding 
him,  and  relish  it  with  good  observance.  I  found  him 
under  a  tree,  like  a  dropped  acorn.  220 

Ros.  It  may  well  be  called  Jove's  tree,  when  it  drops 
forth  such  fruit. 

Cel.     Give  me  audience,  good  madam. 

Ros.     Proceed. 


48  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT  III 

Gel.  There  lay  he  stretched  along,  like  a  wounded 
knight. 

Ros.  Though  it  be  pity  to  see  such  a  sight,  it  well 
becomes  the  ground. 

Cel.  Cry  '  holla '  to  thy  tongue,  I  prithee  ;  it  curvets 
unseasonably.     He  was  furnished  like  a  hunter.        230 

Ros.     O,  ominous !   he  comes  to  kill  my  heart. 

Gel.  I  would  sing  my  song  without  a  burden :  thou 
bringest  me  out  of  tune. 

Ros.  Do  you  not  know  I  am  a  woman  ?  when  I 
think,  I  must  speak.     Sweet,  say  on. 

Gel.     You  bring  me  out.     Soft!   comes  he  not  here? 

Enter  Orlando  and  Jaques. 

Ros.     'Tis  he:   slink  by,  and  note  him. 

Jaq.  I  thank  you  for  your  company ;  but,  good  faith, 
I  had  as  lief  have  been  myself  alone. 

Orl.  And  so  had  I;  but  yet,  for  fashion  sake,  1 
thank  you  too  for  your  society.  241 

Jaq.     God  be  wi'  you  :  let's  meet  as  little  as  we  can. 

Orl.     I  do  desire  we  may  be  better  strangers. 

Jaq.  I  pray  you,  mar  no  more  trees  with  writing 
love-songs  in  their  barks. 

Orl.  I  pray  you,  mar  no  more  of  my  verses  witli 
reading  them  ill-favouredly. 

Jaq.     Rosalind  is  your  love's  name  ? 

Orl.     Yes,  just. 

Jaq.     I  do  not  like  her  name.  250 

Orl.  There  was  no  thought  of  pleasing  you  when 
she  was  christened. 

Jaq.     What  stature  is  she  of? 

Orl.     Just  as  high  as  my  heart. 


SCENE   II]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  49 

Jaq.  You  are  full  of  pretty  answers.  Have  you  not 
been  acquainted  with  goldsmiths'  wives,  and  conned 
them  out  of  rings  ? 

Orl.  Not  so ;  but  I  answer  you  right  painted  cloth, 
from  whence  you  have  studied  your  questions.  259 

Jaq.  You  have  a  nimble  wit :  I  think  'twas  made  of 
Atalanta's  heels.  Will  you  sit  down  with  me  ?  and  we 
two  will  rail  against  our  mistress  the  world  and  all 
our  misery. 

Orl.  I  will  chide  no  breather  in  the  world  but 
myself,  against  whom  I  know  most  faults. 

Jaq.     The  worst  fault  you  have  is  to  be  in  love. 

Orl.  'Tis  a  fault  I  will  not  change  for  your  best 
virtue.     I  am  weary  of  you. 

Jaq.  By  my  troth,  I  was  seeking  for  a  fool  when 
I  found  you.  270 

Orl.  He  is  drowned  in  the  brook :  look  but  in,  and 
you  shall  see  him. 

Jaq.     There  I  shall  see  mine  own  figure. 

Orl.     Which  I  take  to  be  either  a  fool  or  a  cipher. 

Jaq.  I'll  tarry  no  longer  with  you :  farewell,  good 
Signior  Love. 

Orl.  I  am  glad  of  your  departure :  adieu,  good 
Monsieur  Melancholy.  [Exit  Jaquts. 

Ros.  [Aside  to  Celia]  I  will  speak  to  him  like  a  saucy 
lackey  and  under  that  habit  play  the  knave  with  him. 
Do  you  hear,  forester  ?  281 

Orl.     Very  well :    what  would  you  ? 

Ros.     I  pray  you,  what  is  't  o'clock  ? 

Orl.  You  should  ask  me  what  time  o'day:  there's 
no  clock  in  the  forest. 


50  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT  III 

Ros.  Then  there  is  no  true  lover  in  the  forest ;  else 
sighing  every  minute  and  groaning  every  hour  would 
detect  the  lazy  foot  of  Time  as  well  as  a  clock. 

Orl.  And  why  not  the  swift  foot  of  Time  ?  had  not 
that  been  as  proper  ?  290 

Ros.  By  no  means,  sir :  Time  travels  in  divers  paces 
with  divers  persons.  I'll  tell  you  who  Time  ambles 
withal,  who  Time  trots  withal,  who  Time  gallops  withal, 
and  who  he  stands  still  withal. 

Orl.     I  prithee,  who  doth  he  trot  withal  ? 

Ros.  Marry,  he  trots  hard  with  a  young  maid  be- 
tween the  contract  of  her  marriage  and  the  day  it  is 
solemnized:  if  the  interim  be  but  a  sennight,  Time's 
pace  is  so  hard  tliat  it  seems  the  length  of  seven  year. 

Orl.     Who  ambles  Time  withal  ?  300 

Ros.  With  a  priest  that  lacks  Latin  and  a  rich  man 
that  hath  not  the  gout,  for  the  one  sleeps  easily  because 
he  cannot  study  and  the  other  lives  merrily  because 
he  feels  no  pain;  the  one  lacking  the  burden  of  lean 
and  wasteful  learning,  the  other  knowing  no  burden  of 
heavy  tedious  penury ;   these  Time  ambles  withal. 

Orl.     Who  doth  he  gallop  withal  ? 

Ros.  With  a  thief  to  the  gallows,  for  though  he  go  as 
softly  as  foot  can  fall,  he  thinks  himself  too  soon  there. 

Orl.     Who  stays  it  still  withal  ?  310 

Ros.  With  lawyers  in  the  vacation  :  for  they  sleep 
between  term  and  term  and  then  they  perceive  not 
how  Time  moves. 

Orl.     Where  dwell  you,  pretty  youth  ? 

Ros.  With  this  shepherdess,  my  sister;  here  in  the 
skirts  of  the  forest,  like  fringe  upon  a  petticoat. 

Orl.     Are  you  native  of  this  place? 


SCENE   II]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  51 

Ros.  As  the  cony  that  you  see  dwell  where  she  is 
kindled. 

Orl.  Your  accent  is  something  finer  than  you  could 
purchase  in  so  removed  a  dwelling.  321 

Eos.  I  have  been  told  so  of  many:  but  indeed  an 
old  religious  uncle  of  mine  taught  me  to  speak,  who  was 
in  his  youth  an  inland  man :  one  that  knew  courtship 
too  well,  for  there  he  fell  in  love.  I  have  heard  him 
read  many  lectures  against  it,  and  I  thank  God  I  am 
not  a  woman,  to  be  touched  with  so  many  giddy  offences 
as  he  hath  generally  taxed  their  whole  sex  withal. 

Orl.  Can  you  remember  any  of  the  principal  evils 
that  he  laid  to  the  charge  of  women  ?  330 

Ros.  There  were  none  principal :  they  were  all  like 
one  another  as  half-pence  are,  every  one  fault  seeming 
monstrous  till  his  fellow-fault  came  to  match  it. 

Orl.     I  prithee,  recount  some  of  them. 

Ros.  No,  I  will  not  cast  away  my  physic  but  on 
those  that  are  sick.  There  is  a  man  haunts  the  forest, 
that  abuses  our  young  plants  with  carving  '  Rosalind ' 
on  their  barks ;  hangs  odes  upon  hawthorns  and  elegies 
on  brambles,  all,  forsooth,  deifying  the  name  of  Rosalind : 
if  I  could  meet  that  fancy  monger,  I  would  give  him 
some  good  counsel,  for  he  seems  to  have  the  quotidian 
of  love  upon  him.  342 

Orl.  I  am  he  that  is  so  love-shaked :  I  pray  you,  tell 
me  your  remedy. 

Ros.  There  is  none  of  my  uncle's  marks  upon  you  : 
he  taught  me  how  to  know  a  man  in  love ;  in  which* 
cage  of  rushes  I  am  sure  you  are  not  prisoner. 

What  were  his  marks  ?  348 


52  AS   YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT   III 

Ros.  A  lean  cheek,  which  you  have  not ;  a  blue  eye 
and  sunken,  which  you  have  not ;  an  unquestionable 
spirit,  which  you  have  not;  a  beard  neglected,  which 
you  have  not ;  but  I  pardon  you  for  that,  for  simply 
your  having  in  beard  is  a  younger  brother's  revenue: 
then  your  hose  should  be  ungartered,  your  bonnet  un- 
banded,  your  sleeve  unbuttoned,  your  shoe  untied  and 
every  thing  about  you  demonstrating  a  careless  desola- 
tion ;  but  you  are  no  such  man ;  you  are  rather  point- 
device  in  your  accoutrements  as  loving  yourself  than 
seeming  the  lover  of  any  other.  359 

Orl.  Fair  youth,  I  would  I  could  make  thee  believe  I 
love. 

Ros.  Me  believe  it !  you  maj^  as  soon  make  her  that 
you  love  believe  it :  which,  I  warrant,  she  is  apter  to  do 
than  to  confess  she  does :  that  is  one  of  the  points  in  the 
which  women  still  give  the  lie  to  their  consciences.  But, 
in  good  sooth,  are  j^ou  he  that  hangs  the  verses  on  the 
trees,  wherein  Rosalind  is  so  admired  ?  367 

Orl.  I  swear  to  thee,  youth,  by  the  white  hand  of 
Rosalind,  I  am  that  he,  that  unfortunate  he. 

Ros.  But  are  you  so  much  in  love  as  your  rhymes 
speak  ? 

Orl.  Neither  rhyme  nor  reason  can  express  how 
much. 

Ros.  Love  is  merely  a  madness,  and,  I  tell  you, 
deserves  as  well  a  dark  house  and  a  whip  as  madmen 
do  :  and  the  reason  why  they  are  not  so  punished  and 
cured  is,  tliat  the  lunacy  is  so  ordinary  that  the  whippers 
are  in  love  too.     Yet  I  profess  curing  it  by  counsel.      378 

Orl.     Did  you  ever  cure  any  so  ? 


SCENE   IlJ  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  53 

Ros.  Yes,  one,  and  in  this  manner.  He  was  to  im- 
agine me  his  love,  his  mistress ;  and  I  set  him  every  day 
to  woo  me :  at  which  time  would  I,  being  but  a  moonish 
youtli,  grieve,  be  effeminate,  changeable,  longing  and 
liking,  proud,  fantastical,  apish,  shallow,  inconstant,  full 
of  tears,  full  of  smiles,  for  every  passion  some  thing  and 
for  no  passion  truly  any  thing,  as  boys  and  Avomen  are 
for  the  most  part  cattle  of  this  colour ;  would  now  like 
him,  now  loathe  him  ;  then  entertain  him  ;  then  forswear 
him  ;  now  weep  for  him,  then  spit  at  him  ;  that  I  drave 
my  suitor  from  his  mad  humour  of  love  to  a  living 
humour  of  madness;  which  was,  to  forswear  the  full 
stream  of  the  world  and  to  live  in  a  nook  merely 
monastic.  And  thus  I  cured  him ;  and  this  way  wull 
I  take  upon  me  to  wash  your  liver  as  clean  as  a 
sound  sheep's  heart,  that  there  shall  not  be  one  spot 
of  love  in't.  396 

Or^l.     I  would  not  be  cured,  youth. 

Ros.  I  w^ould  cure  you,  if  you  would  but  call  me 
Rosalind  and  come  every  day  to  my  cote  and  w^oo  me. 

Orl.  Now,  by  the  faith  of  my  love,  I  will :  tell  me 
w^here  it  is. 

Ros.  Go  w^ith  me  to  it  and  I'll  show  it  you  :  and  by 
the  Avay  you  shall  tell  me  where  in  the  forest  you  live. 
Will  you  go  ? 

Orl.     With  all  my  heart,  good  youth.  405 

Ros.  Nay,  you  must  call  me  Rosalind.  Come,  sister, 
wdll  you  go  ?  [Exeunt. 


64  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT  III 

Scene  III.     The  forest. 
Enter  Touchstone  and  Audrey  ;   Jaques  behind. 

Touch.  Come  apace,  good  Audrey :  I  will  fetch  up 
your  goats,  Audrey.  And  how,  Audrey  ?  am  I  the  man 
yet  ?    doth  my  simple  feature  content  you  ? 

And.  Your  features !  Lord  warrant  us !  what 
features  ? 

Touch.  I  am  here  with  thee  and  thy  goats,  as  the 
most  capricious  poet,  honest  Ovid,  was  among  the  Goths. 

Jaq.  [Aside^  O  knowledge  ill-inhabited,  worse  than 
Jove  in  a  thatched  house !  9 

Touch.  When  a  man's  verses  cannot  be  understood, 
nor  a  man's  good  wit  seconded  with  the  forward  child 
Understanding,  it  strikes  a  man  more  dead  than  a  great 
reckoning  in  a  little  room.  Truly,  I  would  the  gods  had 
made  thee  poetical. 

Aud.  I  do  not  know  what  'poetical'  is:  is  it  honest 
in  deed  and  word  ?   is  it  a  true  thing  ? 

Touch.  No,  truly ;  for  the  truest  poetry  is  the  most 
feigning ;  and  lovers  are  given  to  poetry,  and  what  they 
swear  in  poetry  may  be  said  as  lovers  they  do  feign. 

Aud.  Do  you  wish  then  that  the  gods  had  made  me 
poetical  ?  2i 

Touch.  I  do,  truly ;  for  thou  swearest  to  me  thou  art 
honest:  now,  if  thou  wert  a  poet,  I  might  have  some 
hope  thou  didst  feign. 

And.     Would  you  not  have  me  honest  ? 

Touch.  No,  truly,  unless  thou  wert  hard-favoured : 
for  honesty  coupled  to  beauty  is  to  have  honey  a  sauce 
to  sugar. 


SCENE   III]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  55 

Jaq.     [Aside]  A  material  fool ! 

And.  Well,  I  am  not  fair  ;  and  therefore  I  pray  the 
gods  make  me  honest.  31 

Touch.  Truly,  and  to  cast  away  honesty  upon  a  foul 
slut  were  to  put  good  meat  into  an  unclean  dish. 

Aud.  I  am  not  a  slut,  though  I  thank  the  gods  I  am 
foul. 

Touch.  Well,  praised  be  the  gods  for  thy  foulness ! 
sluttishness  may  come  hereafter.  But  be  it  as  it  may 
be,  I  will  marry  thee,  and  to  that  end  I  have  been  with 
Sir  Oliver  Martext,  the  vicar  of  the  next  village,  who 
hath  promised  to  meet  me  in  this  place  of  the  forest  and 
to  couple  us.  41 

Jciq.     [Aside]  I  would  fain  see  this  meeting. 

Aud.     Well,  the  gods  give  us  joy  ! 

Touch.  Amen.  A  man  may,  if  he  were  of  a  fearful 
heart,  stagger  in  this  attempt ;  for  here  we  have  no 
temple  but  the  wood,  no  assembly  but  horn-beasts.  But 
what  though  ?     Courage  !     Here  comes  Sir  Oliver. 

Enter  Sir  Oliver  Martext. 
Sir  Oliver  Martext,  you  are  well  met :   will  you  dispatch 
us  here  under  this  tree,  or  shall  we  go  with  you  to  your 
chapel  ?  50 

Sir  Oli.     Is  there  none  here  to  give  the  woman  ? 

Touch.     I  will  not  take  her  on  gift  of  any  man. 

Sir  Oli.  Truly,  she  must  be  given,  or  the  marriage  is 
not  lawful. 

Jaq.     [Advancing]  Proceed,  proceed  :    I'll  give  her. 

Touch.  Good  even,  good  Master  What-ye-call 't :  how 
do  you,  sir  ?     You  are  very  well  met :    God  'ild  you  for 


56  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT  III 

your  last  company  :    I  am  very  glad  to  see  you :    even  a 
toy  in  hand  here,  sir:    nay,  pray  be  covered. 

Jaq.     Will  you  be  married,  motley  ?  60 

Touch.  As  the  ox  hath  his  bow,  sir,  the  horse  his 
curb  and  the  falcon  her  bells,  so  man  hath  his  desires ; 
and  as  pigeons  bill,  so  wedlock  would  be  nibbling. 

Jaq.  And  will  you,  being  a  man  of  your  breeding,  be 
married  under  a  bush  like  a  beggar  ?  Get  you  to  church, 
and  have  a  good  priest  that  can  tell  you  what  marriage 
is:  this  fellow  w^ill  but  join  you  together  as  they  join 
wainscot ;  then  one  of  you  will  prove  a  shrunk  panel 
and,  like  green  timber,  warp,  warp.  69 

Touch.  [Aside]  I  am  not  in  the  mind  but  I  were  better 
to  be  married  of  him  than  of  another :  for  he  is  not  like 
to  marry  me  well ;  and  not  being  well  married,  it  will 
be  a  good  excuse  for  me  hereafter  to  leave  my  wife. 

Jctq,     Go  thou  with  me,  and  let  me  counsel  thee. 

Touch,     Come,  sweet  Audrey  : 
Farewell,  good  Master  Oliver :    not, — 

"  O  sweet  Oliver, 
O  brave  Oliver, 
Leave  me  not  behind  thee  :  " 
but, — 

"  Wind  away,  •  80 

Begone,  I  say, 
I  will  not  to  wedding  with  thee." 

[Exeunt  Jaques,  Touchstone  and  Audrey. 

Sir  Oli.     'Tis  no  matter :  ne'er  a  fantastical  knave  of 
them  all  shall  flout  me  out  of  my  calling.  [Exit. 


SCENE   IV]  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  57 

Scene  IV.     The  forest. 
Enter  Rosalind  and  Celia. 

Ros.     Never  talk  to  me ;   I  will  weep. 

Cd.  Do,  I  prithee ;  but  yet  have  the  grace  to  con- 
sider that  tears  do  not  become  a  man. 

Ros,     But  have  I  not  cause  to  weep  ? 

Cel.  As  good  cause  as  one  would  desire ;  therefore 
weep. 

Ros.     His  very  hair  is  of  the  dissembling  colour. 

Cel.  Something  browner  than  Judas's :  marry,  his 
kisses  are  Judas's  own  children. 

Rms.     I'  faith,  his  hair  is  of  a  good  colour.  lo 

Cel.  An  excellent  colour  :  your  chestnut  was  ever  the 
only  colour. 

Ros.  And  his  kissing  is  as  full  of  sanctity  as  the 
touch  of  holy  bread. 

Cel.  He  hath  bought  a  pair  of  cast  lips  of  Diana :  a 
nun  of  winter's  sisterhood  kisses  not  more  religiously : 
the  very  ice  of  chastity  is  in  them. 

Ros.  But  why  did  he  swear  he  would  come  this 
morning,  and  comes  not  ? 

Cel.     Nay,  certainly,  there  is  no  truth  in  him.        20 

Ros.     Do  you  think  so  ? 

Cel.  Yes ;  I  think  he  is  not  a  pick-purse  nor  a  horse- 
stealer, but  for  his  verity  in  love,  I  do  think  him  as 
concave  as  a  covered  goblet  or  a  worm-eaten  nut. 

Ros.     Not  true  in  love  ? 

Cel.     Yes,  when  he  is  in  ;  but  I  think  he  is  not  in. 

Ros.     You  have  heard  him  swear  downrio-ht  he  was. 


58  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT  III 

Cel.  *  Was '  is  not  *  is ' :  besides,  the  oath  of  a  lover  is 
no  stronger  than  the  word  of  a  tapster ;  they  are  both 
the  confirmer  of  false  reckonings.  He  attends  here  in 
the  forest  on  the  duke  your  father.  31 

Ros.  I  met  the  duke  yesterday  and  had  much 
question  with  him  :  he  asked  me  of  what  parentage  I 
was ;  I  told  him,  of  as  good  as  he ;  so  he  laughed  and  let 
me  go.  But  what  talk  we  of  fathers,  when  there  is 
such  a  man  as  Orlando? 

Cel.  O,  that's  a  brave  man !  he  writes  brave  verses, 
speaks  brave  words,  swears  brave  oaths  and  breaks  them 
bravely,  quite  traverse,  athwart  the  heart  of  his  lover; 
as  a  puisny  tilter,  that  spurs  his  horse  but  on  one  side, 
breaks  his  staff  like  a  noble  goose:  but  all's  brave  that 
youth  mounts  and  folly  guides.     Who  comes  here  ?       42 

Enter  Corin. 

Cor.     Mistress  and  master,  you  have  oft  enquired 
After  the  shepherd  that  complain'd  of  love. 
Who  you  saw  sitting  by  me  on  the  turf, 
Praising  the  proud  disdainful  shepherdess 
That  was  his  mistress. 

Cel.  Well,  and  what  of  him  ? 

Cor.     If  you  will  see  a  pageant  truly  play'd, 
Between  the  pale  complexion  of  true  love 
And  the  red  glow  of  scorn  and  proud  disdain,  50 

Go  hence  a  little  and  I  shall  conduct  you. 
If  you  will  mark  it. 

Ros.  O,  come,  let  us  remove  : 

The  sight  of  lovers  feedeth  those  in  love. 
Bring  us  to  this  sight,  and  you  shall  say 
I'll  prove  a  busy  actor  in  their  play.  [Exeunt. 


SCENE  V]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  59 

Scene  V.     Another  part  of  the  forest. 

Enter  Silvius  and  Phebk. 

Sil.     Sweet  Phebe,  do  not  scorn  me  ;  do  not,  Phebe ; 
Say  that  you  love  me  not,  but  say  not  so 
In  bitterness.     The  common  executioner, 
Whose  heart  the  accustom 'd  sight  of  death  makes  hard, 
Falls  not  the  axe  upon  the  humbled  neck 
But  first  begs  pardon:   will  you  sterner  be 
Than  he  that  dies  and  lives  by  bloody  drops  ? 

Enter  Rosalind,  Celia  and  Corin,  behind. 

Phe.     I  would  not  be  thy  executioner: 
I  fly  thee,  for  I  would  not  injure  thee. 
Thou  tell'st  me  there  is  murder  in  mine  eye:  lo 

'Tis  pretty,  sure,  and  very  probable, 
That  eyes,  that  are  the  frail'st  and  softest  things. 
Who  shut  their  coward  gates  on  atomies, 
Should  be  call'd  tyrants,  butchers,  murderers  ! 
Now  I  do  frown  on  thee  with  all  my  heart ; 
And  if  mine  eyes  can  wound,  now  let  them  kill  thee : 
Now  counterfeit  to  swoon;   why  now  fall  down; 
Or  if  thou  canst  not,  O,  for  shame,  for  shame, 
Lie  not,  to  say  mine  eyes  are  murderers  1 
Now  show  the  wound  mine  eye  hath  made  in  thee  :       20 
Scratch  thee  but  with  a  pin,  and  there  remains 
Some  scar  of  it;   lean  but  upon  a  rush. 
The  cicatrice  and  capable  impressure 
Thy  palm  some  moment  keeps  ;    but  now  mine  eyes, 
Which  I  have  darted  at  thee,  hurt  thee  not, 
Nor,  I  am  sure,  there  is  no  force  in  eyes 
That  can  do  hurt. 


60  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   III 

Sil  O  dear  Phebe, 

If  ever, — as  that  ever  may  be  near,— 
You  meet  in  some  fresh  cheek  the  power  of  fancy, 
Then  shall  j^ou  know  the  wounds  invisible  30 

That  love's  keen  arrows  make. 

Phe.  But  till  that  time 

Come  not  thou  near  me :  and  when  that  time  comes, 
Afflict  me  with  thy  mocks,  pity  me  not; 
As  till  that  time  I  shall  not  pity  thee. 

Ros.     And  why,  I  pray  you  ?    Who  miglit  be  your 
mother, 
That  you  insult,  exult,  and  all  at  once, 
Over  the  wretched  ?    What  though  you  have  no  beauty, — 
As,  by  my  faith,  I  see  no  more  in  j^ou 
Than  without  candle  may  go  dark  to  bed —  40 

Must  you  be  therefore  proud  and  pitiless  ? 
Why,  what  means  this  ?     Why  do  you  look  on  me  ? 
I  see  no  more  in  you  than  in  tlie  ordinary 
Of  nature's  sale- work.     'Od's  my  little  life, 
I  tliink  she  means  to  tangle  my  ej^es  too  ! 
No,  faith,  proud  mistress,  hope  not  after  it: 
'Tis  not  your  inky  brows,  your  black  silk  hair. 
Your  bugle  eyeballs,  nor  your  cheek  of  cream, 
That  can  entame  my  spirits  to  your  worship. 
You  foolish  shepherd,  wherefore  do  you  follow  her,        50 
Like  foggy  south  puffing  with  wind  and  rain  ? 
You  are  a  thousand  times  a  properer  man 
Than  she  a  woman  :    'tis  such  fools  as  you 
That  makes  the  world  full  of  ill-favour'd  children : 
'Tis  not  her  glass,  but  you,  that  flatters  her; 
And  out  of  3^ou  she  sees  herself  more  proper 
Than  any  of  her  lineaments  can  show  her. 


SCENE  V]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  61 

But,  mistress,  know  yourself:   down  on  your  knees, 
And  tliank  heaven,  fastinc;,  for  a  (jood  man's  love : 
For  I  must  tell  you  friendly  in  your  ear,  60 

Sell  when  you  can :   you  are  not  for  all  markets  : 
Cry  the  man  mercy ;   love  him  ;   take  his  offer : 
Foul  is  most  foul,  beincr  foul  to  be  a  scoffer. 
So  take  her  to  thee,  shepherd:   fare  you  well. 

Phe.  Sweet  youth,  I  pray  you,  chide  a  year  together : 
I  had  rather  hear  you  chide  than  this  man  woo. 

Ros.  He's  fallen  in  love  with  your  foulness  and 
she'll  fall  in  love  with  my  anger.  If  it  be  so,  as  fast  as 
she  answers  thee  with  frowning  looks,  I'll  sauce  her 
with  bitter  words.     Why  look  you  so  upon  me  ?  70 

Phe.     For  no  ill  will  I  bear  you. 

Ros.     I  pray  you,  do  not  fall  in  love  with  me. 
For  I  am  falser  tlian  vows  made  in  wine : 
Besides,  I  like  you  not.     If  you  will  know  my  liouse, 
'Tis  at  the  tuft  of  olives  here  hard  by. 
Will  you  go,  sister  ?     Shepherd,  ply  her  hard. 
Come,  sister.     Shepherdess,  look  on  him  better, 
And  be  not  proud  :  though  all  the  world  could  see, 
None  could  be  so  abused  in  sight  as  he.  79 

Come,  to  our  flock.  [Exeunt  liosaHnd,   Celia  and  Covin. 

Phe.     Dead  shepherd,  now  I  find  thy  saw  of  might, 
'  Who  ever  loved  that  loved  not  at  first  sight  ? ' 

Sil.     Sweet  Pliebe, — 

Plie.  Ha,  what  say'st  thou,  Silvius  ? 

Sil.     Sweet  Phebe,  pity  me. 

Phe.     Why,  I  am  sorry  for  thee,  gentle  Silvius. 

Sil.     Wherever  sorrow  is,  relief  would  be  : 
If  you  do  sorrow  at  my  grief  in  love. 


62  AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  III 

By  giving  love  your  sorrow  and  my  grief 
Were  both  extermined. 

Phe.     Thou  hast  my  love :  is  not  that  neighbourly  ?     90 
Sil.     I  would  have  you. 

Pile,  Why,  that  were  covetousness. 

Silvius,  the  time  was  that  I  hated  thee, 
And  yet  it  is  not  that  I  bear  thee  love ; 
But  since  that  thou  canst  talk  of  love  so  well, 
Thy  company,  which  erst  was  irksome  to  me, 
I  will  endure,  and  I'll  employ  thee  too : 
But  do  not  look  for  further  recompense 
Than  thine  own  gladness  that  thou  art  employ'd. 

Sil.     So  holy  and  so  perfect  is  my  love. 
And  I  in  such  a  poverty  of  grace,  100 

That  I  shall  think  it  a  most  plenteous  crop 
To  glean  the  broken  ears  after  the  man 
That  the  main  harvest  reaps :  loose  now  and  then 
A  scatter'd  smile,  and  that  I'll  live  upon. 

Phe.     Know'st  thou   the  youth   that    spoke    to    me 
erewhile  ? 

Sil.    Not  very  well,  but  I  have  met  him  oft ; 
And  he  hath  bought  the  cottage  and  the  bounds 
That  the  old  carlot  once  was  master  of. 

Phe.     Think  not  I  love  him,  though  I  ask  for  him  ;     no 
'Tis  but  a  peevish  boy ;  yet  he  talks  well ; 
But  what  care  I  for  words  ?   yet  words  do  well 
When  he  that  speaks  them  pleases  those  that  hear. 
It  is  a  pretty  youth :   not  very  pretty : 
But,  sure,  he's  proud,  and  yet  his  pride  becomes  him : 
He  '11  make  a  proper  man  :   the  best  thing  in  him 
Is  his  complexion ;  and  faster  than  his  tongue 


SCENE   V]  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  63 

Did  make  offence  his  eye  did  heal  it  up. 

He  is  not  very  tall  ;  yet  for  his  years  he 's  tall : 

His  leg  is  but  so  so ;  and  yet  'tis  well :  120 

There  was  a  pretty  redness  in  his  lip, 

A  little  riper  and  more  lusty  red 

Than  that  mix'd  in  his  cheek ;  'twas  just  the  difference 

Betwixt  the  constant  red  and  mingled  damask. 

There  be  some  women,  Silvius,  had  they  mark'd  him 

In  parcels  as  I  did,  would  have  gone  near 

To  fall  in  love  with  him :  but,  for  my  part, 

I  love  him  not  nor  hate  him  not ;  and  yet 

I  have  more  cause  to  hate  him  than  to  love  him : 

For  what  had  he  to  do  to  chide  at  me  ?  130 

He  said  mine  eyes  were  black  and  my  hair  black ; 

And,  now  I  am  remember'd,  scorn'd  at  me : 

I  marvel  why  I  answer'd  not  again : 

But  that 's  all  one ;  omittance  is  no  quittance. 

I'll  write  to  him  a  very  taunting  letter, 

And  thou  shalt  bear  it :  wilt  thou,  Silvius  ? 

Sil.     Phebe,  with  all  my  heart. 

Phe,  I'll  write  it  straight ; 

The  matter 's  in  my  head  and  in  my  heart : 
I  will  be  bitter  with  him  and  passing  short. 
Go  with  me,  Silvius.  [Exeunt.     140 


64  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT   IV 

ACT   IvJiW^ 

Scene  I.     The  forest. 
Enter  Rosalind,  Celia  and  Jaques. 

Jaq.  I  prithee,  pretty  youth,  let  me  be  better  ac- 
quainted with  thee. 

Ros.     They  say  you  are  a  melancholy  fellow. 

Jaq.     I  am  so ;  I  do  love  it  better  than  laughing. 

Ros.  Those  that  are  in  extremity  of  either  are 
abominable  fellows  and  betray  themselves  to  every 
modern  censure  worse  than  drunkards. 

Jaq.     Why,  'tis  good  to  be  sad  and  say  nothing. 

Ros.     Why  then,  'tis  good  to  be  a  post.  9 

Jaq.  I  have  neither  the  scholar's  melancholy,  which 
is  emulation;  nor  the  musician's,  which  is  fantastical; 
nor  the  courtier's,  which  is  proud;  nor  the  soldier's, 
which  is  ambitious;  nor  the  lawyer's,  which  is  politic; 
nor  the  lady's,  which  is  nice ;  nor  the  lover's,  which  is  all 
these :  but  it  is  a  melancholy  of  mine  own,  compounded 
of  many  simples,  extracted  from  many  objects,  and  in- 
deed the  sundry  contemplation  of  my  travels,  in  which 
my  often  rumination  wraps  me  in  a  most  humorous 
sadness.  19 

Ros.  A  traveller  !  By  my  faith,  you  have  great  reason 
to  be  sad :  I  fear  you  have  sold  your  own  lands  to  see 
other  men's ;  then,  to  have  seen  much  and  to  have 
aothing,  is  to  have  rich  eyes  and  poor  hands. 

Jaq.     Yes,  I  have  gained  my  experience. 

Ros.  And  your  experience  makes  you  sad:  I  had 
rather  have  a  fool  to  make  me  merry  than  experience  to 
make  me  sad  ;  and  to  travel  for  it  too  ! 


SCENE   l]  AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  65 

Elder  Orlando. 

Orl.     Good  day  and  happiness,  dear  Rosalind  ! 

Jaq.  Nay,  then  God  be  wi'  you,  an  you  talk  in 
blank  verse.  [Exit.     30 

Ros.  Farewell,  Monsieur  Traveller;  look  you  lisp 
and  wear  strange  suits,  disable  all  the  benefits  of  your 
own  countr}^  be  out  of  love  with  your  nativity  and 
almost  chide  God  for  making  j^ou  that  countenance  you 
are,  or  T  will  scarce  think  you  have  swam  in  a  gondola. 
Why,  how  now,  Orlando  !  where  have  you  been  all  this 
while  ?  You  a  lover !  An  you  serve  me  such  another 
trick,  never  come  in  my  sight  more. 

OrL  My  fair  Rosalind,  I  come  within  an  hour  of  my 
promise.  40 

Ros.  Break  an  hour's  promise  in  love  !  He  that  will 
divide  a  minute  into  a  thousand  parts  and  break  but 
a  part  of  the  thousandth  part  of  a  minute  in  the  affairs 
of  love,  it  may  be  said  of  him  that  Cupid  hath  clapped 
him  o'  the  shoulder,  but  I'll  warrant  him  heart-whole. 

Orl.     Pardon  me,  dear  Rosalind. 

Ros.  Nay,  an  j^ou  be  so  tardy,  come  no  more  in  my 
sight :   I  had  as  lief  be  wooed  of  a  snail. 

Orl.     Of  a  snail  ?  49 

Ros.  Ay,  of  a  snail ;  for  though  he  comes  slowly, 
^e  carries  his  house  on  his  head ;  a  better  jointure, 
I  think,  than  you  make  a  woman.  Am .  I  your 
Rosalind  ? 

Cel.  It  pleases  him  to  call  you  so  ;  but  he  hath  a 
Rosalind  of  a  better  leer  than  you. 

Ros.  Come,  woo  me,  woo  me,  for  now  I  am  in  a 
holiday   humour   and   like   enough   to   consent.     What 


66  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   IV 

would  you  say  to  me  now,  an  I  were  your  very  very 
Rosalind  ? 

Orl.     I  would  kiss  before  1  spoke.  60 

Ros.  Nay,  you  were  better  speak  first,  and  when 
you  were  gravelled  for  lack  of  matter,  you  might  take 
occasion  to  kiss.  Very  good  orators,  when  they  are  out, 
they  will  spit ;  and  for  lovers  lacking — God  warn  us ! — 
matter,  the  cleanliest  shift  is  to  kiss. 

Orl.     How  if  the  kiss  be  denied  ? 

Ros.  Then  she  puts  you  to  entreaty,  and  there  begins 
new  matter. 

Orl.  Who  could  be  out,  being  before  his  beloved 
mistress  ?  70 

Ros.     Marry,  that  should  you,  if  I  were  your  mistress. 

Orl.     What,  of  my  suit  ? 

Ros.  Not  out  of  your  apparel,  and  yet  out  of  your 
suit.     Am  not  I  your  Rosalind  ? 

Orl.  I  take  some  joy  to  say  you  are,  because  I  would 
be  talking  of  her. 

Ros.     Well  in  her  person  I  say  I  will  not  have  yoiL 

Orl.     Then  in  mine  own  person  I  die.  78 

Ros.  No,  faith,  die  by  attorney.  The  poor  world  is 
almost  six  thousand  years  old,  and  in  all  this  time  there 
was  not  any  man  died  in  his  own  person  ;  videlicet,  in  a 
love-cause.  Troilus  had  his  brains  dashed  out  with  a 
Grecian  club ;  yet  he  did  what  he  could  to  die  before, 
and  he  is  one  of  the  patterns  of  love.  Leander,  he  would 
have  lived  many  a  fair  year,  though  Hero  had  turned 
nun,  if  it  had  not  been  for  a  hot  midsummer  night ;  for, 
good  youth,  he  went  but  forth  to  wash  him  in  the 
Hellespont  and  being  taken  with  the  cramp  was 
drowned ;  and  the  foolish  chroniclers  of  that  age  found 


SCENE  l]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  67 

it  was  '  Hero  of  Sestos.'  But  these  are  all  lies  :  men 
have  died  from  time  to  time  and  worms  have  eaten 
them,  but  not  for  love.  92 

Orl.  I  would  not  have  my  right  Rosalind  of  this 
mind,  for  I  protest,  her  frown  might  kill  me. 

Ros.  By  this  hand,  it  will  not  kill  a  fly.  But  come, 
now  I  will  be  your  Rosalind  in  a  more  coming-on  dis- 
position, and  ask  me  what  you  will,  I  will  grant  it. 

Orl.     Then  love  me,  Rosalind. 

Eos.     Yes,  faith,  will  I,  Fridays  and  Saturdays  and  all. 

Orl.     And  wilt  thou  have  me?  100 

Ros.     Ay,  and  twenty  such. 

Orl.     What  sayest  thou  ? 

Ros.     Are  you  not  good  ? 

Orl.     I  hope  so. 

Ros.  Why  then,  can  one  desire  too  much  of  a  good 
thing  ?  Come,  sister,  you  shall  be  the  priest  and  marry 
us.  Give  me  your  hand,  Orlando.  What  do  you  say, 
sister  ? 

Orl.     Pray  thee,  marry  us. 

Cel.     I  cannot  say  the  words.  110 

Ros.     You  must  begin,  *  Will  you,  Orlando — ' 

Cel.  Go  to.  Will  you,  Orlando,  have  to  wife  this 
Rosalind  ? 

Orl.     I  will. 

Ros.     Ay,  but  when  ? 

Orl.     Why  now;   as  fast  as  she  can  marry  us. 

Ros.  Then  you  must  say  'I  take  thee,  Rosalind, 
for  wife.' 

Orl.     I  take  thee,  Rosalind,  for  wife.  119 

Ros.  I  might  ask  you  for  your  commission ;  but  I  do 
take  thee,  Orlando,  for  my  husband  :    there 's  a  girl  goes 


68  AS  YOU  LIKE   Iff  [act   IV 

before  the  priest ;  and  certainly  a  woman's  thought  runs 
before  her  actions. 

Orl.     So  do  all  thoughts ;    they  are  winged. 

Ros.  Now  tell  me  how  long  you  would  have  her 
after  you  have  possessed  her. 

Orl.     For  ever  and  a  day.  127 

Ros.  Say  '  a  day,'  without  the  '  ever.'  No,  no, 
Orlando ;  men  are  April  when  they  woo,  December  when 
they  wed :  maids  are  May  when  they  are  maids,  out  the 
sky  changes  when  they  are  wives.  I  will  be  more 
jealous  of  thee  than  a  Barbary  cock-pigeon  over  his  hen, 
more  clamorous  than  a  parrot  against  rain,  more  new- 
fangled than  an  ape,  more  giddy  in  my  desires  than 
a  monkey :  I  will  weep  for  nothing,  like  Diana  in  the 
fountain,  and  I  will  do  that  when  you  are  disposed  to  be 
merry ;  I  will  laugh  like  a  hyen,  and  that  when  thou  art 
inclined  to  sleep. 

Orl.     But  will  my  Rosalind  do  so? 

Ros.     By  my  life,  she  will  do  as  I  do.  140 

Orl.     0,  but  she  is  wise. 

Ros.  Or  else  she  could  not  have  the  wit  to  do  this : 
the  wiser,  the  way  warder :  make  the  doors  upon  a 
woman's  wit  and  it  will  out  at  the  casement ;  shut  that 
and  'twill  out  at  the  key-hole ;  stop  that,  'twill  fly  with 
the  smoke  out  at  the  chimney. 

Orl.     For  these  two  hours,  Rosalind,  I  will  leave  thee. 

Ros.     Alas  !  dear  love,  I  cannot  lack  thee  two  hours. 

Orl.  I  must  attend  tlie  duke  at  dinner:  by  two 
o'clock  I  will  be  with  thee  again.  150 

Ros.  Ay,  go  your  ways,  go  your  ways ;  I  knew  what 
you  would  prove :  my  friends  told  me  as  much,  and  I 
thought  no  less:   that  flattering  tongue  of  yours  won 


SCENE   l]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  69 

me :  'tis  but  one  cast  away,  and  so,  come,  death  I  Two 
o'clock  is  your  hour  ? 

Orl.     Ay,  sweet  Rosalind. 

Ros.  By  my  troth,  and  in  good  earnest,  and  so  God 
mend  me,  and  by  all  pretty  oaths  that  are  not  dangerous, 
if  you  break  one  jot  of  your  promise  or  come  one  minute 
behind  your  hour,  I  will  think  j^ou  the  most  pathetical 
break -promise  and  the  most  hollow  lover  and  the  most 
unworthy  of  her  you  call  Rosalind  that  may  be  chosen 
out  of  the  gross  band  of  the  unfaithful :  therefore  be- 
ware my  censure  and  keep  your  promise.  164 

Orl.  With  no  less  religion  than  if  thou  wert  indeed 
my  Rosalind  :   so  adieu. 

Ros.  Well,  Time  is  the  old  justice  that  examines  all 
such  offenders,  and  let  Time  try  :  adieu.  [ExU  Orlando. 

Cel.  Your  have  simply  misused  our  sex  in  your  love- 
prate:  we  must  have  your  doublet  and  hose  plucked 
over  your  head,  and  show  the  world  what  the  bird  hath 
done  to  her  own  nest.  172 

Ros.  O  coz,  coz,  coz,  my  pretty  little  coz,  that  thou 
didst  know  how  many  fathom  deep  I  am  in  love  !  But 
it  cannot  be  sounded:  my  affection  hath  an  unknown 
bottom,  like  the  bay  of  Portugal. 

Cel.  Or  rather,  bottomless,  that  as  fast  as  you  pour 
affection  in,  it  runs  out. 

Ros.  Xo,  that  same  blind  rascal!}'  boy  that  abuses 
every  one's  eyes  because  his  own  are  out,  let  him  be 
judge  how  deep  I  am  in  love.  I'll  tell  thee,  Aliena,  I 
cannot  be  out  of  the  sight  of  Orlando  :  I'll  go  find  a 
shadow  and  sigli  till  he  come.  183 

Cel.     And  I'll  sleep.  [^ceunt. 


70  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   IV 

Scene  II.     The  forest. 
Enter  Jaques,  Lords,  and  Foresters. 

Jag.     Which  is  he  that  killed  the  deer  ? 

A  Lord.     Sir,  it  was  I. 

Jaq.  Let's  present  him  to  the  duke,  like  a  Koman 
conqueror ;  and  it  would  do  well  to  set  the  deer's  horns 
upon  his  head,  for  a  branch  of  victory.  Have  you  no 
song,  forester,  for  this  purpose  ? 

For.     Yes,  sir. 

Jaq.  Sing  it :  'tis  no  matter  how  it  be  in  tune,  so  it 
make  noise  enough. 

Song. 

For.       «  What  shall  he  have  that  kill'd  the  deer  ?  10 

His  leather  skin  and  horns  to  wear. 
Then  sing  him  home  ; 

[The  rest  shall  bear  this  burden. 

Take  thou  no  scorn  to  wear  the  horn  ; 
It  was  a  crest  ere  thou  wast  born  : 

Thy  father's  father  wore  it, 

And  thy  father  bore  it  : 
The  horn,  the  horn,  the  lusty  horn 
Is  not  a  thing  to  laugh  to  scorn."  {Exeunt.       18 

Scene  III.     The  forest. 
Enter  Rosalind  and  Celia. 

Ros.  How  say  you  now  ?  Is  it  not  past  two  o'clock  ? 
and  here  much  Orlando ! 

Cel.  I  warrant  you,  with  pure  love  and  troubled 
brain,  he  hath  ta'en  his  bow  and  arrows  and  is  gone 
forth  to  sleep.     Look,  who  comes  here. 


SCENE   III]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  71 

Enter  Silvius. 

>Si'i^.     My  errand  is  to  you,  fair  youth; 
My  gentle  Phebe  bid  me  give  you  this : 
I  know  not  the  contents;   but,  as  I  guess 
By  the  stern  brow  and  waspish  action 
Which  she  did  use  as  she  was  writing  of  it,  10 

It  bears  an  angry  tenour :   pardon  me  ; 
I  am  but  as  a  guiltless  messenger. 

Ros.     Patience  herself  would  startle  at  this  letter 
And  play  the  swaggerer ;  bear  this,  bear  all : 
She  says  I  am  not  fair,  that  I  lack  manners ; 
She  calls  me  proud,  and  that  she  could  not  love  me, 
Were  man  as  rare  as  phoenix.     'Od's  my  will ! 
Her  love  is  not  the  hare  that  I  do  hunt : 
Why  writes  she  so  to  me  ?     Well,  shepherd,  well. 
This  is  a  letter  of  your  own  device.  20 

Sil.     No,  I  protest,  I  know  not  the  contents : 
Phebe  did  write  it. 

Ros.  Come,  come,  you  are  a  fool 

And  tum'd  into  the  extremity  of  love. 
I  saw  her  hand  ;  she  has  a  leathern  hand, 
A  freestone-colour'd  hand  :    I  verily  did  think 
That  her  old  gloves  were  on,  but  'twas  her  hands : 
She  has  a  huswife's  hand  ;  but  that's  no  matter : 
I  say  she  never  did  invent  this  letter  : 
This  is  a  man's  invention  and  his  hand. 

Sil.     Sure,  it  is  hers.  30 

Ros.     Why,  'tis  a  boisterous  and  a  cruel  style, 
A  style  for  challengers ;  why,  she  defies  me, 
Like  Turk  to  Christian :  women's  gentle  brain 
Could  not  drop  forth  such  giant-rude  invention, 


72  AS   YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  IV 

Such  Ethiope  words,  blacker  in  their  effect 

Than  in  their  countenance.     Will  you  hear  the  letter  ? 

Sil.     So  please  you,  for  I  never  heard  it  yet ; 
Yet  heard  too  much  of  Phebe's  cruelty. 

Ros.     She  Phebes  me  :  mark  how  the  tyrant  writes. 

[Heads]     "Art  thou  god  to  shepherd  turn'd,  40 

That  a  maiden'3  heart  hath  burn'd  1 

Can  a  woman  rail  thus  ? 

Sil.     Call  you  this  railing  ? 

Ros.      [Beads] 

Why,  thy  godhead  laid  apart, 
Warr'st  thou  with  a  woman's  heart? 

Did  you  ever  hear  such  railing  ? 

Whiles  the  eye  of  man  did  woo  me, 
That  could  do  no  vengeance  to  me. 

Meanincr  me  a  beast. 

If  the  scorn  of  your  bright  eyne  50 

Have  power  to  raise  such  love  in  mine, 

Alack,  in  me  what  strange  effect 

Would  they  work  in  mild  aspect  ! 

Whiles  you  chid  me,  I  did  love  ; 

How  then  might  your  prayers  move  ! 

He  that  brings  this  love  to  thee 

Little  knows  this  love  in  me  : 

And  by  him  seal  up  thy  mind  ; 

Whether  that  thy  youth  and  kind 

Will  the  faithful  offer  take  60 

Of  me  and  all  that  I  can  make  : 

O  else  by  him  my  love  deny. 

And  then  I'll  study  how  to  die." 

Sil.     Call  you  this  chiding  ? 
Cel.     Alas,  poor  shepherd  1 


SCENE   III]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  73 

Ros.  Do  you  pity  him  ?  no,  he  deserves  no  pity. 
Wilt  thou  love  such  a  woman  ?  What,  to  make  thee  an 
instrument  and  play  false  strains  upon  thee !  not  to  be 
endured  !  Well,  go  your  way  to  her,  for  I  see  love  hath 
made  thee  a  tame  snake,  and  say  this  to  her :  that  if  she 
love  me,  I  charge  her  to  love  thee ;  if  she  will  not,  I  will 
never  have  her  unless  thou  entreat  for  her.  If  you  be  a 
true  lover,  hence,  and  not  a  word :  for  here  comes  more 
company.  [Exit  Silviua. 

Enter  Oliver. 

Orl.     Good  morrow,  fair  ones  :  pray  you,  if  you  know, 
Where  in  the  purlieus  of  this  forest  stands 
A  sheep-cote  fenced  about  with  olive  trees  ? 

Cel.     West    of    this    place,    down    in   the    neighbour 
bottom : 
The  rank  of  osiers  by  the  murmuring  stream  80 

Left  on  your  right  hand  brings  you  to  the  place. 
But  at  this  hour  the  house  doth  keep  itself ; 
There's  none  within. 

Oli.     If  that  an  eye  may  profit  by  a  tongue, 
Then  should  I  know  you  by  description  ; 
Such  garments  and  such  years :  'The  boy  is  fair. 
Of  female  favour,  and  bestows  himself 
Like  a  ripe  sister :  the  woman  low 
And  browner  than  her  brother.'     Are  not  you 
The  owner  of  the  house  I  did  enquire  for  ?  90 

Cel.     It  is  no  boast,  being  ask'd,  to  say  we  are." 

Oli.     Orlando  doth  commend  him  to  you  both, 
And  to  that  youth  he  calls  his  Rosalind 
He  sends  this  bloody  napkin.     Are  you  he  ? 

Ros      I  am  :  what  must  we  understand  by  this  ? 


•74  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   IV 

OH.     Some  of  my  shame  ;  if  you  will  know  of  me 
What  man  I  am,  and  how,  and  why,  and  where 
This  handkercher  was  stain'd. 

Cel.  I  pray  you,  tell  it. 

Oli.     When  last  the  young  Orlando  parted  from  you 
He  left  a  promise  to  return  again  100 

Within  an  hour,  and  pacing  through  the  forest, 
Chewing  the  food  of  sweet  and  bitter  fancy, 
Lo,  what  befell !  he  threw  his  eye  aside, 
And  mark  what  object  did  present  itself: 
Under  an  oak,  whose  boughs  were  moss'd  with  age 
And  high  top  bald  with  dry  antiquity, 
A  wretched  ragged  man,  o'ergrown  with  hair, 
Lay  sleeping  on  his  back  :  about  his  neck 
A  green  and  gilded  snake  had  wreathed  itself. 
Who  with  her  head  nimble  in  threats  approach'd  no 

The  opening  of  his  mouth  ;  but  suddenly, 
Seeing  Orlando,  it  unlinked  itself, 
And  with  indented  glides  did  slip  away 
Into  a  bush :  under  which  bush's  shade 
A  lioness,  wdth  udders  all  drawn  dry, 
Lay  couching,  head  on  ground,  with  catlike  watch. 
When  that  the  sleeping  man  should  stir ;  for  'tis 
The  royal  disposition  of  that  beast 
To  prey  on  nothing  that  doth  seem  as  dead  : 
This  seen,  Orlando  did  approach  the  man  120 

And  found  it  was  his  brother,  his  elder  brother. 

Cel.     0, 1  have  heard  him  speak  of  that  same  brother ; 
And  he  did  render  him  the  most  unnatural 
That  lived  amongst  men. 

Oli.  And  well  he  ndglit  so  do, 

For  well  I  know  he  was  unnatural. 


SCENE   III]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  75 

Ros.     But,  to  Orlando  :  did  he  leave  him  there, 
Food  to  the  suck'd  and  hungry  lioness  ? 

Oli.     Twice  did  he  turn  his  back  and  purposed  so ; 
But  kindness,  nobler  ever  than  revenge, 
And  nature,  s£ronger  than  his  just  occasion,  130 

Made  him  give  battle  to  the  lioness, 
Who  quickly  fell  before  him  :  in  which  hurtling 
From  miserable  slumber  I  awaked. 

Cel.     Are  you  his  brother  ? 

Bos.  Was't  you  he  rescued  ? 

Cel.     Was't  you  that  did  so  oft  contrive  to  kill  him  ? 

Oli.     'Twas  I ;  but  'tis  not  I :  I  do  not  shame 
To  tell  you  what  I  was,  since  my  conversion 
So  sweetly  tastes,  being  the  thing  I  am. 

Ros.     But,  for  the  bloody  napkin  ? 

Oli.  By  and  by. 

When  from  the  first  to  last  betwixt  us  two  140 

Tears  our  recountments  had  most  kindly  bathed, 
As  how  I  came  into  that  desert  place : — 
In  brief,  he  led  me  to  the  gentle  duke. 
Who  gave  me  fresh  array  and  entertainment, 
Committing  me  unto  my  brother's  love ; 
Who  led  me  instantly  unto  his  cave, 
There  stripp'd  himself,  and  here  upon  his  arm 
The  lioness  had  torn  some  flesh  away, 
Which  all  this  while  had  bled ;  and  now  he  fainted 
And  cried,  in  fainting,  upon  Rosalind.  -  150 

Brief,  I  recover 'd  him,  bound  up  his  wound  ; 
And,  after  some  small  space,  being  strong  at  heart, 
He  sent  me  hither,  stranger  as  I  am, 
To  tell  this  story,  that  you  might  excuse 
His  broken  promise,  and  to  give  this  napkin 


76  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT  IV 

Dj^ed  in  his  blood  unto  the  shepherd  youth 

That  he  in  sport  doth  call  his  Rosalind.        [JRosalind  swoons. 

Cel.     Why,  how  no\Y,  Ganymede  !  sweet  Ganymede  ! 

Oil.     Many  will  swoon  when  they  do  look  on  blood. 

Cel.     There  is  more  in  it.     Cousin  Ganymede  !  160 

Oli.     Look,  he  recovers. 

Ros.     I  would  I  were  at  home. 

Cel.  We'll  lead  you  thither. 

I  pray  you,  will  you  take  him  by  the  arm  ? 

Oli.  Be  of  good  cheer,  youth :  you  a  man  !  you  lack 
a  man's  heart. 

Ros.  I  do  so,  I  confess  it.  Ah,  sirrah,  a  body  would 
think  this  was  well  counterfeited  !  I  pray  you,  tell  your 
brother  how  well  I  counterfeited.     Heigh-ho ! 

Oli.  This  was  not  counterfeit:  there  is  too  great 
testimony  in  your  complexion  that  it  was  a  passion 
of  earnest.  171 

Ros.     Counterfeit,  I  assure  you. 

Oli.  Well  then,  take  a  good  heart  and  counterfeit  to 
be  a  man. 

Ros.  So  I  do:  but,  i'  faith,  I  should  have  been  a 
woman  by  right. 

Cel.  Come,  you  look  paler  and  paler :  pray  you,  draw 
homewards.     Good  sir,  go  with  us. 

Oli.     That  will  I,  for  I  must  bear  answer  back 
How  you  excuse  my  brother,  Rosalind.  180 

Ros.  I  shall  devise  something:  but,  I  pray  you, 
commend  my  counterfeiting  to  him.     Will  you  go  ^ 

\Exeunt. 


SCENE   l]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  77 

# 

ACT   V. 

Scene  I.      The  forest. 

Enter  Touchstone  and  Audrey. 

Touch.  We  shall  find  a  time,  Audrey ;  patience,  gentle 
Audrey. 

Aiul.  Faith  the  priest  was  good  enough,  for  all  the 
old  gentleman's  saying. 

Touch.  A  most  wicked  Sir  Oliver,  Audrey,  a  most 
vile  Martext,  But,  Audrey,  there  is  a  youth  here  in  the 
forest  lays  claim  to  you. 

And.  Ay,  I  know  who  'tis ;  he  hath  no  interest  in 
me  in  the  world :  here  comes  the  man  you  mean.  9 

Touch.  It  is  meat  and  drink  to  me  to  see  a  clown: 
by  my  troth,  we  that  have  good  wits  have  much  to 
answer  for;  we  shall  be  flouting;  we  cannot  hold. 

Enter  William. 

Will.     Good  even,  Audrey. 

And.     God  ye  good  even,  William. 

Will.     And  good  even  to  you,  sir. 

Touch.  Good  even,  gentle  friend.  Cover  thy  head, 
cover  thy  head  ;  nay,  prithee,  be  covered.  How  old  are 
you,  friend? 

Will.     Five  and  twenty,  sir. 

Touch.     A  ripe  age.     Is  thy  name  William  ?  '         20 

Will.     William,  sir. 

Touch.     A  fair  name.     Wast  born  i'  the  forest  here  ? 

Will.     Ay,  sir,  I  thank  God. 

Touch.     *  Thank  God ' ;   a  good  answer.     Art  rich  ? 


78  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT  V 

Will.     Faith,  sir,  so  so. 

Touch.  *  So  so '  is  good,  very  good,  very  excellent 
good;  and  yet  it  is  not;  it  is  but  so  so.  Art  thou 
wise  ? 

Will.     Ay,  sir,  I  have  a  pretty  wit. 

Touch.  Why,  thou  sayest  well.  I  do  now  remember 
a  saying,  'The  fool  doth  think  he  is  wise,  but  the 
wise  man  knows  himself  to  be  a  fool.'  The  heathen 
philosopher,  when  he  had  a  desire  to  eat  a  grape,  would 
open  his  lips  when  he  put  it  into  his  mouth;  meaning 
thereby  that  grapes  were  made  to  eat  and  lips  to  open. 
You  do  love  this  maid  ?  35 

Will.     I  do,  sir. 

Touch.     Give  me  your  hand.     Art  thou  learned  ? 

Will.     Xo,  sir. 

Touch.  Then  learn  this  of  me :  to  have,  is  to  have ; 
for  it  is  a  figure  in  rhetoric  that  drink,  being  poured  out 
of  a  cup  into  a  glass,  by  filling  the  one  doth  empty  the 
other ;  for  all  your  writers  do  consent  that  ipse  is  he : 
now,  you  are  not  ipse,  for  I  am  he.  43 

Will.     Which  he,  sir? 

Touch.  He,  sir,  that  must  marry  this  woman.  There- 
fore, you  clown,  abandon, — which  is  in  the  vulgar  leave, — 
the  society, — which  in  the  boorish  is  company, — of  this 
female, — which  in  the  common  is  woman;  which  to- 
gether is,  abandon  the  society  of  this  female,  or  clown, 
thou  perishest;  or,  to  thy  better  understanding,  diest; 
or,  to  wit,  I  kill  thee,  make  thee  away,  translate  thy  life 
into  death,  thy  liberty  into  bondage:  1  will  deal  in 
poison  with  thee,  or  in  bastinado,  or  in  steel ;  I  will 
bandy  with  thee  in  faction;  I  will  o'er-run  thee  with 


SCENE   II]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  79 

policy  ;  I  will  kill  thee  a  hundred  and  tif ty  ways :   there- 
fore tremble,  and  depart. 

And.     Do,  good  William. 

Will.     God  rest  you  merry,  sir.  [Exit. 

Enter  CoRiN. 

Co?\     Our    master    and  mistress   seek   you ;      come, 

away,  away !  60 

Touch.     Trip,    Audrey !  trip,    Audrey !     I    attend,   I 

attend.  [Exeunt. 

Scene  .  II.     The  forest. 

Enter  Orlakdo  and  Oliver. 

Orl.  Is't  possible  that  on  so  little  acquaintance  you 
should  like  her  ?  that  but  seeing  you  should  love  her  ? 
and,  loving,  woo  ?  and,  wooing,  she  should  grant  ?  and 
will  you  persever  to  enjoy  her  ? 

OH.  Neither  call  the  giddiness  of  it  in  question,  the 
proverty  of  her,  the  small  acquaintance,  my  sudden 
wooing,  nor  her  sudden  consenting;  but  say  with  me, 
I  love  Aliena ;  say  w4th  her  that  she  loves  me ;  consent 
with  both  that  we  may  enjoy  each  other :  it  shall  be  to 
your  good ;  for  my  father's  house  and  all  the  revenue 
that  was  old  Sir  Rowland's  will  I  estate  upon  you,  and 
here  live  and  die  a  shepherd.  12 

Orl.  You  have  my  consent.  Let  your  wedding  be 
to-morrow:  thither  will  I  invite  the  duke  and  all's 
contented  followers.  Go  you  and  prepare  Aliena;  for 
look  you,  here  comes  my  Rosalind. 


80  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT   V 

Enter  Rosalind. 

Ros.     God  save  3^ou,  brother. 

Oli.     And  you,  fair  sister.  [Exit. 

Ros.  O,  my  dear  Orlando,  how  it  grieves  me  to  see 
thee  wear  thy  heart  in  a  scarf !  20 

Orl.     It  is  my  arm. 

Ros.  I  thought  thy  heart  had  been  wounded  with 
the  claws  of  a  lion. 

Orl.     Wounded  it  is,  but  with  the  eyes  of  a  lady. 

Ros.  Did  your  brother  tell  you  how  I  counterfeited 
to  swoon  when  he  showed  me  your  handkercher  ? 

Orl.     Ay,  and  greater  wonders  than  that. 

Ros.  0,  I  know  where  you  are :  nay,  'tis  true  :  there 
was  never  any  thing  so  sudden  but  the  fight  of  two  rams 
and  Caesar's  thrasonical  brag  of  '  I  came,  saw,  and  over- 
came ' :  for  your  brother  and  my  sister  no  sooner  met 
but  they  looked,  no  sooner  looked  but  they  loved,  no 
sooner  loved  but  they  sighed,  no  sooner  sighed  but  they 
asked  one  another  the  reason,  no  sooner  knew  the  reason 
but  they  sought  the  remedy ;  and  in  these  degrees  have 
they  made  a  pair  of  stairs  to  marriage  which  they  will 
climb  incontinent :  they  are  in  the  very  wrath  of  love 
and  they  will  together;  clubs  cannot  part  them.         38 

Orl.  They  shall  be  married  to-morrow,  and  I  will  bid 
the  duke  to  the  nuptial.  But,  O,  how  bitter  a  thing  it  is 
to  look  into  happiness  through  another  man's  eyes  !  By 
so  much  the  more  shall  I  to-morrow  be  at  the  height  of 
heart-heaviness,  by  how  much  I  shall  think  my  brother 
happy  in  having  what  he  wishes  for. 

Ros.  Why  then,  to-morrow  I  cannot  serve  your  turn 
for  Rosalind  ? 


SCENE   II]  AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  81 

Orl.     I  can  live  no  longer  by  thinking.  47 

Ros.  I  will  weary  you  then  no  longer  with  idle 
talking.  Know  of  me  then,  for  now  I  speak  to  some 
purpose,  that  I  know  you  are  a  gentleman  of  good 
conceit :  I  speak  not  this  that  you  should  bear  a  good 
opinion  of  my  knowledge,  insomuch  I  say  I  know  you 
are ;  neither  do  I  labour  for  a  greater  esteem  than  may 
in  some  little  measure  draw  a  belief  from  you,  to  do 
yourself  good  and  not  to  grace  me.  Believe  then,  if  you 
please,  that  I  can  do  strange  things :  I  have,  since  I  was 
three  year  old,  conversed  with  a  magician,  most  pro- 
found in  his  art  and  yet  not  damnable.  If  3'ou  do  love 
Rosalind  so  near  the  heart  as  your  gesture  cries  it  out, 
when  your  brother  marries  Aliena,  sliall  you  marry  her : 
I  know  into  what  straits  of  fortune  she  is  driven ;  and  it 
is  not  impossible  to  me,  if  it  appear  not  inconvenient  to 
you,  to  set  her  before  your  eyes  to-morrow  human  as  she 
is  and  without  any  danger.  64 

Orl.     Speakest  thou  in  sober  meanings  ? 

Ros.  By  my  life,  I  do  ;  which  I  tender  dearly,  though 
I  say  I  am  a  magician.  Therefore,  put  you  in  j^our  best 
array ;  bid  your  friends  ;  for  if  you  will  be  married  to- 
morrow, you  shall,  and  to  Rosalind,  if  you  will. 

Enter  Silvius  and  Phebe, 
Look,  here  comes  a  lover  of  mine  and  a  lover  of  hers.     70 

Phe.     Youth,  you  have  done  me  much  ungentleness, 
To  shew  the  letter  that  I  writ  to  you. 

Ros.     I  care  not  if  I  have  :  it  is  my  study 
To  seem  despiteful  and  ungentle  to  you  : 


82  AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [acT  V 

You  are  there  followed  by  a  faithful  shepherd ; 
Look  upon  him,  love  him ;  he  worships  you. 

Phe.     Good  shepherd,  tell  this  youth  what  'tis  to  love. 

Sil.     It  is  to  be  all  made  of  sighs  and  tears ; 
And  so  am  I  for  Phebe. 

Phe.     And  I  for  Ganymede.  80 

OtI.     And  I  for  Rosalind. 

Ros.     And  I  for  no  woman. 

Sil.     It  is  to  be  all  made  of  faith  and  service ; 
And  so  am  I  for  Phebe. 

Phe.     And  I  for  Ganymede. 

Orl.     And  I  for  RosalincJ. 

Ros.     And  I  for  no  woman. 

Sil.     It  is  to  be  all  made  of  fantasy. 
All  made  of  passion  and  all  made  of  wishes. 
All  adoration,  duty,  and  observance,  90 

All  humbleness,  all  patience  and  impatience, 
All  purity,  all  trial,  all  observance  ; 
And  so  am  I  for  Phebe. 

Phe.     And  so  am  I  for  Ganymede. 

Orl.     And  so  am  I  for  Rosalind. 

Ros.     And  so  am  I  for  no  woman. 

Phe.     If  this  be  so,  why  blame  you  me  to  love  you  ? 

Sil.     If  this  be  so,  why  blame  you  me  to  love  you  ? 

Orl.     If  this  be  so,  why  blame  you  me  to  love  you  ? 

Ros.     Why  do  you  speak  too,  '  Why  blame  you  me  to 
love  you  ? '  lOl 

Orl.     To  her  that  is  not  here,  nor  doth  not  hear. 

Ros.     Pray  you,  no  more  of  this  ;  'tis  like  the  howling 
of  Irish  wolves  against  the  moon.     {To  Sil.]     I  will  help 


SCEXE   III]  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT 

you,  if  I  can :  [To  Ph.]  I  would  love  you,  if  I  could.  To- 
morrow meet  me  all  together.  [To  Phe.]  I  will  marry 
you,  if  ever  I'  marry  woman,  and  I'll  be  married  to- 
morrow :  [To  Ori]  I  will  satisfy  you,  if  ever  I  satisfied 
man,  and  you  shall  be  married  to-moiTOW :  [To  SU.]  I  will 
content  you,  if  what  pleases  you  contents  you,  and 
you  shall  be  married  to-morrow.  [To  OrL]  As  you  love 
Rosalind,  meet :  [To  SiL]  as  you  love  Phebe,  meet:  and 
as  I  love  no  woman,  I'll  meet.  So  fare  you  well :  I  have 
left  you  commands.  lu 

SiL     I'll  not  fail,  if  I  live. 

Fhe.     Nor  I. 

Orl.      Nor  I.  [Exeunt. 

Scene  III.     The  forest. 
Enter  Touchstone  arid  Audrey. 
Touch.     To-morrow  is  the  joyful  day,   Audrey ;    to- 
morrow will  we  be  married. 

And.  I  do  desire  it  with  all  my  heart:  and  I  hope  it 
is  no  dishonest  desire  to  desire  to  be  a  woman  of  the 
world.     Here  come  two  of  the  banished  duke's  pages. 

Enter  two  Pages. 

First  Page.     Well  met,  honest  gentleman. 

Touoh.  By  my  troth,  well  met.  Come,  sit,  sit,  and  a 
song. 

Sec.  Page.     We  are  for  you:    sit  i'  the  middle.         9 

First  Page.  Shall  we  clap  into  't  roundly,  without 
hawking  or  spitting  or  saying  we  are  hoarse,  which  are 
the  only  prologues  to  a  bad  voice  ? 

Sec.  Page.  T  faith,  i'  faith ;  and  both  in  a  tune,  like 
two  gipsies  on  a  horse. 


84  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   V 

Song. 

lb  was  a  lover  and  his  lass, 

With  a  hey,  and  a  ho,  and  a  hey  nonino, 
That  o'er  the  green  corn-field  did  pass 

In  the  spring  time,  the  only  pretty  ring  time, 
When  birds  do  sing,  hey  ding  a  ding,  ding  : 

Sweet  lovers  love  the  spring.  20 

Between  the  acres  of  the  rye, 

With  a  hey,  and  a  ho,  and  a  hey  nonino, 

These  pretty  country  folks  would  lie. 
In  spring  time,   &c. 

This  carol  they  began  that  hour, 

With  a  hey,  and  a  ho,  and  a  hey  nonino. 

How  that  a  life  was  but  a  flower 
In  spring  time,  &c. 

And  therefore  take  the  present  time, 

With  a  hey,  and  a  ho,  and  a  hey  nonino  ;  30 

For  love  is  crowned  with  the  prime. 

In  spring  time,   &c. 

Touch.  Truly,  young  gentlemen,  though  there  was 
no  great  matter  in  the  ditty,  yet  tlie  note  was  very 
untuneable. 

First  Page.  You  are  deceived,  sir  :  we  kept  time, 
we  lost  not  our  time. 

Touch.  By  my  troth,  yes ;  I  count  it  but  time  lost  to 
hear  such  a  foolish  song.  God  be  wi'  you ;  and  God 
mend  your  voices !     Come,  Audrey.  [Exeunt.       iO 


SCENE   IV]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  86 

Scene  IY.     The  forest. 

Enter  Duke  senior,  Amiens,  Jaques,  Orlando, 
Oliver,  and  Celia, 

Buke  S.     Dost  tliou  believe,  Orlando,  that  the  boy 
Can  do  all  this  that  he  hath  promised  ? 

Orl.     I  sometimes  do  believe,  and  sometimes  do  not ; 
As  those  that  fear  they  hope,  and  know  they  f ^ar. 

Enter  Rosalind,  Silvius,  and  Phebe. 

Ros.     Patience    once    more,   whiles    our    compact    is 
urged  : 
You  say,  if  I  bring  in  your  Rosalind, 
You  will  bestow  her  on  Orlando  here  ? 

Duke  S.      That   would   I,   had   I   kingdoms   to    give 
with  her.  10 

Eos.     And    you    say,   you    will    have    her,   when    I 
bring  her  ? 

Orl.     That  would  I,  were  I  of  all  kingdoms  king. 

Ros.     You  say,  you  '11  marry  me,  if  I  be  willing  ? 

Phe.     That  will  I,  should  I  die  the  hour  after. 

Ros.     But  if  you  do  refuse  to  marry  me, 
You  '11  give  yourself  to  this  most  faithful  shepherd  ? 

Phe.     So  is  the  bargain. 

Ros.     You  say,  that  you  '11  have  Phebe,  if  she  will  ? 

Sil.     Though    to    have    her    and    death    were    both 
one  thing.  .  21 

Ros.     I  have  promised  to  make  all  this  matter  even. 
Keep  you  your  word,  0  duke,  to  give  your  daughter ; 
You  yours,  Orlando,  to  receive  his  daughter : 
Keep  your  word,  Phebe,  that  you'll  marry  me. 
Or  else  refusing  me,  to  wed  this  shepherd : 
Keep  your  word,  Silvius,  that  you  '11  marry  her, 


86  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   V 

li*  she  refuse  me :  and  from  hence  I  go, 

To  make  these  doubts  all  even.  [Exeunt  Rosalind  and  Celia. 

Duke  S.     I  do  remember  in  this  shepherd  boy  30 

Some  lively  touches  of  my  daughter's  favour. 

Orl.     My  lord,  the  first  time  that  I  -ever  saw  him 
Methought  he  was  a  brother  to  your  daughter : 
But,  my  good  lord,  this  boy  is  forest-born, 
And  hath  been  tutor'd  in  the  rudiments 
Of  many  desperate  studies  by  his  uncle. 
Whom  he  reports  to  be  a  great  magician, 
Obscured  in  the  circle  of  this  forest. 

Enter  Touchstone  and  Audrey. 

Jaq.  There  is,  sure,  another  flood  toward  and  these 
couples  are  coming  to  the  ark.  Here  comes  a  pair  of 
very  strange  beasts,  which  in  all  tongues  are  called  fools. 

Touch.     Salutation  and  greeting  to  j^ou  all !  42 

Jaq.  Good  my  lord,  bid  him  welcome :  this  is  the 
motley-minded  gentleman  that  I  have  so  often  met  in 
the  forest :  he  hath  been  a  courtier,  he  swears. 

Touch.  If  any  man  doubt  that,  let  him  put  me  to  my 
purgation.  I  have  trod  a  measure ;  I  have  flattered  a 
lady ;  I  have  been  politic  with  my  friend,  smooth  with 
mine  enemy ;  I  have  undone  three  tailors ;  I  have  had 
four  quarrels,  and  like  to  have  fought  one.  50 

Jaq.     And  how  was  that  ta'en  up  ? 

Touch.  Faith,  we  met,  and  found  the  quarrel  was 
upon  tlie  seventh  cause. 

Jaq.  How  seventh  cause  ?  Good  my  lord,  like  this 
fellow. 

Duke  S.     I  like  him  very  well. 

Touch.  God  'ild  you,  sir ;  I  desire  you  of  the  like. 
I  press  in  here,  sir,  amongst  the  rest  of  the  country 


SCENE   IV]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  87 

copulatives,  to  swear  and  to  forswear ;  according  as 
marriage  binds  and  blood  breaks :  a  poor  virgin,  sir, 
an  ill-favoured  thing,  sir,  but  mine  own ;  a  poor  humour 
of  mine,  sir,  to  take  that  that  no  man  else  will :  rich 
honesty  dwells  like  a  miser,  sir,  in  a  poor  house ;  as 
your  pearl  in  your  foul  oyster. 

Duke  S.     By    my    faith,   he   is  very    swift   and   sen- 
tentious. 

Touch.     According    to    the   fool's    bolt,  sir,   and   such 
dulcet  diseases. 

Jaq.  But,  for  the  seventh  cause  ;  how  did  you  find 
the  quarrel  on  the  seventh  cause  ?  70 

Touch.  Upon  a  lie  seven  times  removed  : — bear  your 
body  more  seeming,  Audrey : — as  thus,  sir.  I  did  dislike 
the  cut  of  a  certain  courtier's  beard ;  he  sent  me  word,  if 
I  said  his  beard  was  not  cut  well,  he  was  in  the  mind 
it  was:  this  is  called  the  Retort  Courteous.  If  I  sent 
him  word  again  'it  was  not  well  cut,'  he  would  send 
me  word,  he  cut  it  to  please  himself :  this  is  called  the 
Quip  Modest.  If  a^ain  *  it  was  not  well  cut,'  he  disabled 
my  judgment:  this  is  called  the  Reply  Churlish.  If 
again  'it  was  not  well  cut,'  he  .would  answer,  I  spake 
not  true :  this  is  called  the  Reproof  Valiant.  If  again 
'  it  was  not  well  cut,'  he  would  say,  I  lied :  this  is  called 
the  Countercheck  Quarrelsome  :  and  so  to  the  Lie  Cir- 
cumstantial and  the  Lie  Direct.  84 
Jaq.  And  how  oft  did  you  say  his  beard  was  not 
well  cut  ? 

Touch.  I  durst  zo  no  further  than  the  Lie  Circum- 
stantial,  nor  he  durst  not  give  me  the  Lie  Direct ;  and  so 
we  measured  swords  and  parted. 


88  AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT  V 

Jaq.  Can  you  nominate  in  order  now  the  degrees 
of  the  lie?  91 

Touch.  O  sir,  we  quarrel  in  print,  by  the  book;  as 
you  have  books  for  good  manners :  I  will  name  you 
the  degrees.  The  first,  the  Retort  Courteous;  the 
second,  the  Quip  Modest;  the  third,  the  Reply  Churlish; 
the  fourth,  the  Reproof  Valiant ;  the  fifth,  the  Counter- 
check Quarrelsome ;  the  sixth,  the  Lie  with  Circum- 
stance ;  the  seventh,  the  Lie  Direct.  All  these  you  may 
avoid  but  the  Lie  Direct ;  and  you  may  avoid  that  too, 
with  an  If.  I  knew  when  seven  justices  could  not  take 
up  a  quarrel,  but  when  the  parties  were  met  themselves, 
one  of  them  thought  but  of  an  If,  as,  *  If  you  said  so, 
then  I  said  so ' ;  and  they  shook  hands  and  swore 
brothers.  Your  If  is  the  only  peace-maker;  much 
virtue  in  If. 

Jaq.  Is  not  tliis  a  rare  fellow,  my  lord  ?  he's  as  good 
at  any  thing  and  yet  a  fool. 

Duke  S.  He  uses  his  folly  like  a  stalking-horse  and 
under  the  presentation  of  that  he  shopts  his  wit.  109 

.    Enter  Hymen,  Rosaljnd,  and  Celia. 

Still  Music. 

Hym.       "  Then  is  there  mirth  in  heaven, 
When  earthly  things  made  even 

Atone  together. 
Good  duke,  receive  thy  daughter  : 
Hymen  from  heaven  brought  her. 

Yea,  brought  her  hither, 
That  thou  mightst  join  her  hand  with  his 
Whose  heart  within  her  bosom  is." 

Ros.     [To  duke]  To  you  I  give  myself,  for  I  am  yours. 


SCENE   IV]  AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  89 

[To  Orl.]  To  you  I  give  myself,  for  I  am  yours. 

Duke  S.     If  there   be   truth   in   sight,   you   are   my 
daughter.  121 

Orl.     If  there  be  truth  in  sight,  you  are  my  Rosalind. 

Phe.     If  sight  and  shape  be  true, 
Why  then,  my  love  adieu  ! 

Ros.     I'll  have  no  father,  if  you  be  not  he  : 
I'll  have  no  husband,  if  you  be  not  he : 
Nor  ne'er  wed  woman,  if  you  be  not  she. 

Hym.         ' '  Peace,  ho  !     I  bar  confusion  : 

'Tis  I  must  make  conclusion 

Of  these  most  strange  events  :  130 

Here's  eight  that  must  take  hands 

To  join  in  Hymen's  bands, 

If  truth  holds  true  contents. 

You  and  you  no  cross  shall  part  : 

You  and  you  are  heart  in  heart : 

You  to  his  love  must  accord, 

Or  have  a  woman  to  your  lord  : 
You  and  you  are  sure  together, 
As  the  winter  to  foul  weather. 

Whiles  a  wedlock-hymn  we  sing,  140 

Feed  yourselves  with  questioning  ; 
That  reason  wonder  may  diminish,  ~~ 

How  thus  we  met,  and  these  things  finish." 

Song. 

"  Wedding  is  great  Juno's  crown : 

O  blessed  bond  of  board  and  bed  ! 
'Tis  Hymen  peoples  every  town  ; 

High  wedlock  then  be  honoured  : 
Honour,  high  honour  and  renown, 
To  Hymen,  god  of  every  town  !  " 

Duke  S.     O  my  dear  niece,  welcome  thou  art  to  me  ! 
Even  daughter,  welcome,  in  no  less  degree.  lol 


90  AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  [ACT   V 

Pile.     I  will  not  eat  my  word,  now  thou  art  mine ; 
Thy  faith  my  fancy  to  thee  doth  combine. 

Enter  Jaques  dk  Boys. 

Jaq.  de  B.     Let  me  have  audience  for  a  word  or  two  : 
I  am  the  second  son  of  old  Sir  Rowland, 
That  bring  these  tidings  to  this  fair  assembly. 
Duke  Frederick,  hearing  how  that  every  day 
Men  of  great  worth  resorted  to  this  forest, 
Address'd  a  mighty  power ;  which  were  on  foot, 
In  his  own  conduct,  purposely  to  take  160 

His  brother  here  and  put  him  to  the  sword  : 
And  to  the  skirts  of  this  wild  wood  he  came ; 
Where  meeting  with  an  old  religious  man. 
After  some  question  with  him,  was  converted 
Both  from  his  enterprise  and  from  the  world ; 
His  crown  bequeathing  to  his  banish'd  brother, 
And  all  their  lands  restored  to  them  again 
That  were  with  him  exiled.     This  to  be  true, 
I  do  engage  my  life. 

Diihe  S.  Welcome,  young  man; 

Thou  offer 'st  fairly  to  thy  brothers'  wedding  :  170 

To  one  his  lands  withheld,  and  to  the  other 
A  land  itself  at  large,  a  potent  dukedom. 
First,  in  this  forest  let  us  do  those  ends 
That  here  were  well  begun  and  well  begot : 
And  after,  every  of  this  happy  number 
That  have  endured  shrewd  days  and  nights  with  us 
Shall  share  the  good  of  our  returned  fortune. 
According  to  the  measure  of  their  states. 
Meantime,  forget  this  new-fallen  dignity 
And  fall  into  our  rustic  revelry.  180 


SCENE    IV]  AS   YOU    LIKE   IT  91 

Play,  music  !    And  you,  brides  and  bridegrooms  all, 
With  measure  heap'd  in  joy,  to  the  measures  fall. 

Jaq.     Sir,  by  your  patience.     If  I  heard  you  rightly, 
The  duke  hath  put  on  a  religious  life 
And  thrown  into  neglect  the  pompous  court  ? 

Jaq.  de  B.     He  hath. 

Jaq.     To  him  will  I :  out  of  these  convertites 
There  is  much  matter  to  be  heard  and  learn'd. 
[To  Duke]  You  to  your  former  honour  I  bequeath; 
Your  patience  and  your  virtue  well  deserves  it :  190 

[To  OrL]  You  to  a  love  that  your  true  faith  doth  merit : 
[To  on.]  You  to  your  land  and  love  and  great  allies : 
[To  Sil.]  You  to  a  long  and  well-deserved  bed : 
[To  Touch.]  And  you  to  wrangling;  for  thy  loving  voyage 
Is  but  for  two  months  victualled.     So,  to  your  pleasures : 
I  am  for  other  than  for  dancinor  measures. 

Duke  S.     Stay,  Jaques,  stay. 

Jaq.     To  see  no  pastime  I :    what  you  would  have 
I'll  stay  to  know  at  your  abandon'd  cave.  [Exit.     199 

Duke  S.  Proceed,  proceed  :  we  will  begin  these  rites, 
As  we  do  trust  they'll  end,  in  true  delights.  [A  dance. 

Epilogue. 

Ros.  It  is  not  the  fashion  to  see  the  lady  the 
epilogue ;  but  it  is  no  more  unhandsome  than  to  see 
the  lord  the  prologue.  If  it  be  true  that  good  wine 
needs  no  bush,  'tis  true  that  a  good  play  needs  no 
epilogue ;  yet  to  good  wine  they  do  use  good  bushes, 
and  good  plays  prove  the  better  by  the  help  of  good 
epilogues.  What  a  case  am  I  in  then,  that  am  neither 
a  good  epilogue  nor  cannot  insinuate  with  you  in  the 


92  AS  YOU   LIKE  IT  [ACT  V 

behalf  of  a  good  play !  I  am  not  furnished  like  a  beggar, 
therefore  to  beg  will  not  become  me :  my  way  is  to 
conjure  you ;  and  I'll  begin  with  the  women.  I  charge 
you,  0  women,  for  the  love  you  bear  to  men,  to  like 
as  much  of  this  play  as  please  you :  and  I  charge  you,  0 
men,  for  the  love  you  bear  to  women — as  I  perceive 
by  your  simpering,  none  of  you  hates  them  —  that 
between  you  and  the  woman  the  play  may  please.  If 
I  were  a  woman  I  would  kiss  as  many  of  you  as  had 
beards  that  pleased  me,  complexions  that  liked  me  and 
breaths  that  I  defied  not:  and,  I  am  sure,  as  many  as 
have  good  beards  or  good  faces  or  sweet  breaths  will,  for 
my  kind  offer,  when  I  make  curtsy,  bid  me  farewell.    222 

[Exeunt. 


NOTES. 


Act  I.— Scene  I. 

In  the  opening  scene  of  As  You  Like  It,  the  audience  is 
given  some  hint  as  to  the  general  character  of  the  play.  We 
are  introduced  to  one  of  the  chief  characters  in  the  play  in  the 
person  of  Orlando,  and  oiu:'  sympathies  are  enlisted  in  his 
behalf.  We  learn  of  the  banishment  of  the  old  Duke  to  the 
Forest  of  Arden,  and  of  the  friendship  between  Rosalind  and 
Celia.  At  the  same  time  the  interest  of  the  audience  is 
aroused  by  the  conflict  between  Oliver  and  Orlando,  and  the 
plans  for  the  wrestling  match  in  which  Oliver  hopes  he  "shall 
see  an  end  "  of  Orlando, 

1.  upon  this  fashion.     After  this  fashion, 

2.  poor  a  thousand.     A  poor  thousand. 

3.  on  his  blessing.     On  condition  of  receiving  his  blessing. 

6.  his  profit.     How  much  he  is  profiting  by  his  education. 

7.  stays.     Detains. 

unkept.     Without  proper  food  and  clothing. 
11.  manage.     Training. 

16.  countenance.     Here,  his  treatment  of  me. 

17.  hinds.     Peasants,  servants. 

18.  mines.     Undermines, 
gentility.     Gentle  birth. 

27.  what  make  you.     What  are  you  doing. 

3.3.  Marry.     A  mild  oath,  from  the  name  of  the  Virgin  Mary. 

be  naught.     Plague  upon  you  ! 

35-7.     An  allusion  to  the  story  of  the  Prodigal  Son  (Luke  xv). 

42-3.  in  the  gentle  condition  of  blood.  Considering  that  you  are 
of  gentle  (noble)  birth. 

45.  tradition.     Old  custom  of  doing  honour  to  the  oldest  son. 

48.  Your  being  older  than  I  entitles  you  to  more  of  the 
reverence  shown  to  him. 

93 


94  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   I 

49.     Oliver  attempts  to  strike  Orlando. 

50-1.  too  young  in  this.  Not  iny  equal  when  it  conies  to  a 
show  of  physical  strength. 

52-3.  villain.  Oliver  uses  the  word  in  the  sense  of  "scoundrel." 
Orlando  plays  upon  the  word,  and  uses  it  with  its  original 
meaning  of  "serf,"  one  who  lives  in  a  villa  or  farm. 

58.  railed  on  thyself.  In  saying  that  my  father  and  yours 
begot  villains. 

59-60.  for  your  father's  remembrance.  In  respect  to  the  memory 
of  your  father. 

65.  qualities.     Acquirements,  accomplishments. 

67.  exercises.     Means  of  improvement. 

68.  allottery.     Portion. 

69.  testament     Will. 

81.  grow  upon  me.     To  grow  troublesome. 

82.  physic  your  rankness.  Cui^e  you  of  your  impudence. 
"Rankness"  literally  means  coarseness  due  to  overgrowth. 

87.  So  please  you.     If  it  please  you. 

88.  importunes  access.     Begs  to  be  admitted. 
99.  to  wander.     To  go  into  exile. 

109.  the  forest  of  Arden.     See  Introduction,  p.  xi. 

110.  a  many.     A  multitude  of. 

111.  Robin  Hood.  A  famous  outlaw,  who  is  supposed  to  have 
lived  in  Sherwood  Forest,  Nottinghamshire,  in  the  thirteenth 
century. 

112-3.  fleet  the  time  carelessly.  Pass  the  time  swiftly  and  free 
from  care. 

113.  the  golden  world.  The  golden  age  when  peace  and  plenty 
reigned  on  the  earth. 

118.  hath  a  disposition.     Is  disposed,  or  inclined. 

119.  try  a  fall.  Try  to  throw  me,  to  see  which  one  of  the 
wrestlers  would  fall. 

120.  my  credit.    iNIy  reputation. 
123.  to  foU  him.     To  defeat  him. 

125.  withal.     Furthermore. 

126.  intendment.     Intention,  design. 


SCENE   II]  NOTES — AS   YOU  LIKE   IT  95 

brook.     Endure. 

131.  herein.     With  regard  t-o  this. 

132.  underhand.     Secret. 

133.  it.     Used  to  express  contempt. 
134-5.  envious  emulator.     Malicious  rival, 
parts.     Accomplishments. 

136.  contriver.     Plotter. 

natural  brother.     Brother  by  birth. 

137.  I  had  as  lief.  I  should  be  as  glad.  The  verb  "had"  is 
subjunctive,  and  the  sentence,  if  expanded,  would  read  some- 
thing like  this,  "I  should  regard  (have)  the  breaking  of  his 
neck  as  willingly  (lief)  as  the  breaking  of  his  finger." 

138.  thou  wert  best.  It  would  be  best  for  thee.  This  is  no 
doubt  a  corruption  of  the  construction  "You  were  best," 
meaning  "  It  were  (would  be)  best  for  you,"  in  which  you  is  in 
the  dative  case. 

140.  grace  himself  on  thee.     Gain  honour  at  your  expense, 
practise.     Plot. 

146.  anatomize.     Show  his  faults  in  detail. 
149.  payment.     Punishment. 

153.  this  gamester.  This  spirited  youth.  The  word  expresses 
contempt. 

155.  gentle.     Showing  good  breeding. 

156.  of  all  sorts.     By  all  classes  of  people. 

157.  in  the  heart  of  the  world.     In  the  affections  of  the  people. 
159.  misprised.     Underrated. 

160-1.  kindle  the  boy  thither.  Spur  him  on  to  take  part  in  the 
wrestling. 

Scene  II. 

In  Scene  II.  three  of  the  important  characters  in  the  play, 
Rosalind,  Celia,  and  Touchstone,  appear  on  the  stage.  Touch- 
stone, as  a  matter  of  course,  is  dressed  in  the  garb  of  the  court 
jester.  Rosalind  is  at  first  inclined  to  be  downhearted  because 
of  her  father's  banishment,  but  to  please  Celia  she  throws  oflf 
her  sadness,  and  her  real  disposition  is  seen  in  her  playful 
raillery  of  Touchstone  and  Le  Beau.     Then  comes  the  wrestling 


96  NOTES — AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  I 

match,  which  is  followed  by  the  announcement  of  the  banish- 
ment of  Orlando  and  the  duke's  displeasure  with  Rosalind. 
But  in  the  meantime  Orlando  and  Rosalind  have  fallen 
mutually  in  love  and  the  way  is  thus  prepared  for  the  com- 
plications in  the  scenes  that  are  to  follow. 

2-3.  am  mistress  of.     Really  feel. 

5.  learn.     Teach. 

9.  so.     If. 

11-3.  If  your  love  for  me  were  of  the  same  fine  quality  as 
mine  is  for  you. 

14.  the  condition  of  my  estate.     The  condition  of  my  affairs. 

19.  perforce.     By  main  force. 

render  thee  again  in  affection.  Give  back  because  of  my  love 
to  you. 

25.  prithee.     Pray  thee. 

27.  with  safety  of  a  pure  blush.  With  a  pure  blush  in  which 
there  is  no  harm. 

30-2.  Fortune  is  represented  as  turning  a  wheel,  which  is 
the  symbol  of  uncertainty  since  it  turns  so  easily.  When 
Celia  speaks  of  her  as  a  "  good  housewife  "  she  is  ironical. 

38.  ill-favouredly.     Plain,  homely  in  appearance. 

39.  office.     Work,  duties. 

40-1.  Fortune  gives  worldly  success ;  she  has  nothing  to  do 
with  the  human  features. 

42.  No  ?    Does  she  not  ?  ^ 

44.  wit  to  flout  at  Fortune.     Cleverness  to  mock  at  Fortune. 

47.  Nature's  natural.     One  who  is  by  nature  a  fool  (natural). 

62.  naught.     No  good. 

stand  to  it.     Maintain. 

63-4.  was  not  forsworn.     Did  not  break  his  oath. 

77.  old  Frederick.  Touchstone  uses  the  word  "old"  in  a 
familiar  sense. 

80.  taxation.     Your  satirical  speeches. 

83.  By  my  troth.     Truly. 

&i.  silenced.  This  is  probably  a  reference  to  some  new 
restriction  that  had  been  put  upon  the  theatres. 


SCENE    II]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  97 

88.  put  on  us.     Deliver  or  announce  to  us. 

91.  marketable.  Being  crammed  with  food  they  will  be  fatter 
or  plumper  and  hence  more  ready  for  market. 

95.  colour.     Nature,  character. 

100.  laid  on  with  a  trowel.     Said  clumsily,  without  delicacy. 

101.  if  I  keep  not  my  rank.  If  I  am  not  allowed  to  finish  my 
sentence  in  an  orderly  way. 

102.  Rosalind  puns  on  the  word  "rank,"  and  uses  it  in  the 
sense  of  "  unpleasant  odour." 

110.  dead  and  buried.     A  thing  of  the  past. 

113.  This  is  the  way  the  old  tales  usually  begin. 

114.  proper.     Handsome. 

115.  presence.     Appearance. 

116-7.  The  young  men  would  carry  their  bills,  or  halberds, 
on  their  shoulders  (necks).  But  Rosalind  plays  upon  the  word 
"bills,"  and  uses  it  in  the  sense  of  "public  notices,"  which 
usually  began  with  the  legal  phrase,  "Be  it  known  unto  all 
men  by  these  presents."  There  is  a  further  play  upon  the 
word  "presents"  (presence). 

117.  these  presents.  These  present  words ;  these  words  which 
are  before  you.  Presents  is  an  adjective  modifying  these. 
Fi-ench  adjectives  take  the  plural  form  to  agree  with  a  plural 
noun  or  pronoun,  and  in  this  legal  phi^ase  the  adjective  j^f'eseiit 
is  written  in  the  plural  also. 

123.  dole.     Lamentation. 

132.  promise.     Assure. 

133-4.  broken  music.  Broken  ribs,  which  would  make  a  sound 
when  breaking.  According  to  another  explanation,  certain  in- 
struments were  made  in  sets  of  four  which  harmonized  with 
one  another,  and  when  instruments  belonging  to  different  sets 
were  played  together  they  were  said  to  make  "broken  music." 

142.  entreated.     Dissuaded. 

his  own  peril  on  his  forwardness.  If  he  insists  on  wi-estling,  he 
must  do  so  at  his  own  peril. 

145.  successfully.     As  if  he  would  be  successful. 

146.  cousin.     Relative  ;  in  this  case,  niece. 


98  NOTES — AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT   I 

166.  knew  yourself  with  your  judgment.  Used  your  reason  in 
considering  yourself  and  your  chances. 

171.  misprised.     Undervalued. 

174.  wherein.  The  grammatical  construction  is  loose.  No 
doubt  Orlando  means  "Punish  me  not  with  your  hard  thoughts 
regarding  my  conduct,  concerning  which  (wlierein)  I  feel 
guilty,  since  I  have  to  deny  you  anything." 

178.  gracious.     Looked  upon  with  favour. 
185.  eke  out.     Add  to. 
191-2.     His  wishes  are  more  modest. 
193.  one  fall.     One  bout. 

198.  come  your  ways.     Come  along. 

199.  Hercules.     The  Greek  hero  who  typifies  strength. 
be  thy  speed.     Give  thee  success. 

205-6.  am  not  well-breathed.  Have  not  put  forth  my  full 
strength. 

216.  still.     Always. 

223.  calling.     Name. 

231.  envious.     Malicious. 

234.  justly.     Exactly. 

236.  out  of  suits.  Out  of  favour.  The  idea  may  be  that  she 
is  not  wearing  the  livery  (suit)  of  fortune,  or  else  that  fortune 
will  not  grant  what  she  asks  (her  suits). 

237.  could  give  more.     Would  willingly  give  more. 

239.  my  better  parts.     My  better  qualities. 

24:1.  quintain.  The  wooden  figure  of  a  man.  Tilting  at  the 
quintain  was  formerly  a  popular  sport  in  England.  The  quin- 
tain consisted  of  an  upright  post  with  a  crosspiece  which 
revolved  on  a  pivot.  At  one  end,  or  arm,  of  the  crosspiece 
was  the  wooden  figure  of  a  man,  generally  painted  to  represent 
a  Saracen.  At  the  other  end  was  a  bag  of  sand  or  of  flour. 
The  tilter,  riding  at  full  speed  on  horseback,  aimed  to  strike 
the  figure  full  in  the  face  with  his  lance  and  at  the  same  time 
to  escape  being  struck  by  the  bag  as  it  swung  around  on  the 
pivot. 


SCENE   III]  NOTES — AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  99 

247.  Have  with  you.  I'll  go  with  you.  Have  it  your  own 
way  (with  you). 

248.  passion.     Strong  feeling. 

250.  urged  conference.     Seemed  to  wish  a  conversation. 

252.  Or.. or.     Either... or. 

254.  Albeit.     Although. 

258.  humorous.     Full  of  whims. 

272.  argument.     Cause,  reason. 

277.  in  a  better  world  than  this.     When  conditions  are  better. 

280.  from  the  smoke  into  the  smother.  From  bad  to  worse. 
The  "smother"  is  thick  stifling  smoke,  and  hence  worse  than 
ordinary  smoke. 

Scene  III. 

Scene  III.  does  little  more  than  round  out  the  incidents  of 
the  previous  scene.  Rosalind  confesses  herself  in  love  with 
Orlando.  The  Duke  banishes  Rosalind  because  he  finds  that 
she  has  the  sympathy  of  the  people.  Celia  determines  to 
accompany  Rosalind  and  they  agree  to  take  "the  clownish 
fool,"  Touchstone,  with  them  as  a  comfort  to  their  travel. 

5-6.  lame  me  with  reasons.  Throw  so  many  at  me  that  if  they 
were  stones  they  would  lame  me. 

8-9.  mad  without  any.  Beside  herself,  out  of  her  mind,  with- 
out any  reason  for  it. 

11.  my  father's  child.     That  is,  myself. 

18-9.  As  used  in  line  18  "  Hem  "  means  "  Cough  "  ;  in  line  19 
it  is  a  call  to  attract  notice. 

21.  take  the  part  of.     Are  on  the  side  of. 

23.  a  good  wish  upon  you  !     Blessing  upon  you  I 

try  in  time.  The  time  will  come  when  you  will  try  to  wrestle 
With  them. 

24.  in  despite  of  a  fall.  In  spite  of  your  being  thrown  down 
in  wrestling,  or  in  spite  of  your  falling  in  love. 

30.  By  this  kind  of  chase.     If  you  follow  up  this  argument. 

S4.  Rosalind  has  said  "Hate  him  not."  Celia  replies,  "Why 
should  I  not  do  as  you  ask,  i.e.,  hate  him  not?  Or,  in  other 
words,  "Why  should  I  not  love  him?" 


100  NOTES — AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   I 

38.  safest  haste.     Haste  that  will  ensure  your  safety. 

45.  If  I  know  myself. 

47.  frantic.     Out  of  my  mind. 

51.  purgation.     Proving  themselves  innocent. 

52.  grace.     Goodness. 

67.  stay'd  her.     Kept  her.     Detained  her. 

68.  ranged  along.     Gone  on  her  way, 
70.  remorse.     Pity,  tenderness. 

73.  still.     Always. 

75.  Juno's  swans.  Juno's  chariot  was  drawn  by  peacocks,  not 
by  swans.     The  chariot  of  Venus  was  drawn  by  swans. 

78.  smoothness.     Softness  of  disposition. 

80.  speak  to  the  people.     Appeal  to  the  people. 

98.  teacheth.     Should  teach. 

103.  take  your  change  upon  you.  Make  this  change  in  your 
hfe. 

113.  umber.  A  brown  coloured  pigment,  so  called  because  it 
was  first  brought  from  Umbria  in  Italy. 

117.  suit  me  all  points  like  a  man.  Dress  myself  in  every  way 
like  a  man. 

118.  curtle-axe.  Cutlass.  The  root  of  the  word  is  Lat. 
cultellus,  a  little  ploughshare.  The  form  curtle-axe  is  due 
to  false  analogy,  because  of  a  supposed  connection  with  axe. 

121.  swashing.     Swaggering. 

122.  mannish.  Male.  The  word  is  used  humorously  to 
express  contempt. 

123.  outface  it  with  their  semblances.  Conceal  their  cowardice 
with  an  appearance  of  bravery. 

126.  Ganymede.  A  beautiful  youth  who  was  cupbearer  to 
Jove. 

129.  AHena.     A  stranger. 

130.  assay'd.     Attempted. 


SCENE    l]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  101 

Questions. 

1.  Orlando  admits  that  his  education  and  training  have  been 
neglected.  How  is  it,  then,  that  the  audience  are  so  ready  to 
admire  him  ? 

2.  What  means  has  the  dramatist  used  to  heighten  the 
interest  of  the  audience  in  the  wresthng  match? 

3.  (a)  What  are  we  told  in  Act  I.  regarding  the  old  Duke  ? 
(b)  Point  out  two  speeches  in  Act  I.  which  help  to  show  how 

long  the  old  Duke  has  been  in  exile. 

4.  What  suggestions  do  you  find  in  Act  I.  as  to  the  personal 
appearance  of  Celia  and  of  Rosalind  ? 

5.  In  what  respects  does  the  character  of  Oliver  resemble 
that  of  Duke  Frederick  ? 

Act  II.— Scene  I. 

In  this  Scene  we  are  given  our  first  glimpse  of  the  Forest  of 
Arden.  The  cheerful  philosophy  of  the  old  Duke  is  in  marked 
contrast  with  the  humours  of  Duke  Frederick  in  the  previous 
scenes  ;  and  in  the  moralizing  of  the  melancholy  Jaques  there 
is  a  further  satire  on  the  life  of  the  court. 

3.  painted  pomp.     With  a  showy  exterior. 

4.  envious.     Spiteful. 

5.  As  a  matter  of  fact  the  penalty  imposed  upon  Adam  was 
the  necessity  to  labour.  "  In  the  sweat  of  thy  face  shalt  thou 
eat  bread."  But  being  cast  out  of  the  Garden  of  Eden,  he  was 
exposed  to  the  changes  of  season,  and  the  dramatist  speaks  of 
this  as  the  "penalty."  Some  editors  have  changed  "but"  to 
"not,"  but  this  change  involves  changes  in  punctuation. 

11.  feelingly.     By  appealing  to  my  senses  or  feelings, 
persuade  me  what  I  am.    Show  me  what  I  really  am,  not  what 
flatterers  say  I  am. 

13-4.  In  Shakespeare's  time  the  toad  was  commonly  believed 
to  be  venomous,  and,  strangely  enough,  it  was  thought  that 
the  grayish  stone,  known  as  the  toadstone,  was  obtained  from 
the  head  of  a  species  of  toad  found  in  Italy.  Possibly  the 
clearness  of  the  toad's  eye  had  something  to  do  with  the  belief 
that  he  "wears  yet  a  precious  jewel  in  his  head." 


102  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT    II 

15.  exempt  from  public  haunt.     Not  troubled  by  the  presence 
of  other  people. 

19-20.  "WTio  can  thus  see  so  much  good  in  your  ill-fortune. 
Note  the  metaphor  in  translate  and  style. 

22.  it  irks  me.     It  grieves  me. 

dappled.     Spotted. 

fools.     Innocent  creatures. 

24.  confines.     Limits,  territory, 

forked  heads.     Arrows. 

26.  Jaques.     Pronounced  as  two  syllables   in   Shakespeare. 
Scan  the  line. 

27.  in  that  kind.     In  his  melancholy  way. 

30.  lay  along.     Stretched  out. 

31.  antique.     Ancient. 

33.  sequester'd.     Separated  from  its  companions. 

41.  of.     By. 

44.  moralize.     Draw  a  moral  from. 

46.  for.     With  regard  to. 

the  needless  stream.     The  stream  that  didn't  need  his  tears. 

47.  testament.     Will. 

49.  being  there.     With  regard  to  his  being  there. 

50.  velvet.     Sleek,  smooth-coated. 

51-2.  part  the  flux  of  company.     Separate  one  from  the  crowd 
(stream)  of  his  companions. 

57.  bankrupt.     Here,  ruined  deer. 

58.  invectively.     With  bitter  comment, 
pierceth  through.     Probes,  analyses. 

59.  body.     The  whole  organism. 

61.  what's  worse.     Even  worse  than  tyrants. 

62.  up.     Used  here  to  intensify  the  word  kill 

63.  assign'd.     Set  apart  by  nature. 

68.  cope  him.     Encounter  him. 

69.  matter.     Good  sense. 


SCENES   II-IIl]       NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  103 

Scene  II. 

The  only  purpose  that  this  scene  serves  in  the  play  is  to  let 
the  audience  know  that  Celia,  Rosalind,  and  Touchstone  have 
been  able  to  carry  out  their  plans  and  have  escaped  from  the 
Court. 

3.  Have  approved  and  have  not  objected  to  their  running 
away. 

8.  roynish.     Rascally;  literally,  scabby. 

20.  suddenly.     At  once. 

21.  inquisition.     Inquiry, 
quail.     Slacken. 

22.  To  bring  again.     To  bring  back. 

Scene  III. 

This  scene  is  intended  to  awaken  further  the  sympathies  of 
the  audience  for  Orlando.  To  Adam,  the  old  family  servant, 
Orlando  is  "the  memory  of  old  Sir  Rowland" ;  and  the  devotion 
of  Adam  in  itself  helps  to  show  to  advantage  the  finer  qualities 
of  Orlando. 

3.  memory.  So  like  old  Sir  Rowland  in  appearance  that  you 
call  him  to  my  memory. 

8.  fond.     Foolish. 

9.  priser.     Prize-fighter, 
humours.     Full  of  changing  moods. 

13.  no  more  do  yours.  Your  virtues  do  not  serve  you  any 
better. 

14.  Although  outwardly  your  virtues  appear  sacred,  in 
reality  they  betray  you. 

16.  Envenoms.     Poisons. 
24.  use.     Are  accustomed. 

27.  practices.     Designs. 

28.  butchery.     Place  of  butchery. 

39.  a  diverted  blood.     Brotherly  feeling  that  has  been  turned 
out  of  its  natural  course. 
41.  thrifty  hire.     Wages  that  I  saved  by  my  thrift. 
43.     When  because  of  age  I  should  be  unfit  for  service. 


104  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   II 

44.  "V^inien  I  should  be  disregarded  and  thrown  aside  because 
of  my  age. 

51.  rebellious  liquors.     Liquors  that  injure  the  blood. 

52.  unbashful  forehead.     Shameless  face. 

59.  constant.     Faithful, 
antique.     Ancient. 

60.  "Wlien  servants  worked  for  the  sake  of  duty,  not  for  the 
sake  of  reward. 

61.  for.     In  keeping  with. 

63-4.  Having  gained  promotion  they  slacken  in  their  service 
because  they  now  have  the  promotion  they  wanted. 

67.   In  lieu  of.     In  return  for. 

husbandry.     The  care  you  have  taken  with  it. 

70.  We'll  find  some  place  where  w^e  can  live  humbly  and 
contentedly. 

76.  too  late  a  week.     A  proverbial  phrase. 

Scene  IV. 

A  large  part  of  the  comedy  in  As  You  Like  It  has  to  do  with 
the  shepherds  and  shepherdesses  in  the  Forest  of  Arden,  Corin 
and  Silvius  and  William,  Phebe  and  Audrey.  In  this  scene 
the  humour  lies  chiefly  in  the  appearance  and  actions  of  the 
love-sick  Silvius,  which  provides  Touchstone  with  a  subject 
for  his  mirth.  The  conversation  with  Corin,  furthermore, 
prepares  the  way  for  the  purchase  of  the  sheepfold,  and 
Rosalind  and  Celia  have  henceforth  a  dwelling  of  their  own  in 
the  Forest  of  Arden.  It  is  perhaps  a  matter  for  surprise  that 
Rosalind  does  not  at  once  seek  out  her  father,  but  it  is  part  of 
the  charm  of  the  Forest  of  Arden  that  those  who  come  under 
its  spell  are  not  expected  to  act  always  as  they  would  do  in 
real  life. 

4.  could  find  in  my  heart.     Am  inclined  to. 

6.  the  weaker  vessel.     The  woman.     See  I  Peter,  iii,  7. 

doublet  and  hose.  Coat  and  breeches.  The  doublet  was  so 
called  because  it  was  lined,  and  hence  "double." 

11.  bear  no  cross.  One  side  of  the  silver  coins  of  Elizabeth's 
reign  was  marked  with  a  cross. 


SCENE   IV]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  105 

26.  As  sure  I  think.    And  with  regard  to  this  I  certainly  think. 
28.  fantasy.     Fancy,  in  the  sense  of  "love." 

41.  searching-  of  thy  wound.     In  considering  your  misfortune. 

42.  by  hard  adventure.     By  ill  fortune. 

44.  him.  The  stone  which  in  the  dark  he  imagines  to  be  a 
rival. 

46.  batlet.  A  small  bat,  or  stick,  used  in  beating  clothes 
while  washing  them. 

47.  chopt.     Chapped. 

48.  peascod.  Pea-pod.  According  to  the  belief  of  country 
lovers,  when  a  pea-pod  was  snatched  from  the  vine  and  the 
peas  remained  in  it,  the  lover  was  likely  to  be  successful  in 
his  suit. 

'     cods.     Peas. 

51-2.  Just  as  everything  in  nature  is  certain  to  die  (mortal), 
so  ev^ery  creature  that  is  in  love  is  extremely  (mortally)  foolish. 
There  is,  of  course,  no  point  in  the  comparison. 

54.  wit.     Cleverness. 

57.  something.     Somewhat.  ^ 

67.  entertainment.     Refreshment. 

70.  faints  for  succour.     Faints  for  want  of  help. 

74.  fleeces.     Sheep. 

76.  recks.     Cares. 

78.  cote.     Cottage. 

bounds  of  feed.     Pastures. 

83.  What  is  he.     What  sort  of  person  is  he. 

shall  buy.     Intends  to  buy. 

87.  if  it  stands  with  honesty.  If  it  is  consistent  with  honest 
dealing.     If  it  is  not  acting  dishonestly  towards  Silvius. 

89.  Thou  shalt  have  money  to  pay  for  it  from  us. 

90.  mend.     Improve,  increase. 

91.  waste.     Pass,  spend. 

93.  upon  report.     Upon  hearing  further  details. 

95.  feeder.     Of  your  sheep. 

96.  right  suddenly.     Immediately. 


106  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   II 

Scene  V. 

In  this  scene  Amiens  and  Jaques  are  seen  in  contrast  with 
each  other.  Amiens,  to  judge  from  his  songs,  is  contented 
with  Hfe  in  the  Forest  of  Arden,  but  Jaques,  as  usual,  is  cynical. 
Naturally  enough,  he  finds  the  Duke  "too  disp\itable,"  for  , 
the  Duke  is  unlikely  to  allow  his  cynical  comment  to  go 
unquestioned. 

5.  Come.     Let  him  come. 

14.  rag-g-ed.     Rough. 

17.  stanzo.  Stanza.  In  Shakespeare's  time  stanza  was  a 
new  word,  recently  introduced  from  the  Italian. 

20-1.  they  owe  me  nothing.  They  are  not  as  important  as  the 
names  of  people  who  owe  me  money. 

24.  that  they  call.     That  which  they  call. 

25.  dog-apes.     Dog-faced  apes,  baboons. 

26.  methinks.     It  seems  to  me. 

29.  cover  the  while.     Lay  the  cloth  while  I  am  singing. 

33.  disputable.     Fond  of  argument. 

37.  i'  the  sun.     In  the  sunshine,  in  the  open  air. 

45.  in  despite  of  my  invention.  In  spite  of  my  lack  of  imagination. 

51.  Ducdame.  A  meaningless  word  which  Jaques  uses  to  fill 
up  a  line. 

54.  An  if.  An  means  "if,"  and  it  is  used  here  merely  to 
intensify  the  word  if. 

sS.  the  firstborn  of  Egypt.  Probably  a  proverbial  expression 
meaning  "all  high-born  persons." 

Scene  VI. 

This  scene  is  intended  merely  to  show  that  Orlando  has 
reached  the  Forest  of  Arden,  and  to  prepare  the  way  for  his 
meeting  with  the  Duke  and  his  company  in  the  following 
scene. 

6.  uncouth.     Literally,  unknown  ;  hence,  rough,  rude. 

savage.     Wild. 

8.  You  fancy  yourself  nearer  death  than  you  really  are. 

9.  be  comfortable.     Take  comfort. 


SCENE  VIl]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  107 

Scene  VII. 

The  melancholy  Jaques  in  his  rambles  in  the  forest  has  met 
with  Touchstone,  and  he  has  found  that  they  have  something 
in  common.  It  is  the  privilege  of  Touchstone  as  the  jester  of 
the  Court  to  rail  at  the  follies  of  the  time.  Jaques,  too,  finds 
his  greatest  pleasure  in  exposing  the  weaknesses  of  others ;  but 
while  Touchstone's  raillery  is  good-humored  and  wholesome, 
that  of  Jaques  is  bitter  and  cynical.  To  Jaques  the  world  is 
not  a  place  where  men  and  women  live  to  any  real  purpose, — it 
is  merely  a  stage,  and  men  and  women  are  merely  players. 
With  such  a  nature  as  this,  it  is  natural  that  Jaques  should 
resent  the  intrusion  of  Orlando,  whose  wholesome  nature  he 
instinctively  feels  to  be  a  challenge  to  his  cynicism.  In  the 
heart  of  the  Duke,  on  the  other  hand,  the  distress  of  Orlando 
awakens  nothing  but  sympathy. 

5.  compact  of  jars.     Made  up  of  discords. 

6.  A  reference  to  the  old  belief  in  the  music  of  the  spheres. 
14.  motley.    Wearing  a  motley  dress.    The  professional  jester 

was  distinguished  from  other  servants  by  his  parti-coloured 
dress. 

a  miserable  world  !  Jaques  never  loses  an  opportunity  to 
make  cynical  remarks  about  the  world  in  which  he  lives.  He 
means  here  that  it  is  a  miserable  world  that  needs  to  have  its 
follies  probed  by  a  fool. 

18.  in  good  set  terms.     Roundly,  without  sparing  her. 

20.  "  Fortune  favours  fools,"'  but  she  hasn't  favoured  me. 

21.  dial.     A  small  portable  sun-dial. 
poke.     Pouch,  pocket. 

22.  lack-lustre.     Dull ;  hence,  apparently  serious. 
27.  ripe.     Ripen. 

29.  thereby  hangs  a  tale.  There  is  a  story  connected  with  this. 
Touchstone,  while  pretending  to  be  very  serious,  is  making  fun 
of  people  who  moralize  in  this  commonplace  way. 

30.  moral.     Moralize. 

31.  chanticleer.     The  cock,  the  bird  that  "sings  clear." 

33.  sans  intermission.     Without  stopping, 

34.  by  his  dial.  This  is  a  way  of  saying  that  Touchstone's 
dial  was  no  good. 


108  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   II 

35.  Motley's  the  only  wear.  AYho  would  not  be  a  fool,  and 
wear  a  motley  dress  ? 

40.  dry.  A  person  who  was  slow  in  learning,  but  who  had  a 
retentive  memory,  was  said  to  have  a  "dry"  brain. 

42.  the  which.  The  article  the  was  frequently  used  before 
ivliich,  in  Elizabethan  English,  to  give  greater  definiteness  to 
the  pronoun. 

vents.     Utters. 

43.  In  mangled  forms.     In  disjointed  phrases. 

45.  suit.  Petition,  or  dress.  A  play  on  the  two  meanings  of 
the  word. 

46-8.  Provided  you  get  rid  of  any  ideas  that  may  have 
grown  up  in  your  minds  that  I  am  not  a  fool. 

48-50.  I  must,  besides,  be  free  to  make  fun  of  whomsoever 
I  wish. 

51.     They  that  feel  my  sarcasm  most  keenly. 

54-6.  Jaques  means  to  say  that  the  man  who  is  hurt  by  the 
fool's  sarcasm  must  not  show  it.  Line  56  has  only  four  feet, 
and  some  editors  think  that  "Not  to,"  or  "But  to"  should  be 
supplied.  Taking  the  lines  as  they  stand,  without  supplying 
anything,  the  meaning  is,  "He  that  is  hit  by  the  fool's  sarcasm 
pretends  that  he  has  not  felt  it  (Doth  seem  senseless)  by 
laughing  loudly  (very  foolishly).  If  "But  to"  is  supplied,  the 
meaning  is  that  he  acts  (Doth)  very  foolishly  merely  to  (But 
to)  seem  insensible  of  the  jest.  If  "Not  to"  is  supplied  the 
meanifig  is  that  it  is  foolish  of  him  not  to  seem  insensible  of 
the  jest.  These  different  interpretations  are  possible  owing  to 
the  fact  that  "Doth"  may  be  used  in  different  senses,  as  an 
auxiliary  and  as  a  principal  verb. 

56.  bob.     A  blow;  here,  a  jest  or  jibe. 

57.  anatomized.     Analysed. 

58.  squandering  glances.     Random  hits. 

64.  a  counter.  A  round  piece  of  metal  used  in  counting,  and 
worth  nothing  in  itself. 

66.  libertine.     One  who  lives  a  debauched  life. 

67.  the  brutish  sting.     The  animal  passions. 

68.  embossed.     Swollen,  raised. 


SCENE    VIl]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  109 

headed.  Having  come  to  a  head,  as  in  the  case  of  a  boil  or 
other  sore. 

69.  with  license  of  free  foot.  Indulging  without  restraint  in 
all  forms  of  evil. 

70.  the  general  world.     The  public. 

71.  Jaques  misses  the  point  of  the  Duke's  criticism.  The 
Duke  has  said  that  Jaques  would  make  society  more  corrupt. 
Jaques  does  not  answer  this,  but  goes  on  to  argue  that  no  one 
has  a  right  to  be  offended  at  what  he  says. 

on  pride.     Against  pride. 

72.  tax.     Accuse. 

74.  Till,  in  the  eifort  to  keep  up  appearances,  one  becomes 
poor. 

the  wearer.     The  wearer  of  fine  clothes. 

77.  The  cost  of  princes.  Clothes  which  only  the  rich  can  afford 
to  wear. 

80.  what.     Who  ;  used  contemptuously. 

of  basest  function.     Of  the  meanest  occupation. 

81.  his  bravery  is  not  at  my  cost.  I  don't  have  to  pay  for  his 
fine  clothes. 

82.  therein.     By  retorting. 

82-3.  suits  his  folly  to  the  mettle  of  my  speech.  Shows  that  the 
point  of  my  speech  applies  to  his  foolish  actions. 

84.  There  you  have  my  answer.  What  have  you  to  say 
to  it.^ 

86.  hath  wrong'd  himself.  Because  he  is  guilty  of  the  faults 
of  which  I  complain. 

87-8.     No  one  needs  to  take  my  criticism  to  himself. 

91.     To  what  class  of  people  can  this  impudent  fellow  belong  ? 

94.  civility.     Good  manners. 

95.  at  first.     When  you  spoke  of  my  distress. 

97.  inland  bred.     Brought  up  in  an  inland  town. 

98.  nurture.     Good  breeding. 
110.  savage.     Wild,  rude. 

117.  knoll'd.     Knell'd,  summoned  by  a  bell. 


110  NOTES — AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT  II 

121.  enforcement.  Compulsion,  power  by  Avhich  my  wishes 
are  enforced. 

122.  blush.     For  my  incivility. 

128.  upon  command.     According  to  your  commands. 
135.  weak  evils.     Evils  which  produce  weakness. 
137.  waste.     Use. 

140.  The  world, — the  theatre  where  all  men  play  their  parts. 

141.  pageants.     Shows. 

143.  merely  players.     Nothing  but  actors. 
147.  Mewling.     WTiimpering. 

151.  Sighing  like  furnace.  Sounding  like  the  bellows  of  a 
furnace. 

152.  Made  in  praise  of  his  mistress'  eyebrow. 

153.  strange.     New-fangled, 
pard.     Panther  or  leopard. 

154.  sudden.     Hasty,  impulsive. 

155.  the  bubble  reputation.     Lasting  no  longer  than  a  bubble. 

157.  capon.     Here,  roast  chicken. 

158.  of  formal  cut.  Cut  in  such  a  way  as  to  be  in  keeping 
with  his  dignity  as  judge. 

159.  saws.     Sayings,  maxims. 

modern  instances.     Commonplace  illustrations. 

160.  pantaloon.  A  foolish  old  man.  In  the  Italian  comedies 
of  Shakespeare's  time  one  of  the  stock  characters  was  Panta- 
lone,  a  miserly  foolish  old  dotard.  The  word  pantaloon  is  a 
corruption  of  "Pantalone." 

166.  his.     Its. 

168.  mere  oblivion.     Complete  forgetfuLness. 

181.  Because  thou  art  not  seen.  We  have  to  endure  only  the 
feeling  of  the  wind.  To  see  the  cause  of  our  misery  would  add 
to  it. 

190.  warp.  This  may  mean  either  that  the  wind  ruffles  the 
surface  of  the  water,  or  that  it  changes  the  water  to  a  rough 
sheet  of  ice. 

192.  As  the  sting  of  being  forgotten  by  one's  friends. 


SCENES    I-Il]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  111 

196.  effigies.     Likeness, 
■witness.     Testify. 

197.  limn'd  and  living.     Drawn  in  a  lifelike  fashion. 

Questions. 

1.  Contrast  the  opinions  of  the  Duke  and  Jaques  regarding 
their  life  in  the  Forest  of  Arden. 

2.  Show  by  reference  to  Scenes  III.,  YI.  and  VII.,  what 
purpose  Adam  serves  in  the  play. 

3.  Compare  the  Song  of  Amiens  in  Scene  V.  with  his  song  in 
Scene  VII. 

4.  Why  does  Jaques  not  like  the  Duke  ?  'Why  does  he  like 
Touchstone  ? 

5.  Point  out  details  in  this  Act  by  which  the  audience  are 
made  to  feel  that  the  Forest  of  Arden  is  far  from  the  Court. 

6.  One  of  the  lords  speaks  of  Jaques  as  "the  melancholy 
Jaques."  Show  by  reference  to  the  speech  beginning  "  All  the 
world's  a  stage"  (Scene  VII.)  that  he  is  "melancholy." 

Act  III.— Scene  I. 

In  this  scene  a  just  retribution  overtakes  Oliver  for  his 
unnatural  treatment  of  Orlando.  This  scene  also  prepares  the 
audience  for  the  appearance  of  Oliver  in  the  Forest  of  Arden 
at  a  later  stage  in  the  play.  » 

2.  the  better  part.     The  greater  part. 

3.  argument  of.     Subject  for. 

16.  my  officers  of  such  a  nature.     Whose  particular  duty  it  is. 

17.  Make  an  extent  upon.     Seize  upon.     A  legal  phrase. 

18.  Expediently.     Expeditiously,  without  delay. 

Scene  II. 

At  the  opening  of  the  scene  Orlando  unconsciously  prepares 
the  way  for  further  complications  in  the  plot  by  hanging  love 
verses  on  the  trees.  Through  these  verses  Rosalind  learns  of 
his  love  for  her,  and  playfully  proposes  to  try  to  cure  him  of 
his  love.    In  the  meantime  Jaques  and  Orlando  have  met,  and, 


112  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   III 

as  might  have  been  expected,  they  openly  disagree.  The  cynic 
and  the  lover  have  nothing  in  common ;  and  in  the  encounter 
of  Tvits  Jaques  in  this  case  comes  off  second  best.  Earlier  in 
the  scene  Corin  and  Touchstone  meet.  It  is  natural  that  with 
them  the  talk  should  turn  on  the  respective  merits  of  the  life 
of  the  courtier  and  the  life  of  the  shepherd,  and  this  subject 
gives  an  opportunity  for  wholesome  humour. 

2.  thrice-crowned  queen.  The  moon,  who  rules  the  upper  air 
as  Cynthia  (or  Luna),  the  earth  as  Diana,  and  the  underworld 
as  Proserpine  (or  Hecate). 

3.  chaste.  Diana  was  the  virgin  goddess,  untouched  by  the 
passion  of  love. 

4.  thy  huntress'  name.     Here,  Rosalind, 
my  full  life.     My  whole  life. 

doth  sway.     ContrQls,  as  the  moon  controls  the  tides. 

6.  character.     Cut,  engrave. 

8.  witness'd.     Testified  to. 

10.  unexpressive.  Inexpressible,  beyond  the  power  of  words 
to  describe. 

15.  naught.     No  good. 

29.  may  complain  of  good  breeding.  That  is,  of  the  lack  of 
good  breeding. 

43.  parlous.     Perilous. 

48.  but  you  kiss.     "Without  kissing  ;  except  you  kiss. 

50.  Instance.     Give  me  an  illustration. 

51.  still.     Always. 

52.  fells.     Fleeces. 

54.  a  mutton.     A  sheep. 

60,  surgery.     Handling :  the  literal  meaning  of  the  word. 

62.  civet.     Perfume  procured  from  the  civet  cat. 

63-4.  Touchstone  says  that  as  compared  with  a  good  piece 
of  flesh,  Corin  is  no  better  than  meat  for  worms. 

65.  perpend.     Reflect,  consider, 
birth.     Origin. 

66.  Mend  the  instance.     Give  me  a  better  illustration. 


SCENE    II]  NOTES — AS   YOU    LIKE    IT  113 

70.  make  incision  in  thee.  Cure  thee.  The  old  niethorl  of 
curing  disease  was  to  let  blood. 

71.  raw.     Crude,  green. 

74.  content  with  my  harm.     Patient  under  my  misfortunes. 
82.  lined.     Drawn,  deUneated. 
85.  fair.     Beauty.  i 

88.  right.     True,  perfect. 

rank.     Procession ;  the  butter-women  going  along  one  after 
the  other  at  a  jog  trot. 
102.  prick.     Thorn. 
104.  infect.     Pollute. 

107.  graff.     Graft. 

108.  medlar.  A  pun  on  the  word  meddler.  The  medlar  is  a 
wild  fruit,  found  in  Europe,  resembling  a  pear.  It  is  not 
pleasant  to  the  taste  until  it  begins  to  decay. 

115.  For.     Because. 

117.  civil  sayings.  Sayings  that  will  show  that  civilized 
people  live  here. 

120.  That.     So  that. 

121.  Buckles  in.     Contains,  includes. 

128.  quintessence.  Literally,  the  fifth  essence.  The  body,  it 
was  believed,  was  composed  of  the  four  elements,  and  the  finer 
qualities  of  soul  were  spoken  of  as  a  quintessence. 

sprite.     Spirit. 

128-9.  The  best  qualities  of  every  creature,  which  Heaven 
wishes  to  show  in  miniature  in  one  person. 

132.  wide-enlarged.     Fully  developed. 

133.  presently.     Immediately, 
distill'd.     Produced  in  its  purest  form. 

134.  Helen,  wife  of  Menelaus,  King  of  Greece,  was  the  most 
beautiful  woman  in  the  world ;  but  she  proved  false  to  her 
husband. 

135.  Cleopatra.     Queen  of  Egypt. 

136.  Atalanta.  A  maiden  of  Arcadia  who  was  renowned  for 
her  beauty  and  for  her  swiftness  in  running.  Her  "better 
part"  is  probably  her  fleetness  of  foot. 


114  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  [ACT   III 

137.  Lucretia.  A  Roman  matron  who  was  dishonoured  by 
Sextus  Tarquin  and  took  her  own  life  in  consequence. 

138.  parts.     Qualities. 

139.  synod.     Assembly. 
141.  touches.     Traits, 
dearest  prized.     Most  valued. 
144.  pulpiter.     Preacher, 
homily.     Sermon. 

151.  scrip.     The  shepherd's  pouch. 
162.  should  be.     Came  to  be. 

165.  Pjrthagoras.  A  Greek  philosopher  who  taught  the 
doctrine  of  the  transmigration  of  souls. 

166.  an  Irish  rat.  An  allusion  to  the  belief  that  rats  were 
rhymed  to  death  in  Ireland. 

167.  Trow  you.     Do  you  know. 

173-4.     The  most  improbable  things  may  happen. 
177-8.  petitionary  vehemence.     Earnest  entreaty. 

181.  out  of  all  hooping.  That  cannot  be  expressed  by  any  shouts 
or  exclamations.     "Hooping"  is  the  older  form  of  u'hooping. 

182.  Good  my  complexion.  A  mild  oath.  Celia  has  accused 
her  of  changing  colour  (1.  170). 

183.  caparisoned.     Dressed. 

184-5.  One  inch,  etc.  To  be  kept  in  ignorance  a  moment 
longer  is  to  Rosalind  as  tedious  as  to  explore  the  unknown 
South  Seas.  Or  the  meaning  may  be  that  Rosalind  will  ask  so 
many  questions  that  Celia's  attempt  to  answer  them  will  be 
like  embarking  on  a  voyage  of  discovery  in  the  South  Seas. 

198.  in  an  instant.     In  one  instant. 

199-200.  speak,  sad  brow  and  true  maid.  Speak  seriously  and 
truly ;  with  sad  brow  and  like  a  true  maid. 

207.  what  makes  he  ?    What  is  he  doing  ? 

210.  Gargantua's  mouth.  Gargantua  was  a  giant  who  was  the 
chief  character  in  a  story  written  in  1532,  by  Rabelais,  a  French 
author.  According  to  the  story  Gargantua  gulped  down  a 
salad  with  leaves  as  big  as  walnut  trees,  in  which  were  hidden 
six  pilgrims. 


SCENE   II]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  115 

211.  this  age's  size.  The  size  of  people's  mouths  at  the  present 
time. 

217.  atomies.     Motes  in  a  sunbeam. 

217-8.  resolve  the  propositions.     Answer  the  questions. 

219.  observance.     Attention. 

221.     The  oak  was  sacred  to  Jove. 

223.  Give  rae  audience.     Listen  to  me. 

229.  Cry  "holla."  Check,  restrain,  as  a  horseman  calls 
"holla"  (wait,  stop),  to  check  his  horse. 

curvets.     Prances. 

230.  furnished.     Equipped,  dressed. 
232.  burden.     Refrain. 

236.  bring-  rae  out.     Put,  me  out. 

239.  had  as  lief  have  been  alone.  Would  have  been  as  glad  to 
be  alone. 

240.  for  fashion  sake.     For  the  sake  of  politeness. 
247.  ill-favouredly.     Badly. 

249.  just.     Exactly. 

256-7.  conned  them  out  of  rings.  Learned  by  rote  the  mottoes 
which  were  engraved  on  the  insides  of  gold  rings. 

258.  right  painted  cloth.  After  the  fashion  of  the  mottoes  or 
precepts  which  were  commonly  painted  upon  tapestry  hangings 
or  covers  for  furniture. 

261.  Atalanta's  heels.     See  note  on  1.  136. 

264.  breather.     Being. 

280.  lackey.     Footman. 

under  that  habit.     In  that  guise. 

288.  detect.     Make  note  of  ;  mark  off. 

293.  withal.     Here,  merely  a  stronger  form  of  toith. 

296.  trots  hard.  This  does  not  mean  that  time  goes  fast,  but 
rather  that  it  goes  with  difficulty  (hard),  and  hence  seems  slow 
in  passing. 

304.  lean.     Making  the  student  thin,  or  lean. 

310.  stays.     Stands  still. 

317.  native.     Here,  an  adjective. 


116  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [aCT   III 

318.  cony.     Rabbit. 

319.  kindled.     Born,  brought  forth. 

321.  purchase.     Acquire, 
removed.     Remote. 

322.  of  many.     By  many. 

323.  religious.     Either  a  hermit  or  a  monk. 

324.  courtship.     A  pun  on  the  two  meanings  of  the  word, — the 
ways  of  the  court,  and  the  art  of  wooing. 

338.  elegies.     Mournful  verses. 

339.  forsooth.     Expresses  scorn. 

310.  fancymonger.     One  who  meddles  with  love  (fancy). 

341.  quotidian.     A  fever  which  returns  every  day. 

343.  love-shaked.     Like  one  who  shivers  with  chills  or  ague 
accompanying  the  fever. 

347.  cage  of  rushes.     A  cage  from  which  it  would  be  easy  to 
escape. 

350.  unquestionable.     Not  inclined  to  engage  in  conversation. 

353.  your  having.     What  you  have. 

354.  bonnet  unhanded.     Hat  without  a  band. 

356.  careless  desolation.     Despondency  in  which  you  have  no 
interest  (care)  in  anything. 

357.  point-device.     Exact,  precise. 

366.  in  good  sooth.     Truly,  really. 

375.     A  reference  to  the  cruel  treatment  of  the  insane  in 
Shakespeare's  day. 

382.  moonish.     Changeable. 

387.  cattle  of  this  colour.     Creatures  of  this  sort. 

388.  entertain.     Encourage. 

forswear  him.     Give  him  up,  have  nothing  to  do  with  him. 
390-1.  living  humour.     Real  mood. 
392.  merely.     Wholly,  entirely. 

394.  to  wash  your  liver.     The  liver  was  supposed  to  be  the  seat 
of  the  passions,  and,  hence,  of  love. 


SCENE    III]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  117 

Scene  III. 

Touchstone  has  never  met  anyone  so  ugly  or  so  slovenly  as 
Audrey,  and  the  thought  of  making  love  to  her  appeals  to 
his  sense  of  humour.  The  presence  of  the  cynical  Jaques  in 
company  with  this  incongruous  pair  adds  to  the  humour  of 
the  scene. 

3.  feature.  Form,  appearance.  In  Shakespeare's  time  the 
word  was  not  confined  to  the  features  of  the  face. 

7.  capricious.  T\1iimsical,  fanciful.  The  literal  meaning  is 
"goatlike"  (Lat.  capei\  a  goat),  and  Touchstone  is  punning  on 
the  word.     Notice  also  the  pun  on  "goats"  and  "  Goths." 

Ovid.  A  Roman  poet  (4.3  B.C.— 17  A.D.).  He  incurred  the 
displeasure  of  Augustus,  and  was  banished  to  Tomi  on  the 
shores  of  the  Black  Sea.  This  country  was  inhabited  by  the 
Getae,  whom  Touchstone  calls  "the  Goths." 

8.  ill-inhabited.     Poorly  lodged. 

9.  Jove  in  a  thatched  house.  According  to  the  myth,  Jupiter 
and  Mercury  on  one  occasion  sought  shelter  in  a  peasant's 
cottage,    in   Phrygia. 

11.  seconded  with.     Helped  by. 
forward.     Quick  to  learn. 

12.  strikes  a  man  more  dead.     Takes  the  spirit  out  of  a  man. 
12-3.  a  great  reckoning  in  a  little  room.     A  large  bill  for  only 

a  few  people. 

18.  feigning.     Imaginative. 

26.  hard-favoured.     Plain-looking,  ugly. 

29.  material.     Full  of  matter. 

31-5.  I  thank  the  gods  I  am  foul.  Because  ugliness  and  honesty 
are  said  to  go  together,  I  am  thankful  that  I  am  ugly  (foul). 

39.  Sir.  The  title  Sir  corresponded  to  the  Latin  "  Dominus," 
and  was  often  given  to  those  who  had  taken  a  degree  from  a 
university. 

47.  what  though  ?  AMiat  does  it  matter  ?  "\\1iat  though  this 
be  so? 

48.  you  are  well  met.     I  am  glad  to  meet  you. 
dispatch.     To  do  business  in  haste. 


118  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT    III 

57.  'ild.     A  contraction  of  yield,  which  means  "reward." 
59.  a   toy   in   hand.     Audrey   is    merely    something   for   his 
amusement. 

be  covered.     Put  on  your  hat. 

61.  bow.  The  arched  piece  of  wood  to  which  the  yoke  is 
fastened. 

63.  bill.     Bill  and  coo  ;  rub  their  bills  together. 

70.  I  am  not  in  the  mind  but  I  would  be  better.  I  am  in  the 
mind  that  I  would  be  better. 

80.  Wind.     Turn  ;  or  it  may  be  an  older  form  of  ivend. 

84.  flout  me.     Mock  me. 

Scene  IV.  - 

The  most  important  point  in  this  scene,  from  a  dramatic 
point  of  view,  is  the  mention  of  Rosalind's  meeting  with  her 
father,  who  does  not  recognise  her.  This  is  necessary  as  a 
preparation  for  later  scenes  in  the  play. 

7.  of  the  dissembling-  colour.  Shows  that  he  is  not  to  be 
trusted. 

8.  Judas's.  In  old  paintings  Judas  was  generally  represented 
as  having  red  hair. 

14.  holy  bread.     Bread  used  at  the  sacrament. 

15.  cast.     Cast  off,  discarded. 

Diana.  The  virgin  goddess,  untouched  by  the  passion  of 
love. 

16. -a  nun  of  winter's  sisterhood.  A  nun  that  belongs  to  an 
order  that  is  as  crid,  or  free  from  passion,  as  winter. 

23.  verity.     Truth,  honesty. 

24.  concave.     Hollow,  insincere. 

a  covered  goblet.  Probably  a  reference  to  the  fact  that 
goblets  were  covered  when  they  were  empty. 

29.  the  word  of  a  tapster.  Who  would  be  ready  to  cheat  his 
customers. 

30.  confirmer  of  false  reckonings.  Ready  to  make  false  state- 
ments, and  then  swear  that  they  are  true. 

reckonings.     Accounts,  bills. 


SCENE   V]  NOTES— AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  119 

33.  question.     Conversation. 

39.  traverse.     Across  the  body,  instead  of  by  a  direct  thrust. 

40.  puisny.     Unskilful ;   literally,  younger. 

on  one  side.     And  hence  approaches  his  adversary  sideways. 

41.  noble.     Used  ironically. 

48.  pageant.     A  striking  scene. 

Scene  V. 

In  this  scene  Phebe  is  the  centre  of  interest, — first  when  she 
mocks  Silvius,  and  later  when  she  herself  falls  so  suddenly  in 
love.  She  appears  as  an  artful  coquette,  who  is  fully  conscious 
of  her  power  over  the  devoted  Silvius. 

5.  Falls  not.     Does  not  let  fall. 

6.  But  first  beg-s  pardon.     Without  first  begging  pardon. 

7.  dies  and  lives.     Gets  his  living  until  he  dies. 
11.  'Tis  pretty,  sure.     It  is  surely  a  pretty  fancy. 
13.  atomies.     Motes  of  dust. 

23.  cicatrice.     Scar ;  here,  simply  a  mark. 

capable  impressure.  The  mark  or  indentation  which  it  is 
capable  of  receiving. 

29.  fancy.     Love. 

34.  mocks.     Taunts. 

37.  all  at  once.     All  in  the  same  breath. 

40.  The  meaning  may  be  that  Phebe's  beauty  is  not  such  as 
will  light  up  the  room  and  take  the  place  of  a  candle  :  or  else 
that  she  will  not  need  to  look  at  herself  in  her  glass,  and  hence 
wiU  not  need  a  candle. 

44.  nature's  sale-work.  Ordinary  appearance  without  special 
beauty,  just  like  the  goods  that  are  sold  in  quantities  over  the 
counter. 

'Od's.     God's  ;  a  mild  oath. 

48.  bugle.     Black  beads  of  glass  are  called  "  bugles." 

52.  properer.     Handsomer. 

54.  ill-favour 'd.     Ugly. 

62.  Cry  the  m^n  mercy.    Beg  his  pardon. 


120  NOTES — AS   YOU    LIKE    IT  [ACT   III 

63.  When  an  ugly  person  mocks  at  others  it  makes  her 
uglier  still. 

76.  ply  her  hard.     Keep  on  wooing  her. 

79.  abused.     Deceived. 

81.  Dead  shepherd.  The  poet  Christopher  Marlowe,  in  whose 
poem  "Hero  and  Leander "  the  following  line  occurs. 

I  find  thy  saw  of  might.  I  feel  now  how  much  force  there  is 
in  your  saying  (saw). 

86.  If  you  feel  sorry  for  me  you  surely  must  be  ready  to 
relieve  my  misery. 

88-9.  If  you  returned  my  love,  both  your  sorrow  and  my 
grief  would  disappear. 

95.  erst.     Formerly. 

100.  in  such  a  poverty  of  grace.     So  much  out  of  favour. 

106.  erewhile.     A  little  while  ago. 

109.  carlot.     Peasant ;  a  diminutive  of  churl. 

114.   It.     Used  slightingly,  to  express  contempt. 

124.  constant.     Uniform. 

mingled  damask.    Red,  as  in  damask  roses,  mingled  with  white. 

126.   In  parcels.     Piecemeal,  point  by  point. 

126-7.  would  have  gone  near  to  fall  in  love.  Would  have  come 
near  falling. 

130.  what  had  he  to  do.     WTiat  business  had  he. 

132.  I  am  remember'd.     I  recall  to  mind. 

134.  omittance  is  no  quittance.  The  fact  that  I  neglected  to 
taunt  him  doesn't  mean  that  I  am  to  let  him  off  altogether. 

139.  passing.     Exceedingly. 

Questions. 

1.  (a)  ^"hat  is  Orlando's  reason  for  hanging  his  verses  on  the 
trees  ? 

{h)  "MMiat  dramatic  purpose  is  served  by  this  whim  of 
Orlando's  ? 

2.  ^Hiy  is  Jaques  interested  in  the  wooing  of  Touchstone 
and  Audrey,  and  why,  on  the  other  hand  does  he  sneer  at 
the  verses  of  Orlando? 


SCENE   l]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE    IT  121 

3.  "On  three  different  occasions  in  this  Act,  Rosalind's 
disguise  serves  a  good  purpose."    Explain. 

4.  (a)  How  do  you  account  for  Celia's  comments  on  Orlando  r 
(6)  Show  what  part  Celia  plays  in  the  development  of  Act  III. 

5.  *' Aside  from  the  development  of  the  main  love  story 
in  Act  III.,  the  interest  of  the  audience  depends  upon 
the  humorous  situations  which  arise  from  the  meeting  of 
characters  who  are  oddly  suited  to  each  other." 

(a)  In  what  way  does  the  dramatist  keep  up  the  interest  in 
the  main  love  story  ? 

(6)  Mention  some  of  the  humorous  situations  in  this  Act, 
and  show  to  what  extent  the  characters  in  each  case  are 
"oddly  suited  to  each  other." 

Act  IV.— Scene  I. 

In  this  scene  Jaques  for  the  first  time  meets  with  Rosalind, 
and,  cynic  though  he  is,  he  is  so  much  attracted  by  the 
"pretty  youth"  that  he  wishes  "to  be  better  acquainted." 
He  is  apparently  so  much  in  love  with  his  own  '*  sadness  "  that 
he  fails  to  realize  that  Rosalind  is  making  fun  of  him ;  or  it 
may  be  that  he  purposely  makes  an  effort  to  "seem  senseless 
of  the  bob."  Wlien  Orlando  appears,  the  fact  that  Rosalind  is 
really  in  love  no  doubt  adds  to  her  gaiety  and  high  spirits  in 
the  make-believe  wooing  that  takes  place. 

7.  modern  censure.     Common  criticism. 

11.  emulation.     Jealous  rivalry. 

fantastical.     Becauses  it  expresses  the  fancies  of  lovers. 

13.  politic.     Assumed  for  some  purpose. 

14.  nice.     Has  to  do  with  trifles. 

16.  simples.  The  juices  of  herbs  used  in  medicines  were 
spoken  of  as  simples  because  each  plant  yielded  only  a  single 
kind. 

17.  simdry  contemplation.  Thinking  now  of  this  journey,  now 
of  that. 

18.  often  rumination.     Frequent  meditation, 
humorous.     Moody. 


122  NOTES — AS  YOU  LIKE  IT  [ACT  IV 

29.  God  be  wi'  you.     Good  bye. 

31.  look.     See  that,  take  care  that. 

32.  disable  all  the  benefits.     Make  little  of  the  good  qualities. 

33.  nativity.     The  rank  of  life  in  which  you  were  born. 

34.  countenance.     Appearance. 

35.  swam.     Sailed. 

44-5.  People  may  say  that  he  is  in  love,  but  I'll  guarantee 
that  he  is  not. 

clapped  him  on  the  shoulder.  This  may  mean  either  as  a 
friend,  or  as  a  constable  who  arrests  a  man. 

48.  had  as  lief.     Would  as  willingly. 

51.  jointure.  Marriage  settlement ;  the  property  which  a 
husband  settles  on  his  wife  at  marriage  to  belong  to  her  in 
case  of  his  death. 

55.  leer.     Look,  expression  of  face. 

62.  gravelled.     Stuck. 

63.  out.  Out  of  something  to  say ;  do  not  know  what  to  say 
next. 

64.  God  warn  us.  God  defend  us  from  ever  being  in  that 
predicament. 

65.  the  cleanliest  shift.     The  best  way  out  of  the  difficulty. 
72.  suit.     A  pun  on  the  two  meanings  of  the  word. 

77.  in  her  person.     Acting  in  her  behalf. 

79.  by  attorney.  By  proxy.  Let  someone  else  die  in  your 
place. 

81.  videlicet.     Namely,  viz. 

82.  Troilus  was  one  of  the  sons  of  Priam,  King  of  Troy.  He 
fell  in  love  with  a  Grecian  maiden,  named  Cressida,  who  had 
been  taken  prisoner  by  the  Trojans ;  but  she  proved  unfaithful 
to  him.     He  was  killed  by  the  Greeks  during  the  siege. 

84.  patterns  of  love.     Models  for  lovers  to  follow. 

Leander,  a  youth  of  Abydos  was  in  love  with  a  maiden 
named  Hero,  who  lived  at  Sestos,  on  the  opposite  side  of  the 
Hellespont.  Guided  by  a  torch  which  she  placed  in  her  tower, 
he  swam  the  Hellespont  every  night  to  see  her ;  but  one  dark 
night  when  the  torch  was  extinguished  by  a  storm,  he  was 


SCENE   l]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  123 

drowned,  and  his  body  was  washed  up  at  the  foot  of  the 
tower.  Overcome  with  grief,  Hero  threw  herself  into  the  sea 
and  perished. 

96.  coming-on.     Favourable,  encouraging. 

120.  commission.     License. 

121-2.  goes  before  the  priest.  Doesn't  wait  for  the  priest  to 
tell  her  what  to  say. 

132.  Barbary.  A  general  name  for  the  north  of  Africa, 
including  Morocco,  Fez,  Algeria,  Tunis  and  Tripoli. 

133-4.     new-fangled.     Wanting  new  things. 

135-6.  Diana  in  the  fountain.  Statues  representing  one  or 
other  of  the  Greek  goddesses,  with  water  spouting  from  the 
mouth  or  the  eyes,  were  frequent  ornaments  of  fountains. 

137.  hyen.     Hyena. 

143.  the  waywarder.     The  more  wilful. 

make  the  doors.     Close  the  doors  ;  make  them  fast. 

154.  cast  away.     Forsaken. 

157-8.  God  mend  me.    God  help  me ;  God  give  me  better  fortune. 

not  dangerous.     Not  profane. 

160.  pathetical.  Here  used  in  a  ludicrous  sense,  meaning,  to 
be  pitied,  miserable. 

165.  religion.     Seriousness. 

167.  justice.     Judge. 

169.  misused.     Abused. 

171-2.  A  reference  to  the  proverb,  "  It's  an  ill  bird  that  fouls 
its  own  nest." 

175.  sounded.     Measured. 

176.  the  bay  of  Portugal.  There  is  no  distinct  "bay"  of 
Portugal.  The  name  was  formerly  applied  to  the  waters  oft 
the  coast  between  Oporto  and  Cintra.  The  water  in  this 
"bay"  is  so  deep  that  in  Shakespeare's  time  it  was  impossible 
to  sound  it. 

179.  boy.     Cupid, 
abuses.     Deceives. 

180.  his  own  are  out.     "Love  is  blind." 
183.  shadow.     Shady  place. 


124  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT    IV 


Scene  II. 

This  scene  is  introduced  into  the  play  merely  to  allow  for  the 
passage  of  the  two  hours  during  which  Orlando  is  absent  from 
Rosalind. 

3-5.     See  Act  II.,  Scene  I.     Jaques  is  sarcastic. 

8.  It  does  not  matter  how  little  tune  there  is  to  it  if  (so)  it 
makes  noise  enough. 

12.  sing  him  home.     Conduct  him  home  with  songs, 
bear  this  burthen.     Join  in  this  chorus. 

13.  There  is  a  coarse  reference  here  to  the  old  fancy  that  a 
man  whose  wife  was  unfaithful  to  him  wore  horns  on  his 
forehead. 

Scene  III. 

In  this  scene  Rosalind  is  still  the  real  centre  of  interest.  In 
the  first  part  of  the  scene  her  mockery  of  the  love-sick  Silvius 
creates  a  humorous  situation.  In  the  latter  half  of  the  scene 
her  own  feelings  regarding  Orlando  are  put  to  the  test ;  but  as 
soon  as  her  immediate  anxiety  has  been  relieved  she  recovers 
her  self-possession,  and  with  delightful  humour  insists  that 
her  swooning  was  merely  a  clever  counterfeit.  The  sudden 
conversion  of  Oliver  is  one  of  the  surprises  of  the  play,  but  in 
a  scene  of  enchantment  such  as  the  Forest  of  Arden  with  its 
olive  trees  and  palms  and  oak  trees  side  by  side,  and  a  lioness 
with  cubs  in  the  vicinity  of  a  peaceful  sheep-fold,  nothing 
should  really  be  a  matter  for  surprise. 

1.  How  say  you  ?    What  do  you  say  ? 

2.  much  Orlando.     Ironical  for  "no  sign  of  Orlando." 

11.  It  bears  an  angry  tenour.  The  contents  are  of  an  angry 
nature. 

13-4.  This  letter  would  rouse  even  the  most  patient  person 
and  make  him  bluster. 

17.  as  rare  as  phcenix.  The  phoenix  is  a  fabulous  bird 
resembling  the  eagle  in  size.  According  to  the  legend  it  came 
from  Arabia  to  Egypt  every  500  years.  Here  it  built  itself  a 
funeral  pile  upon  which  it  was  consumed,  but  from  the  flames 
there  arose  a  new  phoenix  to  take  the  place  of  the  old. 


SCENE   III]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  125 

"Od's  my  will.     See  note  on  Act  III.,  Scene  V.,  1.  44. 

23.  turn'd  into.     Brought  to. 

25.  freestone-colour'd.     Of  the  colour  of  bath-brick. 

27.  huswife's  hand.  The  hand  of  a  housewife,  hardened  with 
rough  work. 

34:.  giant-rude.     Exceedingly  rude,  monstrously  rude. 

35.  Efhiope.     Black  as  an  Ethiopian,  or  negro. 

35-6.  blacker  in  their  effect  than  in  their  countenance.  Being 
written  in  ink  they  are  black  in  their  appearance  (countenance), 
but  they  are  blacker  still  in  the  effect  which  they  produce  on 
the  reader. 

37.  So  please  you.     If  you  please. 

39.  Phebes  me.  She  wi'ites  to  me  as  only  a  person  as  cruel 
as  Phebe  could  write. 

44.  thy  godhead  laid  apart.  Thy  godhead  being  set  aside  ;  the 
nominative  absolute  construction. 

48.  vengeance.     Harm,  injury. 

49.  Meaning  me  a  beast.  Since  the  eye  of  man  could  do  her 
no  harm,  she  must  mean  that  I  am  a  beast. 

50.  eyne.     Eyes. 

58.  by  him  seal  up  thy  mind.  Send  back  an  answer  by  him, 
sealed  up  so  that  he  will  not  read  it. 

59.  youth  and  kind.     Youth  and  other  qualities. 
61.  make.     Do. 

68.  instrument.  In  the  double  sense  of  "tool,"  and  "musical 
instriunent. " 

76.  purlieus.     Borders,  outskirts. 

79.  neighbour  bottom.     Neighbouring  lowlands,  or  valley. 

80.  rank.     Row. 

81.  Left  on  your  right  hand.  If  you  leave  them  on  your  right 
hand.. 

84.     If  what  I  have  been  told  about  you  may  help  my  eye  to 
judge. 
87.  favour.     Appearance. 

87-8.  bestows  himself  like  a  ripe  sister.  Acts  like  a  grown-up 
sister. 


126  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT   IV 

92.  commend  him.     Send  greetings. 
94.  napkin.     Handkerchief. 

102.  Meditating  on  love  (fancy),  which  is  both  bitter  and 
sweet. 

106.  dry  antiquity.     Old  age  which  had  inade  it  dry. 
110.  nimble  in  threats.    With  darting  threatening  movements. 
113.  indented  glides.     With  a  sinuous  gliding  movement. 
115.  with  udders  all  drawn  dry.     Seel.  127. 

118.  royal.  Because  the  lion  was  regarded  as  the  king  of 
beasts. 

123.  render.     Report. 

130.  just  occasion.     The  just  cause  he  had  for  revenge. 

132.  hurtling.     Noise  of  combat,  tumult. 

136-8.  I  am  not  ashamed  to  tell  you  what  I  was,  since  I  am 
now  a  different  being,  and  my  change  of  heart  (conversion) 
has  made  me  so  much  happier. 

139.  for.     How  about? 

139-40.  When  each  of  us  had  told  the  story  of  his  adventures 
from  first  to  last  amid  tears  of  affection. 

142.  As.     As,  for  instance. 

143.  In  brief.     To  make  a  long  story  short. 

144.  entertainment.     Good  care. 
166.  a  body.     Anyone. 

180.  How  you  excuse.  That  is,  whether  you  excuse  him  or 
not. 

181.  devise  something.    Think  of  some  message  to  send  to  him. 

Questions. 

1.  In  Shakespeare's  time  travel  on  the  continent  was  in 
fashion.  Show  by  reference  to  this  Act  how  this  fashion  was 
regarded  by  Shakespeare. 

2.  How  is  it  that  the  spectacle  of  two  young  men  (Ganymede 
and  Orlando)  carrying  on  a  pretence  of  wooing  does  not  appear 
ridiculous  to  the  audience  ? 


SCENES   I-Il]  NOTES — AS   YOU   LIKE   IT  127 

3.  Rosalind  had  professed  to  Orlando  that  she  could  cure 
him  of  love.  What  means  does  she  take,  in  sport,  to  carry- 
out  her  promise  ? 

4.  Why  does  Rosalind  pretend  to  Silvius  that  Phebe's  letter 
was  written  in  "  a  boisterous  and  cruel  style  "  ? 

5.  TSTiat  dramatic  purpose  is  served,  in  this  Act,  by  the 
arrival  of  Oliver  in  the  Forest  of  Arden,  and  his  adventure 
with  the  snake  and  the  lioness  ? 

Act  V. — Scene  I. 

This  scene  does  not  contribute  anything  of  importance  to 
the  development  of  the  plot,  but  it  provides  an  excellent 
opportunity  for  humorous  acting. 

3-4.  for  all  the  old  gentleman's  saying.  That  is,  in  spite  of 
what  Jaques  had  said. 

12.  we  shall  be  flouting.     We  can't  help  joking. 

hold.     Restrain  ourselves. 

14.  God  ye  good  even.     God  give  you  a  good  evening. 

38-4.     William  is  evidently  standing  with  mouth  open. 

42.  consent.     Agree. 

ipse.     Latin  for  he,  hii-nself. 

50.  to  thy  better  understanding.  You  will  understand  the 
word  diest,  better  than  the  word  perishest. 

53.  bastinado.     Beating,  cudgelling. 

54.  bandy  with  thee  in  faction.  Fight  with  you  by  means  of 
conspiracy.  Literally,  to  bandy  is  to  throw  backwards  and 
forwards. 

55.  policy.     Cunning  schemes,  stratagems. 

Scene  II. 

The  main  complications  in  the  play  have  grown  out  of 
Rosalind's  disguise  as  Ganymede.  The  determination  of 
Oliver  and  Celia  to  be  married  without  further  delay,  gives 
Rosalind  an  opportunity  to  throw  off  her  disguise  and  thus 
bring  to  a  climax  the  different  love-stories  in  the  play.  In  this 
scene,  in  anticipation  of  her  transformation,  she  artfully  raises 
the  curiosity  and  expectation  of  the  lovers. 


128  NOTES — AS   YOU  LIKE   IT  [aCT     V 

4.  persever.  The  older  spelling  of  the  word.  It  was  accented 
on  the  second  syllable  in  Shakespeare's  day. 

5.  call  the  giddiness  of  it  in  question.  Argue  about  the  rashness 
of  it. 

11.  estate.     Settle. 

27.  wonders.  The  surprising  news  that  Oliver  and  Celia  had 
fallen  in  love. 

28.  I  know  where  you  are.     I  know  what  you  are  referring  to. 

30.  thrasonical.  Boastful.  Thraso  was  a  bragging  soldier  in 
the  Eunuchus  of  Terence. 

I  came,  saw,  and  overcame.  "  Veni,  vidi,  vici," — the  message 
sent  by  Caesar  to  the  Roman  Senate  after  he  had  defeated 
Pharnaces,  King  of  Pontus,  B.C.  47. 

35.  degrees.     Steps. 

37.  incontinent.     Immediately,  without  hindrance. 

51.  conceit.     Understanding. 

55.  grace  me.     Be  to  my  credit. 

57.  conversed  with.     Held  intercourse  with,  associated  with. 

58.  damnable.     Worthy  of  condemnation. 

59.  as  your  gesture  cries  it  out.    As  your  demeanour  proclaims. 

64.  danger.    Danger  of  punishment  for  my  practice  of  magic. 

66.  tender  dearly.     Value  highly. 

66-7.  though  I  say  I  am  a  magician.  Although  I  appear  to  be 
risking  my  life  by  confessing  that  I  am  a  magician.  The  laws 
against  the  practice  of  magic  were  very  severe  in  Shakespeare's 
time. 

88.  fantasy.    Fancy,  with  all  its  whims. 

90.  observance.     Respect. 

92.  observance.  It  is  unlikely  that  Shakespeare  repeated  the 
word  obseT^ance.  Possibly  he  wrote  "obedience,"  or  "endur- 
ance." 

103.  howling.  Phebe,  Orlando,  Rosalind,  and  Silvius  had  all 
been  talking  at  once,  and  hence  their  voices  were  loud  and 
discordant. 


SCENES  III-IV]       NOTES — AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  129 

Scene  III. 

This  scene  merely  forms  an  interlude  between  the  promise 
of  RosaUnd  and  its  fulfilment  in  the  final  scene. 
4.  dishonest.     Immodest,  dishonourable. 
4-5.  a  woman  of  the  world.     A  married  woman. 
6.  Well  met.     I  am  glad  to  meet  you. 

9.  We  are  for  you.     Agreed. 

10.  clap  into  it  roundly.     Plunge  into  it  directly. 

12.  the  only  prolog^ues.     Only  excuses  to  prepare  the  way. 
18.  ring  time.     Either  the  time  for  dancing  in  a  ring,  or  the 
time  for  lovers  to  exchange  engagement  rings. 

21.  between  the  acres.  On  the  grassy  ridges  separating  the 
fields  (acres). 

31.  with  the  prime.     When  everything  is  at  its  best. 

34.  no  great  matter.     Not  very  much  sense. 

Scene  IV. 

In  this  scene  the  various  threads  of  the  play  are  skilfully 
gathered  up.  WTiile  Rosalind  is  effecting  her  transformation, 
Touchstone  entertains  the  company  with  his  inimitable 
foolery,  to  the  gi^eat  delight  of  Jaques.  Then  Rosalind  appears 
with  Hymen,  always  a  popular  figure  in  a  play,  and  to  the 
accompaniment  of  music  she  is  restored  to  her  father  and  the 
denouement  of  the  love  stories  is  reached.  And  finally,  to 
make  all  end  happily,  Duke  Senior  is  restored  to  his  dukedom, 
with  Orlando  as  his  prospective  heir.  Even  in  the  case  of  the 
melancholy  Jaques  the  play  ends  not  unhappily,  for  he  is 
certain  to  find  in  Duke  Frederick  a  companion  to  his  liking. 

4.  As  those  who  fear  that  there  is  no  foundation  for  their 
hopes,  and  tremble  because  they  are  conscious  of  these  fears. 

5-6.  Whiles  our  compact  is  urged.  While  I  lay  before  you 
the  things  we  have  agreed  to. 

22.  to  make  all  this  matter  even.  To  make  it  come  out 
right ;    to  smooth  over  the  difficulties. 

31.  lively.    Lifelike. 


130  NOTES — AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  [ACT  V 

touches  of  my  daughter's  favour.  Points  of  resemblance  to 
my  daughter's  appearance   (favour). 

36.  desperate  studies.  Magic,  in  which,  according  to  popular 
belief,  there  was  danger  of  losing  one's  soul. 

38.  Obscured.     Concealed,  hidden. 

39.  toward.     At  hand. 

44.  motley-minded.  With  the  mind  of  a  fool,  who  wore  a 
motley  dress. 

47.  purgation.     Test. 

trod  a  measure.     Danced  a  minuet. 

48.  politic.     Diplomatic,  artful. 

49.  undone.     Ruined. 
51.  ta'en  up.     Made  up. 

57.  God  'ild  you.     God  reward  (yield)  you. 

I  desire  you  of  the  like.     I  have  the  same  good  wishes  for  you. 

59.  copulatives.     Those  who  wish  to  be  coupled,  or  married, 
to  swear  and  to  forswear.     To  swear  to  be  faithful,  and  after- 
wards to  break  my  oath. 

60.  blood  breaks.     Passion  causes  one  to  break  his  oath. 

61.  ill-favoured.     Homely,  ugly, 
humour.     Whim,  fancy. 

63.  honesty.     Modesty. 

65.  swift  and  sententious.     Quick  and  full  of  pithy  sayings. 

67.  The  Duke  has  said  that  Touchstone  is  quick  in  repartee. 
Touchstone  replies  that,  according  to  the  proverb  (a  "fool's 
bolt  is  soon  shot "),  fools  have  the  reputation  of  shooting  their 
arrows  without  waiting  to  take  aim.  A  "bolt"  was  a  short 
blunt-headed  arrow. 

67-8.  such  dulcet  diseases.  Such  pleasant  weaknesses  as  fools 
are  charged  with.  Touchstone  purposely  uses  high-flown 
language  for  the  sake  of  humour. 

78.  Quip  Modest.    A  taunt  (quip)  that  was  moderately  sharp. 

78-9.  disabled.     Doubted  the  value  of,  disparaged. 

89.  measured  swords.  Swords  were  measured  before  a  duel, 
so  as  to  make  sure  that  neither  party  had  the  advantage  of  the 
other. 


SCENE   IV]  NOTES — AS  YOU   LIKE  IT  131 

90.  nominate.     Name. 

92.  by  the  book.  According  to  the  exact  directions  given  in 
the  book.  Shakespeare  probably  had  in  mind  some  particular 
book  on  duelling.  One  such  book  was  published  in  1590, 
another  in  1594. 

108.  a  stalking--horse.  A  horse  behind  which  the  sportsman 
concealed  himself  so  as  to  stalk  (creep  towards)  his  game  with- 
out being  observed. 

109.  under  presentation  of  that.  Under  the  appearance,  or 
semblance,  of  folly. 

Hymen.     The  god  of  marriage. 

111.  made  even.     With  difficulties  smoothed  away. 

112.  Atone.     Agree  ;  literally,  are  at  one. 

117.     That  is  to  say,  Rosalind  has  Orlando's  heart. 

128.  bar.     Prohibit,  forbid. 

129.  make  conclusion.     Bring  to  an  end.  » 

133.  If  truth  is  truth  and  does  not  prove  false. 

134.  cross.     Misfortune. 
136.  accord.     Consent. 
138.  sure.  Bound  closely. 
142.  reason.     Conversation. 

144.  Juno.  The  Queen  of  Heaven,  the  goddess  who  presided 
over  marriage  and  the  home. 

151.  You  are  even  as  a  daughter  to  me,  and  no  less  welcome 
than  a  daughter. 

152.  eat  my  word.     Break  my  promise. 

153.  Thy  fidelity  (faith)  binds  (combines)  my  love  (fancy  to 
thee). 

159.  Address'd.     Made  ready. 

160.  in  his  own  conduct.     Led  by  himself. 

163.  religious  man.     Monk,  hermit. 

164.  question.     Conversation. 

167.  restored.     The  subject  is  he  (1.  162). 

169.  engage.     Pledge. 

170.  offer'st  fairly.     Makest  a  good  offering,  or  present. 


132  NOTES — AS  YOU  LIKE   IT  [ACT   V 

171.  the  other.  Orlando,  who  through  his  marriage  with 
RosaHnd  would  inherit  the  dukedom. 

172.  at  large.     Of  large  extent. 

173.  do  those  ends.     Bring  to  an  end  those  rites. 

175.  after.     Afterwards, 
every.     Every  one. 

176.  shrewd.     Bitter,  sharp. 

178.  states.     Either  rank  in  life,  or  estates. 

179.  new-fallen  dignity.  The  restoration  of  the  dukedom 
which  had  just  come  to  him. 

182.  measures.     Dances. 

183.  by  your  patience.     With  youj?  permission  I  would  speak. 

184.  put  on.     Engaged  in,  entered  upon. 

185.  pompous.     FuU  of  pomp. 
187.  convertites.     Converts. 

193.  You  to  a  marriage  which  you  have  well  deserved  by 
your  long  and  faithful  devotion. 

203.  epilogue.  Speech  delivered  at  the  conclusion  of  the  play, 
just  as  the  prologue  was  delivered  at  the  beginning. 

unhandsome.     Unbecoming. 

205.  bush.  The  ivy  was  sacred  to  Bacchus,  the  god  of  wine, 
and  it  was  customary  for  the  wine-shop  to  have  a  "bush"  of 
ivy  over  the  door  ;  but  a  wine-shop  where  good  wine  was  sold 
naturally  did  not  need  a  "  bush  "  to  advertise  it. 

209.  insinuate  with  you.     Ingratiate  myself,  gain  your  favour. 

210.  furnished.     Dressed. 

212.  conjure.     Deliver  a  solemn  charge. 

213-4.    This  explains  the  title  As  You  Like  It. 

217-8.  If  I  were  a  woman.  Since  the  female  parts  in  all  plays 
in  Shakespeare's  time  were  acted  by  youths,  Rosalind  in  this 
case  is  really  a  young  man. 

219.  liked.     Pleased. 

220.  defied.     Disliked,  objected  to. 
222.  bid  me  farewell.     Applaud. 


NOTES — AS  YOU   LIKE   IT  133 

Questions. 

1.  It  might  geem  to  the  audience  absurd  that  Oliver  and 
Celia  should  have  fallen  in  love  so  suddenly.  How  does 
Shakespeare  guard  against  this  absurdity  ? 

2.  "  It  is  the  disguise  of  Rosalind  that  has  brought  about  all 
the  complications  in  the  love  stories  of  the  play."  Show  that 
this  is  true. 

3.  On  what  occasions  in  Act  V.  is  music  introduced  into  the 
play  ?    What  purpose  does  it  serve  on  each  occasion  ? 

4.  "In  Wilham  and  Corin,  Shakespeare  presents  two 
different    types    of    rustics."      Explain. 

5.  When  Duke  Frederick  is  "converted"  he  bequeaths  his 
crown  to  his  banished  brother,  the  Duke  Senior.  Do  you 
think  this  is  necessary  in  order  to  bring  the  play  to  a  happy 
ending  ?    Give  reasons. 

6.  (a)  When  the  melancholy  Jacques  says  farewell  to  the 
Duke  Senior  and  his  company  in  what  frame  of  mind  is  he. 
Is  he  sour  and  cynical,  or  is  he  in  a  pleasant  mood  ? 

(6)  Why  is  it  necessary  to  have  him  appear  at  all  at  the  end 
of  the  play?  Might  the  play  not  have  ended  as  well  at  the 
close  of  the  Duke's  speech  (L  182)  ? 


f 


QUESTIONS   PROM    DEPARTMENTAL   AND 
MATRICULATION    PAPERS. 


1.  Briefly  discuss  the  following  comments  on  characters  in 
As  You  Like  It. 

(a)  "The  love  Celia  gives  to  RosaUnd  is  more  perfect  than 
she  receives." 

(5)  "Corinisa  real  shepherd,  Shakespeare's  compliment  to 
honest  labour." 

2.  (a)  Outline  the  character  of  Touchstone. 

(6)  State  in  a  general  way  the  purpose  served  by  Touch- 
stone in  relation  to  the  main  plot  and  sub-plots,  and  to  the 
tone  of  the  play. 

3.  (a)  Trace  the  courtship  of  Orlando  and  Rosalind. 

(b)  "WTiat  circumstances  brought  about  the  meeting  of 
Orlando  and  Rosalind  in  the  Forest  of  Arden  ? 

(c)  Contrast  the  character  of  Jaques  with  that  of  the  Duke 
Senior. 

4.  With  the  special  purpose  of  illustrating  the  cynical  spirit 
of  Jaques  write  a  brief  summary  of  his  intercourse  with 
(1)  Orlando,  (2)  Rosalind,  and  (3)  Touchstone. 

5.  (a)  Discuss  the  attitude  of  Jaques  towards  his  fellow-men, 
supporting  your  views  by  references  to  passages  in  the  play. 

(b)  What  di'amatic  purposes  are  served  (1)  by  the  presence 
of  Adam  in  the  play,  (2)  by  the  introduction  of  the  Silvius- 
Phebe  story  ? 

6.  (a)  Compare,  with  references,  the  parts  played  in  the 
action  of  the  comedy  by  Jaques  and  Touchstone  respectively. 

(b)  Orlando  says,  "You  have  trained  me  like  a  peasant, 
obscuring  and  hiding  from  me  all  gentleman-like  qualities. " 

(1)  In  contrast  to  this  statement,  what  is  the  character  of 
Orlando's  actions  and  language  as  shown  in  the  play  ?  (2) 
Account  for  his  character  in  view  of  the  foregoing  statement. 

7.  Paraphrase  the  passage  in  Act  II.,  Scene  VII.,  beginning 
"  Wliy,  who  cries  out  on  pride,"  in  such  a  way  as  to  show  that 
you  understand  the  exact  meaning. 

134 


5 


u 
c 


J 

Is 



